[Diagnostic value of myocardial thallium stress scintigraphy in the detection of coronary artery disease in patients undergoing chronic hemodialysis].Atherosclerotic heart disease is the leading cause of death in patients with end stage renal disease, but its non invasive detection remains difficult because of a low efficacy of exercise testing. The aim of the study was to evaluate diagnostic accuracy of thallium myocardial imaging after dipyridamole combined with exercise. Forty two chronic dialysis patients (34 men, 8 women) aged 55 +/- 11 years (range: 36 to 75) without symptom of angina nor myocardial infarction were studied. In each patient, an echocardiography, a myocardial scintigraphy with dipyridamole combined with symptom-limited exercise, and coronarography were performed. A coronary heart disease was diagnosed by coronarography in 10 patients (4.5 and 1 respectively with 1, 2 and 3 vessels diseased). Echocardiography detected a left ventricular hypertrophy (LVH) in 26 patients and a regional asynergia in 14 patients. A positive scintigraphy was present in 11 patients. Three false-positive and 2 false-negative on scintigraphy were noted. Sensibility, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were respectively evaluated at 80, 73, 73 and 93%. All the five patients with either false-positive or false-negative scintigraphy exhibited a LVH. CONCLUSION. In chronic dialysis patients, coronary heart disease may be detected by thallium myocardial imaging after dipyridamole combined with exercise.Comparison of the prognostic value of dipyridamole and dobutamine myocardial perfusion scintigraphy in hemodialysis patients.Screening for coronary artery disease (CAD) in hemodialysis patients is hampered by contraindications and/or limitations of the available techniques in this population. Myocardial perfusion scintigraphy (MPS) using dipyridamole has been considered inaccurate due to abnormally high basal levels of adenosine in uremia that could blunt the vasodilatory response. Since dobutamine may be more reliable, we directly compared the two in patients on hemodialysis. We performed MPS at rest and after separate dipyridamole or dobutamine stress in 121 chronic hemodialysis patients. More numerous, larger, and more intense reversible lesions were induced with dobutamine than with dipyridamole, mainly in the anteroseptal segments. Reversibility with dipyridamole but not dobutamine MPS was independently and strongly related with mortality associated with CAD and with fatal and non-fatal CAD. We hypothesize that the chronotropic action of dobutamine induced alterations of wall motion, leading to spurious perfusion defects, not unlike artifacts seen with left bundle branch block. Our study shows that even though dobutamine induced more pronounced myocardial ischemia than dipyridamole in chronic hemodialysis patients, dipyridamole MPS more accurately identifies patients at high risk for subsequent cardiac death or non-fatal CAD than dobutamine.Informational contribution of noninvasive screening tests for coronary artery disease in patients on chronic renal replacement therapy.The prevalence of coronary artery disease (CAD) is high in patients on renal replacement therapy; therefore, reliable noninvasive screening tests are needed. We retrospectively determined the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative likelihood ratios (LRs) for a history of chest pain, resting and exercise electrocardiography (ECG), thallium dipyridamole scintigraphy, and echocardiography in 42 patients undergoing chronic hemodialysis and 42 patients after renal transplantation who also underwent coronary angiography. In addition, the prognostic power of each test for the occurrence of a cardiovascular event after angiography (therapeutic intervention, myocardial infarction, or cardiovascular death) was evaluated during a follow-up of 37 months. Forty-three patients had significant CAD on angiography. Angina pectoris had a sensitivity of 65% and specificity of 66%, corresponding to a positive LR of 1.9 and a negative LR of 0.5. A variable number of patients underwent noninvasive tests before angiography. Results were similar in patients undergoing hemodialysis and after renal transplantation and in patients with or without angina pectoris. Exercise ECG could not be performed in the majority of patients, and resting ECG (sensitivity, 67%; specificity, 52%; corresponding to a positive LR of 1.4 and negative LR of 0.6) and scintigraphy (sensitivity, 80%; specificity, 37%; positive LR, 1.3; negative LR, 0.5) in patients on renal replacement therapy were not useful for the diagnosis of CAD. Angina also markedly increased the relative odds for the occurrence of a cardiovascular event during follow-up (relative odds, 4.6) compared with other noninvasive tests. Angina pectoris had the best informational and prognostic value of noninvasive screening methods, but angiography seems to be the only method to clearly document CAD in patients on renal replacement therapy.Myocardial scintigraphy and clinical stratification as predictors of events in renal transplant candidates.We tested the hypothesis that the universal application of myocardial scanning with single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) would result in better risk stratification in renal transplant candidates (RTC) compared with SPECT being restricted to patients who, in addition to renal disease, had other clinical risk factors.RTCs (n=363) underwent SPECT and clinical risk stratification according to the American Society of Transplantation (AST) algorithm and were followed up until a major adverse cardiovascular event (MACE) or death.Of the 363 patients, 79 patients (22%) had an abnormal SPECT scan and 270 (74%) were classified as high risk. Both methods correctly identified patients with increased probability of MACE. However, clinical stratification performed better (sensitivity and negative predictive value 99% and 99% vs. 25% and 87%, respectively). High-risk patients with an abnormal SPECT scan had a modest increased risk of events (log-rank = 0.03; hazard ratio [HR] = 1.37; 95% confidence interval [95% CI], 1.02-1.82). Eighty-six patients underwent coronary angiography, and coronary artery disease (CAD) was found in 60%. High-risk patients with CAD had an increased incidence of events (log-rank = 0.008; HR=3.85; 95% CI, 1.46-13.22), but in those with an abnormal SPECT scan, the incidence of events was not influenced by CAD (log-rank = 0.23). Forty-six patients died. Clinical stratification, but not SPECT, correlated with the probability of death (log-rank = 0.02; HR=3.25; 95% CI, 1.31-10.82).SPECT should be restricted to high-risk patients. Moreover, in contrast to SPECT, the AST algorithm was also useful for predicting death by any cause in RTCs and for selecting patients for invasive coronary testing.Routine coronary angiography in diabetic nephropathy patients before transplantation.We evaluated the incidence of significant coronary artery stenoses (CAS), angina pectoris (AP), revascularization and associated risk factors in 155 consecutive diabetic nephropathy transplant candidates. Kidney and kidney-pancreas transplant candidates with diabetes for more than 10 years and/or retinopathy and/or biopsy verified diabetic nephropathy were included. The inclusion period was 1999-2004. Seventy-two percent of patients were male. Sixty-one percent had type 1 diabetes and 39% had type 2 diabetes and mean age was 46 years (+/-10) and 58 years (+/-11), respectively. History of heart disease was present in 34% of patients, 34% had cerebro-vascular and/or peripheral atherosclerotic disease, and 51% had neither. Fifty-five percent had a smoking history and 46% were on dialysis. Significant CAS was found in 45% of patients, of whom 17% had AP. No patients below 35 years of age had significant CAS (n = 11, p = 0.001). Revascularization was performed in 57% of patients with significant CAS. The only risk factor for significant CAS in multiple logistic regression was age (p = 0.046). Approximately half of the patients had significant CAS, and half of these underwent revascularization. Most patients with CAS did not have symptoms of myocardial ischemia. The data justify screening diabetic nephropathy transplant candidates with coronary angiography before transplantation.Predictive value of thallium-201-dipyridamole myocardial stress scintigraphy in chronic hemodialysis patients and transplant recipients.The prognostic impact of thallium(Tl)-201-dipyridamole (DPM) stress and redistribution scintigraphy done in 36 patients on chronic hemodialysis (HD) and in 23 renal transplant recipients (TRs) was evaluated according to cardiovascular complications and survival in a follow-up period of six years. Though symptomatic ischemic heart disease (IHD) was present in 33% of HD patients and in 17% of TRs, 50% and 39%, respectively, had Tl-201 findings indicative of IHD. The duration of HD treatment was similar for patients with an abnormal or normal scintigraphic finding. Abnormal Tl-201 results were seen more frequently in older patients. During follow-up, 27 of 36 HD-patients died, 16 had an abnormal and 11 a normal Tl-201-DPM finding; cardiovascular complications were the cause of death in 88% and 18% of these patients, respectively. Thus the incidence of death from fatal cardiac events was 12% per year at risk for the former and 1.9% per year at risk for the latter. In TRs survival was not different for patients with an abnormal or normal Tl-201 finding (56% vs. 64%). However, fatal or nonfatal cardiovascular events were seen more frequently in patients with an abnormal Tl-201 results (78% versus 7%; p less than 0.0001). Stepwise logistic analysis and survival analysis demonstrated Tl-201-DPM stress/redistribution scintigraphy to be the only predictor for identifying patients at increased risk for cardiovascular events. In patients with abnormal Tl-201-DPM scintigraphy subsequent survival was extended for symptomatic patients as compared to asymptomatic ones )30.3 +/- 21.6 versus 22.0 +/- 17.3 months; p less than 0.008).Value of 99mTc-methoxyisobutylisonitrile (99mTc-MIBI) gated SPECT for the detection of silent myocardial ischemia in hemodialysis patients: clinical variables associated with abnormal test results.Although coronary artery disease is a major cause of mortality and morbidity in patients undergoing hemodialysis, there is no accurate diagnostic strategy for these patients.To assess the value of 99mTc-methoxyisobutylisonitrile (99mTc-MIBI) gated single-photon emission computed tomography for the detection of silent myocardial ischemia in patients undergoing hemodialysis and to evaluate the clinical variables associated with abnormal test results.Thirty-one asymptomatic patients undergoing hemodialysis (20 men, 11 women), with a mean age of 45 years (range, 25-75 years), were included in the study. Serum electrolytes, creatinine, homocysteine and adhesion molecules were measured prior to dialysis. Ambulatory blood pressure, carotid intima-media thickness measurements, echocardiography and stress 99mTc-MIBI imaging were performed in all patients, whereas coronary angiography was performed only in patients with abnormal myocardial perfusion scintigraphy and/or echocardiography.Gated myocardial perfusion scintigraphy results were abnormal in nine patients (29%) and coronary angiography was abnormal in six patients. After a median follow-up of 20 months (range, 14-28 months), nine patients experienced a cardiac event. Seven of the nine patients (78%) with abnormal myocardial perfusion scintigraphy suffered a cardiac event, compared with only two of 22 patients (9%) with normal myocardial perfusion scintigraphy (P<0.0001). Patients with abnormal perfusion scintigraphy had higher serum C-reactive protein, homocysteine and adhesion molecule levels and the duration of hemodialysis was significantly longer.In asymptomatic hemodialysis patients, gated myocardial perfusion scintigraphy is a safe and non-invasive screening technique for the detection of coronary artery disease and for predicting future cardiac events. The presence of ischemia correlates significantly with markers of inflammation. The discordant results (abnormal myocardial perfusion scintigraphy/normal coronary angiography) can be attributed to angiographically unrecognized occult atherosclerotic changes and abnormal vasodilatation capacity of the coronary circulation.Coronary artery disease in 100 diabetics with end-stage renal failure.Pretransplant cardiac investigations in the Irish renal transplant population--the effectiveness of our current screening techniques in predicting cardiac events.Coronary artery disease (CAD) is prevalent among endstage renal failure patients and remains the major cause of mortality following renal transplantation. Death with a functioning transplant institute remains the most common cause of kidney graft failure. In this study we attempt to evaluate the effectiveness of the clinical history and current screening techniques available in predicting posttransplant CAD and also assess the role of coronary angiography as a pretransplant screening technique.Clinical data of 190 renal transplant patients was analyzed. Any clinical history of cardiac disease and all preoperative cardiac screening data was recorded for each patient. The study endpoints were the subsequent development of myocardial infarction (MI), undergoing coronary artery bypass graft (CABG) or death.Factors that were significantly associated with reaching a study endpoint included: age at transplant [Hazard Ratio (HR) 1.91, P<0.001], history of heart failure (HR 8.22, P<0.001), presence of CAD on coronary angiography (HR 5.55, P=0.033), anterior Q wave on electrocardiograph (ECG) (HR 8.6, P<0.001), carotid artery disease (HR 3.74, P=0.030) and history of a cerebrovascular accident (HR of 4.32, P=0.008). The screening techniques of exercise stress testing and echocardiography were not conclusive as predictive variables of outcome.Clinical history and ECG results are good, practical and low-cost screening methods. In our study exercise stress testing and echocardiography were found to be of limited value. Coronary angiography is appropriate in certain high-risk groups but not necessary as part of screening in all potential renal transplant recipients.Diagnostic accuracy and prognostic value of combined dipyridamole-exercise thallium imaging in hemodialysis patients.Non-invasive detection of coronary artery disease in dialysis patients, a major cause of mortality, often remains difficult. The aim of the study was to test the diagnostic and prognostic accuracies of combined dipyridamole-exercise thallium imaging in dialysis patients.Dipyridamole-exercise thallium imaging and coronary angiography were both performed prospectively in 60 asymptomatic hemodialysis patients who were followed up, long term, by recording any major coronary event.Coronary angiography was abnormal in 13 patients (21%), and there was abnormal thallium uptake in 17 patients. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and overall accuracy of thallium to detect a coronary artery disease were 92, 89, 71, 98 and 90%, respectively. After a median follow-up of 2.8 years, 12 patients experienced at least one major coronary event (4 cardiac deaths, 5 myocardial infarctions and 3 revascularizations). Eight of the 17 patients with abnormal thallium uptake (47%) suffered a coronary event, compared to only 4 of the 43 patients (9%) with a normal thallium uptake (P < 0.001). The positive prognostic predictive value of thallium imaging was 47% and its negative predictive value was 91%. The probability of survival free of coronary events was significantly higher in patients with normal thallium uptake than in those with abnormal thallium uptake (crude risk ratio 7.6; P < 0.001) even after adjustment for several risk factors for cardiovascular disease (adjusted risk ratio 9.2; P < 0.005).In dialysis patients, combined dipyridamole-exercise thallium imaging is an accurate method for detecting coronary stenosis and for predicting future coronary events.Noninvasive assessment of cardiac risk in insulin-dependent diabetic patients being evaluated for pancreatic transplantation using thallium-201 myocardial perfusion scintigraphy.We examined the value of thallium-201 myocardial perfusion scintigraphy in noninvasive assessment of cardiac risk in 36 insulin-dependent (type 1) diabetic patients being evaluated for pancreas or combined pancreas/kidney transplantation. An extensive cardiovascular evaluation including electrocardiogram was performed in all patients, and most patients were also evaluated by two-dimensional and Doppler echocardiography. Exercise thallium studies were performed in 31 patients. Five patients were unable to exercise and underwent dipyridamole-thallium study. The thallium images were abnormal in 12 patients, 10 of whom underwent coronary arteriography. Significant coronary artery disease was found in 7 of these patients. Nineteen patients underwent pancreatic (3 patients) or pancreato-renal (16) transplantation without any occurrence of cardiac death or nonfatal myocardial infarction peri-operatively or on follow-up ranging from 7 months to 21 months. In contrast, 3 cardiac events occurred in 12 patients not approved for transplantation, each of whom had an abnormal thallium study exhibiting significant ischemia. Resting left ventricular global and regional function was not helpful in determining perioperative risk. Thus, thallium-201 myocardial perfusion scintigraphy may be useful in identifying diabetic patients at low risk for pancreas transplantation and may obviate the need for routine coronary angiography in these patients.Evaluation of cardiovascular risk for renal transplantation in diabetic patients.Cardiovascular disease contributes in a major way to morbidity and mortality in diabetic patients with end-stage renal disease. Sixty patients with type I diabetes were evaluated prior to renal transplantation to determine the risk of cardiovascular complications. On the basis of results of thallium stress testing and/or cardiac catheterization, each patient was assigned to one of five categories. There were no cardiovascular events in the seven patients who had negative results on stress testing. Of the remaining 53 patients, all of whom underwent cardiac catheterization, 30 had normal coronary arteries. None of these 30 patients had any cardiac morbidity, and the two deaths that occurred in this group were not attributable to cardiac causes. Significant coronary artery disease was present in 38 percent of the patients. The overall mortality rate was 5.4 percent in those patients without coronary artery disease and 43.5 percent in those with the disease. In addition, the mortality rate in patients with coronary disease classified as severe was 62 percent, whereas it was 20 percent in those categorized as having moderate disease. The data indicate that patients with diabetes and end-stage renal disease who are at highest risk for cardiovascular events can be identified, and these patients probably should not undergo renal transplantation.Risk stratification of patients with chronic kidney disease: results of screening strategies incorporating clinical risk scoring and dobutamine stress echocardiography.Cardiac disease is the principal cause of death in patients with chronic kidney disease (CKD). Ischemia at dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE) is associated with adverse events in these patients. We sought the efficacy of combining clinical risk evaluation with DSE.We allocated 244 patients with CKD (mean age 54 years, 140 men, 169 dialysis-dependent at baseline) into low- and high-risk groups based on two disease-specific scores and the Framingham risk model. All underwent DSE and were further stratified according to DSE results. Patients were followed over 20 +/- 14 months for events (death, myocardial infarction, acute coronary syndrome).There were 49 deaths and 32 cardiac events. Using the different clinical scores, allocation of high risk varied from 34% to 79% of patients, and 39% to 50% of high-risk patients had an abnormal DSE. In the high-risk groups, depending on the clinical score chosen, 25% to 44% with an abnormal DSE had a cardiac event, compared with 8% to 22% with a normal DSE. Cardiac events occurred in 2.0%, 3.1%, and 9.7% of the low-risk patients, using the two disease-specific and Framingham scores, respectively, and DSE results did not add to risk evaluation in this subgroup. Independent DSE predictors of cardiac events were a lower resting diastolic blood pressure, angina during the test, and the combination of ischemia with resting left ventricular dysfunction.In CKD patients, high-risk findings by DSE can predict outcome. A stepwise strategy of combining clinical risk scores with DSE for CAD screening in CKD reduces the number of tests required and identifies a high-risk subgroup among whom DSE results more effectively stratify high and low risk.Echocardiography-based score to predict outcome after renal transplantation.Given the high cardiac mortality of renal transplant recipients, identification of high-risk patients is important to offer appropriate treatment before transplantation.To determine patients with high mortality after renal transplantation despite selection according to current criteria.Preoperative parameters were collected from 203 renal transplant recipients over a follow-up time of 3.6 (1.9) years. The primary end point was all-cause mortality.22 deaths (11%) and 12 cardiac failures (6%) were observed. Non-survivors were older (p< or =0.001), had larger left ventricular end-systolic diameter (LVSD) (p< or =0.001) and end-diastolic diameter (p = 0.002), and lower ejection fraction (p< or =0.001). Left ventricular mass index (p = 0.001), maximal wall thickness (p = 0.006) and the proportion with mitral annular calcification (p = 0.001) were significantly higher in the non-survivors. The risk factors for ischaemic heart disease and exercise test data were not significantly different between the two groups. Four independent predictors of mortality after renal transplantation were identified: age > or =50 years (p = 0.002), LVESD > or =3.5 cm (p = 0.002), maximal wall thickness > or =1.4 cm (p = 0.014) and mitral annular calcification (p = 0.036). The 5-year survival estimates for 0, 1, 2 and 3 prognostic factors were 96%, 86%, 69% and 38%, respectively. No patient had four prognostic factors. In patients > or =50 years, the 5-year survival estimates for 0, 1 and 2 additional prognostic factors were 73%, 45% and 18%, respectively.In addition to selection according to current guidelines, age and three conventional echocardiography parameters may further improve risk stratification before renal transplantation.Coronary computed tomography angiography in dialysis patients undergoing pre-renal transplantation cardiac risk stratification.This study addresses the safety, feasibility, and interpretability of coronary computed tomography angiography (CCTA) in excluding significant coronary artery disease in end-stage renal disease patients on dialysis undergoing pre-renal transplant cardiac risk evaluation.Twenty nine patients (55.5 +/- 10.2 years) undergoing cardiac risk assessment prior to renal transplantation, underwent research CCTA with calcium scoring and formed the study group. All CCTAs were performed using retrospective acquisition, with beta-blockade provided one hour prior to scanning.No major complications occurred in this group up to 30 days after CCTA. Of the total of 374 segments interpreted by both readers, only 36 (10%) were uninterpretable by both readers. Of these, 31 (86%) were from distal segments or branches. On a segmental level, there was 95% concordance between both readers for < 50% stenosis detection. Only three out of 28 (11%) CCTAs were deemed uninterpretable. Ten patients (36%) had zero calcium score, despite being on dialysis with no evidence of obstructive coronary artery disease by CCTA.CCTA is feasible and safe in end-stage renal disease dialysis patients with the advent of 64-slice CCTA. Despite significant calcium burden, there was excellent inter-observer agreement at segment level for the left main and all three proximal-mid coronary arteries in excluding obstructive coronary artery disease (> 50% stenosis).Assessment of coronary artery disease by thallium scan in type-1 diabetic uremic patients awaiting combined pancreas and renal transplantation.Twenty-five type-1 diabetic uremic patients (14 men, 11 women, mean age forty +/- eleven years, range, nineteen to sixty) were prospectively analyzed for coronary artery disease (CAD) by thallium scan (TLS) before synchronus pancreas and kidney transplantation. Duration of diabetes ranged from ten to thirty-two years (mean twenty-two +/- five). Fifteen patients (60%) were in dialysis from two to sixty months (mean twenty +/- eighteen). Advanced diabetic degenerative complications were present in all patients. Twenty exercise and five pharmacologic thallium scans were performed. Forty-four percent of patients (6 men, 5 women, mean age forty-two +/- eleven years, range, twenty-six to sixty) had a positive (reversible or permanent defects) TLS. In 2/11 cases, severe CAD required further cardiac investigations for therapeutic management decision. A statistical correlation with resting ECG nonspecific ST-segment and T-wave abnormalities was observed (p less than 0.05) despite the absence of angor in 8 of the 11 patients. On the contrary, no statistical correlations were found regarding high blood pressure, smoking, hypercholesterolemia, duration of diabetes, and duration of dialysis. In this particular diabetic population (young age, male/female ratio = 1.2) with high incidence of silent ischemia, resting ECG repolarization abnormalities, though predictive, were not specific or prognostic of CAD severity; in these cases, exercise and pharmacologic TLS, a noninvasive and sensitive cardiovascular test, may be of great interest in diagnosis of CAD, allowing adequate cardiac management before, during, and after pancreas transplantation.Preoperative evaluation for diabetic renal transplantation: impact of clinical, laboratory, and echocardiographic parameters on patient and allograft survival.To assess the impact on renal transplant patients and graft survival of clinical, laboratory, and echocardiographic parameters commonly measured prior to surgery.Forty-seven consecutive diabetics with preoperative echocardiograms at the time of transplantation.Clinical history, standard chest roentgenogram, electrocardiogram, blood tests, echocardiograms, and HLA testing at baseline; follow-up from 2 to 7 years with periodic reassessment of graft function.Patient survival did not appear to be influenced by age, sex, or type of allograft. A history of either myocardial infarction, congestive heart failure, or angina was present in 15 patients with 3-year survival of 50% (72% if not present, p less than 0.05). Histocompatibility testing did not impact on survival. Serum sodium, potassium, calcium, phosphate, and calcium-phosphate product did not discern different survival groups. A hematocrit greater than 30% was present in 15 patients with 3-year survival of 43% (73% if not present, p less than 0.05). Greater than 10% antibody sensitization of the recipient resulted in a 3-year survival of 38% in eight patients (68% if not present, p less than 0.05). Radiologic evidence of cardiomegaly or congestive heart failure and standard electrocardiographic evidence for left ventricular hypertrophy or strain did not impact on survival. Echocardiographic measurements of left ventricular end-diastolic diameter, posterior wall thickness, or ejection fraction were also not predictive. Increased end-systolic diameter (10 patients, 30% 3-year survival versus 69%, p less than 0.05) and decreased velocity of circumferential fiber shortening (11 patients, 45% 3-year survival versus 71%, p less than 0.05) both appeared to be related to survival. Increased accuracy of prediction could be obtained by adding risk factors so that a history of coronary artery disease and increased end-systolic diameter predicted 3-year survival of 42% versus 82% if neither was present. In terms of graft survival, no clinical, radiographic, or electrocardiographic result yielded predictive information. Among the laboratory tests, only highly antibody-sensitized patients (eight patients, 0% 3-year survival versus 66% 3-year survival, p less than 0.001) showed different survival patterns. Echocardiographic elevated end-systolic diameter predicted a significantly (p less than 0.001) decreased graft survival (3-year survival 33% versus 63%).Preoperative prediction of patient and graft survival in diabetic renal transplantation may be enhanced by echocardiographic assessment of systolic load and function. For patients with normal systolic function, whose hematocrit is below 30%, with preformed antibodies less than 10%, renal transplantation has an excellent prognosis; invasive cardiac procedures are not likely required. Since these risk factors are likely additive, a high-risk group may be identified. These latter patients should undergo coronary angiography.Technetium myocardial perfusion scanning in prerenal transplant evaluation in the United kingdom.Because death with a functioning graft remains one of the most important causes of long-term renal transplant failure, cardiac risk stratification and screening for coronary artery disease are essential components of pretransplant assessment. Pretransplant screening for occult coronary artery disease in a subset of these patients may improve outcome. The UK follows the European Best practice guideline 1.5.5 E. Although echocardiography, thallium myocardial perfusion scanning (MPS), dobutamine stress echocardiography, and coronary angiography have been suggested as means of cardiovascular assessment, the best means of assessment remains undetermined. Therefore, we investigated the role of 99m technetium sestamibi myocardial perfusion scanning as an assessment tool for identifying those patients with end-stage renal failure at high risk of cardiovascular death after renal transplantation. Retrospectively, we studied 126 patients that had a MPS as part of their pretransplant assessment. Overall unadjusted survival was 65% at 3 years. Twelve deaths resulted from cardiovascular causes. A reversible defect on MPS was associated with a fatal cardiac event and all-cause mortality. The unadjusted hazard ratio of cardiac event with reversible defect on MPS was 3.1 (95% confidence interval, 1.1 to 18.2) and hazard ratio of death with reversible defect on MPS was 1.92 (95% confidence interval, 1.1 to 4.4). Thus, MPS may be a useful tool in cardiac risk stratification and in selecting patients with a favorable outcome after renal transplantation. Our patients with a reversible defect in particular have increased cardiac mortality. This group may benefit from coronary angiography.Predictive value of thallium stress testing for coronary and cardiovascular events in uremic diabetic patients before renal transplantation.Coronary artery disease and the ability of noninvasive exercise perfusion imaging with thallium-201 to predict future coronary and cardiovascular events was prospectively evaluated in a group of 85 insulin-dependent diabetic renal transplantation candidates. Sixty patients received renal allografts (36 living related donors, 24 cadaver donors) after a thallium stress test; the actuarial 2 year patient survival rate after transplantation was 84 percent. Twenty-five patients remained on dialysis, and the 2 year actuarial survival rate from onset of dialysis was 41 percent, significantly lower than the actuarial survival rate of transplanted patients (p less than 0.01). Thirteen transplanted patients had positive thallium stress test results, and 6 (46 percent) had cardiovascular events (two fatal). In contrast, of 47 transplant patients with negative thallium stress test results, only 13 (28 percent) had cardiovascular events (four fatal). Five patients treated by hemodialysis only had positive test results and three (60 percent) had cardiovascular events (two fatal), whereas of 20 hemodialysis patients with negative test results, 9 (45 percent) suffered cardiovascular events (four fatal). In this study, cardiovascular events included arrhythmia, stroke, and pulmonary embolism. Within the total group, 4 of 18 patients (22 percent) with a positive test result (22 percent) had a fatal myocardial infarction, whereas only 3 of 67 patients (4 percent) with a negative result had a fatal myocardial infarction (p less than 0.05). In comparison, 24 of 85 patients had a history or electrocardiographic evidence of preexisting cardiovascular disease, and 13 (54 percent) had subsequent cardiovascular events (5 of 11 patients with positive test results and 8 of 13 patients with negative results). In summary, renal transplant candidates with positive thallium stress test results appear to be at increased risk compared with those with negative results for the development of fatal myocardial infarction, but thallium stress testing is no more predictive for future coronary and cardiovascular events than is a history or an abnormal electrocardiogram.[Prevalence of coronary artery disease in type I diabetic candidates for double transplantation (kidney and pancreas)].To assess the prevalence of coronary artery disease (CAD) in a population of type I diabetic, nephropathic patients in a dialysis program and candidates for double transplantation (kidney and pancreas).From January 2000 to July 2002, 58 type I diabetic patients underwent coronary cineangiography as part of an assessment protocol for double transplantation. Coronary artery disease was defined as any irregularity in the coronary arteries and was classified according to the degree of luminal stenosis as mild (< 30%), moderate (> or = 30 to 70%), and severe (> 70%).The mean age of the patients was 34 +/- 12 years, and 32 (55%) were men. No patient had a history of angina or acute myocardial infarction. The major risk factors for the disease were systemic arterial hypertension in 93% of the patients, dyslipidemia in 38%, familial history in 25%, and smoking in 20%. The mean duration of diabetes was 20.8 +/- 9 years, and the duration of dialysis was 26 +/- 9 months. Coronary angiography revealed coronary artery disease in 42 (72%) patients, which was mild in 20 (34%) patients, moderate in 9 (16%), and severe in 13 (22%).Patients with type I diabetes in a dialysis program and candidates for double transplantation had an elevated prevalence of coronary artery disease. It is worth noting that those patients had no symptoms of the disease.Cardiac evaluation for simultaneous pancreas-kidney transplantation and incidence of cardiac perioperative complications: preliminary study.Type I diabetes mellitus (IDDM) is associated with an increased cardiovascular risk, and eligibility protocols for simultaneous pancreas-kidney transplantation (SPKT) are consequently accurate for preoperative cardiovascular assessment. According to our algorithm, coronary angiography in SPKT candidates is indicated for patients not only experiencing previous cardiac events or symptoms, but also those with long-standing diabetes (more than 25 years) and/or age over 45 years. Furthermore, a basal transthoracic echocardiographic exam (TTE) is performed to assess cardiac volumes, left ventricular mass, systolic function, and kinesis. The aims of this study were to evaluate perioperative cardiac morbidity and mortality in 18 SPKT-eligible patients, divided into two groups on the basis of the presence/absence of angiographically evident coronary artery disease (CAD), as well as to assess the impact of left ventricular hypertrophy (LVH) on cardiac complications. Cardiac intraoperative morbidity and mortality and postoperative mortality and major morbidity were absent; minor cardiac morbidity consisted only of silent ischemic ECG alterations, without significant differences between groups, although the incidence seemed to be higher in the CAD-positive population. LVH detected preoperatively by TTE exam also failed to correlate with the incidence of such complications. Selection of SPKT candidates by coronary angiography may have positive effects on perioperative cardiac morbidity and mortality. A larger sample size is needed to give the study statistical power. Medium- and long-term follow-up studies are warranted to evaluate the effects of preoperative selection on survival rates.Pre-transplant cardiac testing for kidney-pancreas transplant candidates and association with cardiac outcomes.Coronary artery disease is a major cause of mortality following renal transplantation, especially in those patients with diabetes. The accurate prediction of cardiac risk is therefore a major focus of the pre-transplant evaluation. The objective of this study was to retrospectively evaluate the ability of non-invasive cardiac testing (standard echocardiography, stress echocardiography, exercise tolerance testing, and nuclear myocardial perfusion) performed within 1 yr of kidney-pancreas transplant to predict post-transplant myocardial infarction.Clinical history and pre-transplant cardiac testing performed within 1 yr prior to transplantation were reviewed in a non-blinded fashion for 165 kidney-pancreas transplantation patients receiving allografts between June 1990 and May 1998. The predictive values of clinical symptoms and cardiac testing for cardiac events (fatal and non-fatal myocardial infarctions) up to 1 yr post-transplant were calculated.Clinical history had a negative predictive value of 98% for cardiac events occurring within 1 yr following testing and 97% within 1 yr post-transplant. Collectively, non-invasive testing had a negative predictive value of 97% for 1 yr post-testing and 1 yr post-transplant.Clinical history alone is highly suggestive but not sufficient for the prediction of post-kidney-pancreas transplant myocardial infarction. Although a useful supplement, cardiac testing does not predict all cardiac events out to 1 yr post-testing. In this high-risk patient population with diabetes and renal failure, other methods of risk assessment are needed to more accurately predict long-term cardiac outcome for patients awaiting transplantation.Prognostic value of dipyridamole thallium-201 screening to minimize perioperative cardiac complications in diabetics undergoing kidney or kidney-pancreas transplantation.To minimize perioperative cardiac events, we utilize a screening protocol consisting of intravenous dipyridamole thallium-201 myocardial imaging (DPT), with the selective use of coronary angiography based on the presence of reversible defect(s) on DPT test. A retrospective study was performed to determine the prognostic value of this protocol and to identify any clinical parameters predictive of an abnormal DPT test. To accomplish this, a detailed chart analysis of 176 consecutive kidney (n = 89) and kidney-pancreas (n = 87) transplant recipients who had undergone pretransplant DPT testing was performed. The results of the DPT test were interpreted as normal in 111, fixed defect in 15, and reversible defect(s) in 50 patients. Forty-two of the 50 patients with reversible defect(s) underwent coronary angiography. Twelve of the 27 patients with significant coronary artery disease (CAD, > 50% stenosis in one or more coronary arteries) underwent pretransplant revascularization and the remaining 15 were treated medically. Cardiac events (documented acute myocardial infarction or sudden cardiac death) within 6 wk of transplant were stratified by the results of this protocol. Also, various clinical parameters were compared between patients with normal and abnormal (fixed and reversible defect) DPT tests. Only one of the 111 (0.9%) transplant recipients with a normal DPT test had a perioperative cardiac event. None of the 15 (0%) patients with a fixed defect and none of the 15 (0%) patients with reversible defect(s), but a nonsignificant (< 50% narrowing) coronary angiogram, had a perioperative cardiac event. Three of the 27 (11.1%) patients with reversible defect(s) and significant disease on coronary angiography, who had undergone pre-transplant revascularization or were managed medically, had a perioperative coronary event. Of 14 recipients parameters analyzed, age > 50 yr was the only variable predictive of an abnormal DPT test. We conclude that the incidence of perioperative cardiac events in patients with a normal or fixed defect, or reversible defect(s) but a nonsignificant (< 50% narrowing) coronary angiogram is very low, indicating the high correlation of these findings on DPT and an uneventful (cardiac) post-transplant course. The incidence of perioperative cardiac complications amongst the high-risk transplant recipients with reversible defect(s) and significant CAD on coronary angiogram may be minimized by appropriate preoperative medical management or revascularization. None of the clinical variables except age > 50 yr was predictive of an abnormal DPT test.Cardiac evaluation of candidates for kidney transplantation: value of exercise radionuclide angiocardiography.In view of the high incidence and mortality of coronary artery disease (CAD) in patients with kidney transplantation, a systematic cardiac evaluation was prospectively performed in 103 uraemic patients eligible for transplantation. After clinical examination, 28 patients with symptoms of CAD or diabetes mellitus were referred directly for coronary angiography, whereas the remaining 75 patients had rest and exercise radionuclide angiocardiography for evaluation of possible asymptomatic CAD. Among them, left ventricular ejection fraction was below 40% at rest or fell during exercise by at least 5 EF% in 12 patients; coronary angiography in nine showed CAD in four and hypertensive heart disease in five. In the remaining 63 (of 75) patients without severe resting left ventricular dysfunction or exercise ischaemia, the follow-up of 28 +/- 7 months revealed no clinical manifestation of CAD. Overall incidence of CAD in symptomatic and asymptomatic patients during a follow-up of 27 months after cardiac evaluation was 20 and 25% in nondiabetic and diabetic candidates for kidney transplantation, respectively (P = n.s.). Thus, clinical examination combined with exercise radionuclide angiocardiography in patients without signs or symptoms of heart disease had a high predictive accuracy for presence or absence of late manifestations of CAD. Exercise radionuclide angiocardiography is therefore a useful method for screening kidney transplantation candidates for asymptomatic CAD.Prognostic value of intravenous dipyridamole thallium imaging in patients with diabetes mellitus considered for renal transplantation.Patients with diabetes and end-stage renal failure are known to have a high risk for cardiac morbidity and mortality associated with renal transplantation. The most efficient method to determine preoperative cardiac risk has not been established. To determine the effectiveness of intravenous dipyridamole thallium imaging in predicting cardiac events, 40 diabetic renal transplant candidates were studied preoperatively in a prospective trial. The study group consisted of 40 patients whose average age was 42 years (range 27 to 64); 34 (85%) were hypertensive and 21 (53%) were cigarette smokers. Cardiac history included chest pain in 6 patients and prior myocardial infarction in 3 patients. Dipyridamole thallium imaging showed reversible defects in 9 patients, fixed defects in 8 patients and normal scans in 23 patients. Dipyridamole thallium imaging was performed using 0.56 mg/kg of dipyridamole infused intravenously over 4 minutes. Cardiac events occurred only in patients with reversible thallium defects, of which there were 6. Of these 6 patients, 3 had cardiac events before transplantation and 3 had them in the early postoperative phase (within 6 weeks of surgery). Of 21 patients who underwent renal transplantation, 3 had cardiac events within 6 weeks of transplantation. The average duration of follow-up was 11 months (range 1 to 21). Thus, dipyridamole thallium imaging is an effective method of identifying renal transplant candidates likely to develop cardiac complications. Routine coronary angiography may not be necessary to screen all renal transplant candidates for coronary artery disease before surgery.Renal transplant outcome in high-cardiovascular risk recipients.Cardiovascular (CV) disease is the foremost cause of mortality and an important cause of morbidity in renal transplant recipients. The disease burden is likely to increase as older patients are accepted for transplantation. The outcome of these high-CV risk patients after renal transplantation, especially with known pre-transplant coronary artery disease (CAD), has not been studied. Hence, we looked at the CV outcome in patients with known pre-transplant CAD.All renal transplants performed between 1998 and 2002 at our center, followed up to 2005, were divided into high- and low-risk groups, based on the presence of one or more of the following: pre-transplant angina, myocardial infarction, and positive coronary angiogram. The two groups were compared for post-transplant cardiac events and patient and graft survival. The factors predictive of post-transplant cardiac events were also determined by Cox-regression multivariate analysis.Forty-five patients (10.5%), out of 429, had post-transplant cardiac events; 31.3% in the high risk, and 6.5% in the low-risk group (p = 0.001). Five-yr patient survival was lower in the high-risk group (82.8% vs. 93.1%, p = 0.004), while five-yr overall graft survival and death censored graft survival were statistically not different (74.8% vs. 84.1%, p = 0.08 and 87.3% vs. 90%, p = 0.25). Forty-one percent of patients who were treated with angioplasty plus stenting or bypass graft prior to transplantation had post-transplant cardiac events, as compared with 28% of those without intervention in the high-risk group and 6.5% of patients in the low-risk group (p = 0.001). Age, pre-transplant cardiac disease, arrhythmias, and low-ejection fraction (< or = 40%) were significant independent predictors of post-transplant cardiac events.Post-transplant survival of high-CV risk patients (with known CAD) is lower than that of low-risk recipients but remains acceptable. Cardiac interventions may reduce perioperative risk but do not reduce the probability of post-transplant cardiac events to that of low-risk group.Electron-beam computerized tomography correlates with coronary angiogram in chronic kidney disease patients.Electron-beam computerized tomography (EBCT) is able to noninvasively quantify coronary artery calcification (CAC). Chronic kidney disease (CKD) patients frequently have CAC, and clinicians are puzzled regarding the clinical significance of this finding and the diagnostic accuracy of coronary EBCT in CKD. The aim of this study was to determine the correlation in CKD patients between CAC measured by EBCT and 50% stenosis determined by coronary angiography (CA), the gold standard to identify atherosclerotic lesions.We recruited 37 patients with CKD from a single institution and compared their coronary EBCT and CA results using standard statistical analysis.Patients with at least one vessel with > or = 50% stenosis by CA had higher mean CAC scores [2,407.9 +/- (SD) 3,165.3 vs. 227 +/- 443.4; p < 0.001] and higher median CAC scores (1,052 vs. 25.8; p < 0.001) as compared with those having no stenosis > or = 50%. The sensitivity was 85.7%, and the specificity 82.6% using 50% stenosis as the definition for coronary artery disease and using a CAC score of 400 as a cutoff value for the EBCT results. The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve was 0.84. The diagnostic accuracy (proportion of correct results) was 83.8%. The negative predictive value was 90.5%. The receiver operating characteristic curve suggests that the optimal cutoff value for CAC scores in our cohort is 315.9, increasing the area under the receiver operating characteristic curve to 0.91. The total coronary artery stenosis was significantly associated with the CAC score (p = 0.01).EBCT has a very good predictive value for obstructive coronary artery disease. EBCT could be used as a screening tool in CKD patients with a low-to-intermediate risk for coronary artery disease.[Prognostic value of dobutamine stress echocardiography in patients with terminal renal insufficiency undergoing hemodialysis--a 5-year follow up].Patients with end-stage renal failure have high morbidity and mortality rates due to cardiovascular complications. Screening for coronary heart disease in these patients is of utmost importance. The aim of this study was to investigate the prognostic value of the dobutamine test in patients on hemodyalisis during a 5-year follow-up period.During the pretransplantation period, 24 patients on chronic hemodialysis underwent echocardiography and dobutamine echocardiography. The average age of patients was 51.50 +/- 7.35 years. The mean duration of dialysis was 74 +/- 40 months.The dobutamine stress test was positive in 50% of patients, and undefined in 12.5%. The wall motion score index before the test was 1, and after the test it was 1.54 +/- 0.27. There were no serious complications. Left ventricular mass, diastolic and systolic dimension and posterior wall were significantly higher in patients with positive dobutamine stress results and they were associated with late cardiac morbidity and mortality. Five-year survival in patients with positive dobutamine stress results was 33.3% and 52.3% in patients with negative dobutamine results. Causes of mortality were as follows: cardiac 45.4%, cerebrovascular 18.1%, other causes 36.4%. Cardiogical complications were not the cause of death in any of the patients with negative dobutamine results. In dobutamine positive group 62.5% died from cardiological complications. During the 5-year period, cardiac death and manifest coronary disease occurred in 75% of patients with positive dobutamine stress results and only in one patient with negative dobutamine results. Sensitivity was 75%, specificity 89% and positive predictive value 90%.Dobutamine stress echocardiography has a good predictive value for future cardiac events in hemnodyalisis patients, and in screening for coronary disease.Noninvasive assessment of cardiac risk in type I diabetic patients being evaluated for combined pancreas-kidney transplantation using dipyridamole-MIBI perfusion tomographic scintigraphy.This study was performed to determine the value of dipyridamole-99m Tc-methoxy-isobutyl isonitrile perfusion (99mTC-MIBI) tomographic scintigraphy in the assessment of cardiac risk in patients being evaluated prior to combined pancreas-kidney transplantation (PKT). We performed perfusion tomographic scintigraphy using single photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) on 77 patients. The tomographic images did not show clinically relevant findings in 65 patients. In the remaining 12 patients, coronary arteriography was performed: 2 showed normal results, 4 showed no stenosis, and 6 showed significant stenosis ( > or = 70%). Seventy-two patients underwent PKT. During the follow-up (6-48 months), there were seven cardiac events, 4 patients with significant stenosis, and 3 with nonsignificant stenosis upon coronary arteriography, and all had pathological tomographic images. 99mTc-MIBI tomographic scintigraphy may be useful in identifying patients at low risk of incurring cardiac events after PKT and may, in a large group of patients, obviate the need for routine coronary angiography.Assessment of coronary artery disease in hemodialysis patients with delayed systolic blood pressure response after exercise testing.We evaluated usefulness of the postexercise systolic blood pressure (SBP) response for detecting coronary artery disease (CAD) in hemodialysis patients.A treadmill exercise testing was done, and the SBP response was measured in 44 hemodialysis patients (30 men, 14 women; age 41 to 81 years). The postexercise SBP response was defined as the ratio of SBP after 3 minutes of recovery to SBP at peak exercise.The SBP ratio of the 25 subjects with coronary artery stenosis (1.01+/- 0.13) was significantly greater (p<0.01) than 19 subjects without coronary artery stenosis (0.83+/- 0.10). An SBP ratio greater than 0.92 identified CAD with higher sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy than did the conventional ST-segment depression criterion (76 vs. 56%, 90 vs. 53%, and 82 vs. 55%, respectively).Determination of the SBP ratio is a clinically useful, noninvasive method for accurately detecting CAD in hemodialysis patients.Prognostic value of inducible myocardial ischemia in predicting cardiovascular events after renal transplantation.The aims of the present study were to determine the prevalence of inducible myocardial ischemia (IMI) in renal transplant recipients (RTR) more than 50 years old, to identify predictors of IMI, and to search for its prognostic value.Among the 377 renal transplantations performed between 1989 and 1998 in a single institution, 120 were done in patients > or =50 years old, and 97 were recruited for the study. During the last quarter of 1998, all of them underwent an exercise test (EST), an exercise-thallium 201 single photon emission computed tomography coupled with dipyridamole (SPECT), and 81% of them had a dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE). Patients with IMI subsequently underwent coronary angiography to detect coronary stenosis.IMI was present in 12 of the 97 patients (10%). The diagnosis was evidenced by EST in four cases, by SPECT in 11 cases, and DSE in three cases. Five of these 12 patients (42%) had significant coronary artery stenosis (> or =50%). Multivariate analysis of several pre- and post-transplant variables evidenced acute rejection and left ventricular hypertrophy as significant correlates of IMI (both P < 0.03). Patients were prospectively followed-up for 48 months for the occurrence of major cardiovascular events. Kaplan-Meier analysis revealed a significant increase in cardiovascular events in the IMI group (P < 0.0001). In addition, the Cox proportional hazards model revealed that IMI and diabetes mellitus had an independent significant effect on the occurrence of major cardiovascular events.IMI was present in 10% of RTR aged > or =50 years, and was predicted by acute rejection and left ventricular hypertrophy. IMI had a strong effect on major cardiovascular events in this population.Incidence of coronary heart disease and cardiac events in patients undergoing kidney and pancreatic transplantation.One major cause of graft loss after kidney transplantation or simultaneous kidney and pancreas transplantation is death of the recipient due to cardiac events. Records of 261 patients who underwent sole kidney (group A) or combined kidney-pancreas transplantation (group B) were retrospectively analyzed. Patients were divided into groups with basic cardiac evaluation (chest X-ray, electrocardiogram) and patients with additional diagnostics [echocardiography, exercise stress test, myocardial perfusion test, and coronary angiography (CAG)]. The results of the performed CAGs were as follows: proven coronary artery disease (CAD) in 22 patients (12.43%) in group A and 37 patients (44.05%) in group B; stenosis of one main coronary artery of 70% or greater in 8.47% (group A) and 16.67% (group B) of the patients. Subsequent revascularization procedures were performed in 15 candidates (8.47%) of group A and 11 (13.10%) of group B. The incidence of posttransplant cardiac events (PCE) was lower in recipients in both groups who underwent additional cardiac evaluation. Late postoperative deaths were reported in 3.45% of kidney recipients with no additional evaluation (group A), in 2.06% of patients with further diagnostics (group A), and in only 1.19% of patients with invasive pretransplant evaluation (group B). Patients with known CAD and no further invasive diagnostics or subsequent revascularization are at great risk. PCE were observed in three of seven patients in this subgroup. Careful cardiac evaluation including echocardiography, exercise stress test, myocardial perfusion test, and CAG is associated with a low incidence of PCE.Validation of a screening protocol for identifying low-risk candidates with type 1 diabetes mellitus for kidney with or without pancreas transplantation.Certain clinical risk factors are associated with significant coronary artery disease in kidney transplant candidates with diabetes mellitus. We sought to validate the use of a clinical algorithm in predicting post-transplantation mortality in patients with type 1 diabetes. We also examined the prevalence of significant coronary lesions in high-risk transplant candidates.All patients with type 1 diabetes evaluated between 1991 and 2001 for kidney with/without pancreas transplantation were classified as high-risk based on the presence of any of the following risk factors: age >or=45 yr, smoking history >or=5 pack years, diabetes duration >or=25 yr or any ST-T segment abnormalities on electrocardiogram. Remaining patients were considered low risk. All high-risk candidates were advised to undergo coronary angiography. The primary outcome of interest was all-cause mortality post-transplantation.Eighty-four high-risk and 42 low-risk patients were identified. Significant coronary artery stenosis was detected in 31 high-risk candidates. Mean arterial pressure was a significant predictor of coronary stenosis (odds ratio 1.68; 95% confidence interval 1.14-2.46), adjusted for age, sex and duration of diabetes. In 75 candidates who underwent transplantation with median follow-up of 47 months, the use of clinical risk factors predicted all eight deaths. No deaths occurred in low-risk patients. A significant mortality difference was noted between the two risk groups (p = 0.03).This clinical algorithm can identify patients with type 1 diabetes at risk for mortality after kidney with/without pancreas transplant. Patients without clinical risk factors can safely undergo transplantation without further cardiac evaluation.Thallium stress testing does not predict cardiovascular risk in diabetic patients with end-stage renal disease undergoing cadaveric renal transplantation.This study assessed the usefulness of thallium stress testing as a predictor of perioperative cardiovascular risk in diabetic patients with end-stage renal disease undergoing cadaveric renal transplantation. Demographic factors influencing the exercise performance in these patients were also examined.The medical records of 189 consecutive patients with diabetic nephropathy who were evaluated for cadaveric renal transplantation were reviewed. Thallium stress testing was the initial examination of cardiovascular status in 141 patients. An adequate examination was one in which at least 70% of maximum heart rate was achieved. A thallium stress test was normal if there were no ST segment depressions on the electrocardiogram and no perfusion abnormalities on the thallium scan. Forty-four patients underwent cardiac catheterization as the initial evaluation (Group C) and four patients underwent transplantation without a formal cardiovascular evaluation (Group D).Sixty-four of the 141 patients undergoing thallium stress testing had an adequate and normal examination (Group A). The incidence of perioperative cardiac events in this group was 2%. Seventy-seven patients (Group B) had an abnormal (n = 41) or an inadequate (n = 36) thallium stress test and most (n = 61) then underwent coronary angiography. The use of beta-blockers was the only predictor of an abnormal or inadequate thallium stress test (10 of 64 versus 27 of 77, chi 2 = 6.66, p less than or equal to 0.025). Forty-three percent (26 of 61 in Group B) of patients with inadequate or abnormal thallium stress tests had significant coronary artery disease on cardiac catheterization. The perioperative risk of cardiac events was not different in Group A versus Groups B, C, and D combined. Survival of Group A and B patients was not different but was significantly longer than that of Group C patients (p less than 0.001). Thallium stress testing was less expensive than cardiac catheterization ($1,000 versus $4,000 to $5,000).Thallium stress testing allowed 45% of patients to avoid cardiac catheterization before renal transplantation. Discontinuing beta-blockers before thallium stress tests may improve exercise performance. The risk of perioperative cardiac events after transplantation was low and not different among patient groups. The relatively low predictive value of thallium stress testing for significant coronary artery disease and perioperative cardiac events in diabetic patients with end-stage renal disease suggests the need for the development of a more cost-effective, noninvasive screening test for this patient population.Relationship between elevated serum troponin values in end-stage renal disease patients and abnormal isotopic cardiac scans following stress.One hundred asymptomatic high-risk renal transplant candidates were screened for asymptomatic coronary artery disease using stress cardiac isotopic imaging. The cardiac markers, serum cTnT, cTnI, and CKMB, were collected pre and post stress testing. Of the 99 patients whose cardiac scans were technically satisfactory, 32 were normal, 49 had a definite imaging abnormality and the scan was indeterminate in the remaining 18 patients. Based on these results, patients were stratified into either normal, indeterminate or abnormal scan groups. They then were analyzed to detect any correlations between cardiac perfusion defects and either elevated pre-stress cardiac markers or consistent changes 24h after stress testing. While the mean pre-stress serum values for both cardiac troponin T (0.117 +/- 0.12 microgram/L) and cardiac troponin I (0.235 +/- 0.89 microgram/L) were increased in the abnormal cardiac scan group, only the cTnT value proved to differ significantly from the normal group (p < 0.01). For the indeterminate group neither marker was different from the normal scan group. Only an elevated serum cTnT > 0.1 microgram/L (OR 3.042, p = 0.030) proved to discriminate an abnormal scan in this population. It is concluded that the increase in pre-stress serum cTnT encountered in patients with chronic renal failure, with or without evidence of overt, symptomatic coronary artery disease, may represent a combination of subclinical myocardial damage and a prolonged half-life of the marker in the serum. Because of the frequency of elevated serum concentrations of cTnT and, to a lesser degree cTnI, the physician should exercise caution when interpreting a single elevated Troponin value during the evaluation of chest pain in patients with end-stage renal disease. A cTnT > 0.1 microgram/L increases the likelihood of finding significant coronary artery disease three fold in high-risk ESRD patients being evaluated for renal transplantation.Prognostic value of myocardial perfusion imaging in predicting outcome after renal transplantation.Cardiovascular disease is a significant cause of morbidity and mortality after renal transplantation. Pretransplant screening in a subset of these patients for occult coronary artery disease (CAD) may improve outcome. The objective of this study was to examine the outcome of 600 patients after renal transplantation for end-stage renal disease. Prospective outcome data were collected on 600 consecutive patients who had renal transplantation between 1996 and 1998 at our institution at 42 +/- 12 months after surgery. Stress single-photon emission computed tomographic (SPECT) myocardial perfusion imaging was performed in 174 patients before surgery, 136 (78%) of whom had diabetes mellitus. There were a total of 59 events: 17 cardiac deaths, 14 nonfatal myocardial infarctions, and 28 noncardiac deaths. There were 12 cardiac events and 11 noncardiac deaths among those who had SPECT myocardial perfusion imaging. In a multivariate analysis that included important risk factors, age (p = 0.03 and 0.003, respectively) and diabetes (p = 0.02 and 0.005, respectively) were the predictors of total events and cardiac events in patients who did not undergo stress SPECT perfusion imaging. In the subgroup who had stress perfusion imaging, an abnormal perfusion SPECT study was the only predictor of cardiac events (p = 0.006). The 42-month cardiac event-free survival rate was 97% in patients with normal SPECT images and 85% in patients with abnormal SPECT images (RR 5.04, 95% confidence interval 1.4 to 17.6, p = 0.006). Thus, there is a 2.8% event rate per year after renal transplantation, and approximately 50% of these events are noncardiac. In high-risk patients (most of whom had diabetes) with preoperative stress perfusion imaging, those with normal images had significantly lower cardiac events than those with abnormal images. These results have important implications in patient screening and postoperative management.Predicting cardiac events with Tl201 dipyridamole myocardial scintigraphy in renal transplant recipients.Renal transplant recipients should be screened for coronary artery disease. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the usefulness of thallium-201 dipyridamole myocardial perfusion single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) to predict major cardiac events in these patients.Eighty-two consecutive patients (61 males) in hemodialysis (HD) treatment, awaiting renal transplantation, underwent dipyridamole Tl-201 SPECT for pretransplant risk stratification. SPECT semiquantitative analysis showed a normal perfusion pattern in 52 patients (group A) and fixed defects in 9 (group B). Reversible perfusion defects were found in 21 (group C). Cardiac death, myocadial infarction, and unstable angina were sought as cardiac events. During a follow-up lasting 28.3 +/- 21.6 months, three patients of group A died for a non-cardiac cause. In group C, six patients (28.6%) had a cadiac event: one had a non-q wave myocardial infarction after renal transplantation; five were admitted with unstable angina. No cardiac events were observed in groups A and B (p = 0.0001). SPECT semiquantitative analysis showed that a summed difference score > or = 3 significantly increased the risk of cardiac events (odds ratio 4.5, C.I. 2.5-8.1).Cardiac events were only observed in HD patients with Tl-201 SPECT dipyridamole reversible defects (group C). A normal pattern or a fixed defect in Tl-201 dipyridamole SPECT in HD patients identified a good long-term prognosis.Atherosclerotic vascular complications in diabetic transplant candidates.Serious vascular complications limit the success of renal transplantation in diabetic patients. Nearly half of diabetic transplant recipients die within 3 years after transplantation from a vascular complication. However, it has been difficult to determine before transplantation which patients are likely to do poorly. Because atherosclerosis is a systemic disease, we hypothesized that diabetic transplant candidates with pretransplant coronary artery disease would be at high risk for vascular complications even if asymptomatic at the time of pretransplant evaluation. Our hypothesis was that insulin-dependent (IDDM) transplant candidates with coronary artery disease identified with pretransplant coronary angiography would have an increased number of vascular events (amputation, cerebral vascular accident [CVA], or myocardial infarction [MI]) within 3 years of follow-up. We prospectively studied 198 consecutive diabetic transplant candidates grouped on the basis of coronary artery disease. Group 1 patients had no stenosis that was 50% or greater, group 2 patients had one or more stenoses between 50% and 74%, and group 3 patients had one or more stenoses of 75% or greater. During median follow-up of 41 months, 64 patients experienced 98 amputations, 28 MIs, and seven CVAs. At 36 months of follow-up, 55% of group 3 patients, 30% of group 2 patients, and 11% of group 1 patients had experienced a vascular event (P < 0.001). Cox regression confirmed the association of coronary artery disease with subsequent vascular events. Patients with coronary artery disease had a sevenfold increased risk of amputation and a fourfold increased risk of myocardial infarction. Six of seven CVAs occurred in patients with coronary artery disease. We conclude that coronary artery disease identified at pretransplant evaluation is associated with an increased risk of noncoronary vascular complications within 3 years after evaluation.Non-invasive cardiac investigations in patients awaiting renal transplantation.Patients with chronic renal failure undergoing renal transplantation have a high prevalence of cardiovascular disease. Invasive investigation may identify those at risk of cardiac death during or after renal transplantation, but which patients should undergo cardiac catheterization is currently not clear. In 95 patients awaiting renal transplantation we assessed the ability of echocardiography and exercise electrocardiography to identify patients at risk of cardiac death. Echocardiography identified impaired left ventricular (LV) systolic function in 20%, severe in 8%. Of the patients with severe LV dysfunction, 25% died before transplantation. Of those undergoing exercise electrocardiography, 44% did not achieve 85% of maximum predicted heart rate. No coronary artery disease requiring intervention was identified by exercise testing. These findings indicate that echocardiography, but not exercise electrocardiography, should be part of the assessment for renal transplantation.Significance of coronary artery calcification score (CACS) for the detection of coronary artery disease (CAD) in chronic dialysis patients.Coronary artery disease (CAD) is a principal cause of death in patients with end-stage renal disease (ESRD). The coronary artery calcification score (CACS), determined by electron-beam computed tomography (EBCT), is useful for the detection of CAD in non-ESRD patients. There are few reports on the usefulness of EBCT for the detection of CAD, however, in ESRD patients. We examined the relation between CACS and CAD in ESRD patients.Coronary angiography (CAG) was used to diagnose CAD in patients with significant coronary artery stenosis (>or=50%). We examined 76 ESRD patients on chronic dialysis therapy from 1997 to 2005, of which 51 are men, 25 are women, mean (S.D.) age of 57.9 (12.1) years and mean (S.D.) HD duration of 7.7 (6.6) years. There were 50 (35 men, 15 women) patients with CAD and 26 (16 men, 10 women) without CAD.The median CACS was 1290 in all patients, 1689 in the CAD group and 527 in the non-CAD group; the mean (S.D.) CACS was 1833 (2003) in all patients, 2338 (2209) in the CAD group and 861 (991) in the non-CAD group. CACS was significantly higher in the CAD group than in the non-CAD group. The CACS cutoff values for predicting CAD were calculated at intervals of 100. At the cutoff values of >or=100, >or=500, >or=1000, >or=2000, and >or=3000, the sensitivity was 98%, 90%, 68%, 42%, and 32% and the specificity was 35%, 50%, 69%, 85%, and 96%, respectively.EBCT is not adequate for screening asymptomatic ESRD patients. Because EBCT is less invasive than CAG, further study is necessary to determine whether CAG should be performed in all high-risk ESRD patients on chronic dialysis.Asymptomatic coronary artery disease: angiographic assessment of diabetics evaluated for renal transplantation.Twenty-one insulin-dependent diabetics with azotemic nephropathy were evaluated for renal transplantation by selective coronary angiography and cine left ventriculography. All had hypertension, retinopathy, neuropathy, and required salt restriction plus diuretics for volume overload. There was no clinical or electrocardiographic evidence of ischemic coronary artery disease in twenty. Ten patients (five males, five females, mean age 29.3 years; mean duration of diabetes 21.9 years; mean serum cholesterol 239 mg%) had significant coronary artery disease, seven demonstrating focal abnormalities in left ventricular wall motion. Two patients (one male, one female; mean age 36.5 years; mean duration of diabetes 28.5 years; mean serum cholesterol 250 mg%) had no significant coronary artery disease, but demonstrated diffusely abnormal left ventricular wall motion with diminished ejection fraction. Thirty-eight percent had significant coronary artery disease unpredictable by electrocardiographic or clinical data. The finding of no significant coronary artery disease in 52% of a group with severe renal-hypertensive complications of diabetes is surprising. Two patients may have a demonstrated cardiomyopathy.Prognostic value of cardiovascular screening in potential renal transplant recipients: a single-center prospective observational study.We assessed the outcome of pretransplant cardiac assessment in a single center. Three hundred patients with end-stage renal disease underwent electrocardiogram, Bruce exercise testing (ETT) and ventricular assessment by cardiac MRI. Patients with high index of suspicion of coronary artery disease (CAD) underwent coronary angiography and percutaneous coronary intervention (PCI) if indicated. Two hundred and twenty-two patients were accepted onto the renal transplant waiting list; 80 patients were transplanted during the follow-up period and 60 died (7 following transplantation). Successful transplantation was associated with improved survival (mean survival 4.5 +/- 0.6 years vs. listed not transplanted 4.1 +/- 1.4 years vs. not listed 3.1 +/- 1.7 years; p < 0.001). Ninety-nine patients underwent coronary angiography; 65 had normal or low-grade CAD and 34 obstructive CAD. Seventeen patients (5.6%) were treated by PCI. There was no apparent survival difference between patients who underwent PCI or coronary artery bypass graft compared to those who underwent angiography without intervention or no angiography (p = 0.67). Factors associated with nonlisting for renal transplantation included burden of preexisting cardiovascular disease, poor exercise tolerance and severity of CAD. Pretransplant cardiovascular screening provides prognostic information and information that can be used to restrict access to transplantation. However, if the aim is to identify and treat CAD, the benefits are far from clear.Role of myocardial perfusion imaging in patients with end-stage renal disease undergoing coronary angiography.Patients with end-stage renal disease (ESRD) are at high risk of cardiovascular events. This study examined the prognostic power of stress myocardial perfusion imaging (MPI) in 150 patients with ESRD (mean age 53 +/- 9 years; 30% women; 66% with diabetes mellitus) being evaluated for renal transplantation with known coronary anatomy using angiography. Baseline data in addition to perfusion and angiographic parameters were compared between survivors and nonsurvivors. All-cause mortality was defined as the outcome measure. An abnormal MPI result was present in 85% of patients, 30% had left ventricular (LV) ejection fraction (EF) < or =40%, and 40% had multivessel coronary artery disease using angiography. At a mean follow-up of 3.4 +/- 1.5 years, 53 patients died (35%). LVEF < or =40%, LV dilatation (LV end-diastolic volume >90 ml), and diabetes mellitus were associated with higher mortality (all p <0.05). Both total perfusion defect size and mean number of narrowed coronary arteries using angiography were significantly higher in those who died (p <0.05). In a multivariate model, abnormal MPI results (low LVEF or abnormal perfusion) and diabetes alone were independent predictors of death, whereas number of narrowed arteries using coronary angiography was not. Thus, MPI was a strong predictor of all-cause mortality in patients with ESRD. In conclusion, abnormal MPI results independently predicted worse survival and provided more powerful prognostic data than coronary angiography.Clinical, resting echo and dipyridamole stress echocardiography findings for the screening of renal transplant candidates.Preoperative screening for coronary artery disease is recommended in high-risk renal transplant candidates. Aim of this study was to prospectively assess the value of a comprehensive risk stratification strategy including clinical, resting echo, and dipyridamole stress echo findings before renal transplantation.The study group consisted of 71 renal transplant candidates (47 men; age 54+/-11 years) fulfilling one or more of the following high-risk clinical criteria: history of coronary artery disease, wall motion abnormalities at resting echo, dialysis dependency lasting >5 years, presence of 2 or more risk factors. Clinical history, resting echo, and dipyridamole stress echo (up to 0.84 mg over 10 min + atropine up to 1 mg) were obtained in all subjects.Mean number of risk factors was 2.5+/-1.0. Known coronary artery disease and diabetes were present, respectively, in 2 (3%) and 11 (15%) persons. No patient had left ventricular ejection fraction <45%. Left ventricular hypertrophy was found in 53 (74%) cases. Stress echo showed 100% safety and 97% overall feasibility. Inducible ischemia (new wall motion abnormalities) was detected in 3 (4%) subjects. During follow-up (36+/-12 months), 8 (11%) cardiac events occurred: 2 deaths, 2 myocardial infarctions, 3 coronary interventions, and 1 pulmonary edema. The perioperative period and subsequent follow-up (22+/-12 months) was uneventful among 32 patients who received renal transplantation. Four-year event-free survival was 92% in those without ischemia; it was 96% in the non-diabetic population. Diabetes (HR=4.78), age (HR=1.14), and left ventricular mass index (HR=1.02) were independent prognostic indicators among clinical and resting echo variables. The global chi-square of the statistical model was 18.8; it increased to 27.3 (+45%) after the addition of stress echo result.Renal transplant candidates can undergo effective stratification of risk by combining clinical, resting echo and dipyridamole stress echo findings.Prevalence and determinants of coronary and aortic calcifications assessed by chest CT in renal transplant recipients.Coronary artery calcifications independently predict cardiovascular events (CVE) in the general population. We assessed the prevalence and determinants of coronary (CAC) and thoracic aorta (AoC) calcifications in renal transplant recipients (RTR).Consecutive RTR living in Belgium, with an isolated kidney graft functioning for more than 1 year, were asked to participate. They underwent a 16-slice spiral computerized tomography in order to measure calcium mass. Demographic, clinical, biochemical and urinary parameters were recorded.We included 281 patients. CAC and AoC were detected in 81 and 85%, with geometric means (SD) of 52.2 (4.9) and 99.3 (8.2) mg, respectively. By multiple linear regression, independent predictors of both types of calcifications included older age, longer time on dialysis, a history of CVE, of multiple transplantations and of smoking. Other determinants of CAC were male gender, current statin use and history of parathyroidectomy, and other determinants of AoC included higher pulse pressure, shorter time under mycophenolate mofetil and current use of anti-vitamin-K.The prevalence of both CAC and AoC is substantial in RTR. We delineate independent determinants either common to both CAC and AoC or specific to one, and known as classic or chronic kidney disease related risk factors.Combined dipyridamole-exercise stress echocardiography for detection of myocardial ischemia in hemodialysis patients: an alternative to stress nuclear imaging.Stress nuclear imaging is the noninvasive technique currently used to detect coronary artery disease (CAD) in dialysis patients. Stress echocardiography is recognized as an alternative to stress nuclear imaging for the general population. The aim of this study is to assess the diagnostic accuracy of stress echocardiography for detecting myocardial ischemia in hemodialysis patients.Stress echocardiography and stress technetium-99m-tetrofosmin (Myoview; Amersham International Plc) imaging were performed simultaneously for 66 asymptomatic hemodialysis patients in a single session, using a combination of high-dose dipyridamole and symptom-limited exercise. Coronary angiography was performed in 44 patients with at least one abnormal noninvasive test result or who were considered high-risk despite normal noninvasive test results.Results for stress echocardiography were abnormal in 15 patients (22%); stress Myoview, in 14 patients (21%); and coronary angiography, in 12 patients (18%). The sensitivity of stress echocardiography for detecting myocardial ischemia (defined as stress Myoview defect) was 86%; specificity, 94%; positive predictive value, 80%; negative predictive value, 96%; and overall accuracy, 92%. The sensitivity of stress echocardiography for detecting CAD (defined as abnormal coronary angiography result) was 83%; specificity, 84%; positive predictive value, 67%; negative predictive value, 93%; and overall accuracy, 84%. Stress echocardiography and stress Myoview did not differ significantly in overall accuracy for detecting CAD (84% versus 91%; P = not significant).In hemodialysis patients, combined dipyridamole-exercise echocardiography is an accurate method to detect both myocardial ischemia and CAD and represents an alternative to stress nuclear imaging.Myocardial scintigraphy using a fatty acid analogue detects coronary artery disease in hemodialysis patients.Coronary artery disease contributes significantly to mortality in end-stage renal disease (ESRD) patients. Single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) using an iodinated fatty acid analogue, iodine-123-methyl iodophenylpentadecanoic acid (123I-BMIPP), can assess fatty acid metabolism in the myocardium. We investigated the ability of 123I-BMIPP SPECT to detect coronary artery disease in hemodialysis patients compared with 201thallium chloride (201Tl) SPECT.We prospectively studied 130 ESRD patients undergoing hemodialysis for a mean of 88.6 months (male/female, 77/53; mean age, 63.8 years). Dual SPECT using 123I-BMIPP and 201Tl was performed, followed by coronary angiography. SPECT findings were graded in 17 segments on a five-point scale (0, normal uptake; 4, none) and assessed as a summed score.By coronary angiography, 71.5% of patients (93/130) had significant coronary stenosis (> or =75%), and five patients showed coronary spasm without coronary stenosis. When a BMIPP summed score of 6 or more was defined as abnormal, sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy for detecting coronary artery disease by BMIPP SPECT were 98.0%, 65.6%, and 90.0%, respectively; in contrast, these parameters for detecting coronary artery disease by Tl SPECT were 84.7%, 46.9%, and 75.0%, respectively, when a Tl summed score of 1 or more was defined as abnormal. In receiver operating characteristic analysis, the area under the curve was 0.895 in BMIPP and 0.727 in Tl SPECT, respectively.Resting BMIPP SPECT is superior to Tl SPECT for detecting coronary lesions, and provides safe screening for coronary artery disease among maintenance hemodialysis patients.High prevalence of occult coronary artery stenosis in patients with chronic kidney disease at the initiation of renal replacement therapy: an angiographic examination.The prevalence of coronary artery stenosis (CAS) at the initiation of renal replacement therapy (RRT) in patients with chronic kidney disease (CKD) and no previous history of angina and/or myocardial infarction (MI) has not been fully elucidated. The prevalence of significant CAS was evaluated in 30 asymptomatic stage 5 CKD patients without a history of angina and/or MI by coronary angiography at the initiation of RRT. The correlations of various parameters with the prevalence of CAS were also examined. Atherosclerotic surrogate markers, including intima-media thickness of carotid artery and ankle-brachial BP index (ABI), were also evaluated. Significant CAS (>50% stenosis) was seen in 16 (53.3%) of 30 asymptomatic CKD patients on coronary angiography at the start of RRT. Stress cardiac scintigraphy was not effective for detecting hidden cardiac ischemia among the CKD patients. Univariate analysis showed that diabetes (P = 0.01), left ventricular mass index (P = 0.04), hyperlipidemia (P = 0.04), total cholesterol (P = 0.02), LDL cholesterol (P < 0.01), intima-media thickness (P = 0.04), and fibrinogen (P = 0.01) were positively correlated with the presence of CAS, whereas ABI (P < 0.01) showed a negative correlation with CAS. Stepwise logistic regression analysis revealed that diabetes and fibrinogen were significant and independent risk factors for CAS in asymptomatic CKD patients who started RRT. The results clearly demonstrated that despite the absence of cardiac events, stage 5 CKD patients are already in a very high risk group for CAS at the initiation of RRT, which was also closely associated with a significant decrease in ABI.Coronary computed tomography angiography in dialysis patients undergoing pre-renal transplantation cardiac risk stratification.This study addresses the safety, feasibility, and interpretability of coronary computed tomography angiography (CCTA) in excluding significant coronary artery disease in end-stage renal disease patients on dialysis undergoing pre-renal transplant cardiac risk evaluation.Twenty nine patients (55.5 +/- 10.2 years) undergoing cardiac risk assessment prior to renal transplantation, underwent research CCTA with calcium scoring and formed the study group. All CCTAs were performed using retrospective acquisition, with beta-blockade provided one hour prior to scanning.No major complications occurred in this group up to 30 days after CCTA. Of the total of 374 segments interpreted by both readers, only 36 (10%) were uninterpretable by both readers. Of these, 31 (86%) were from distal segments or branches. On a segmental level, there was 95% concordance between both readers for < 50% stenosis detection. Only three out of 28 (11%) CCTAs were deemed uninterpretable. Ten patients (36%) had zero calcium score, despite being on dialysis with no evidence of obstructive coronary artery disease by CCTA.CCTA is feasible and safe in end-stage renal disease dialysis patients with the advent of 64-slice CCTA. Despite significant calcium burden, there was excellent inter-observer agreement at segment level for the left main and all three proximal-mid coronary arteries in excluding obstructive coronary artery disease (> 50% stenosis).A preoperative echocardiographic predictive model for assessment of cardiovascular outcome after renal transplantation.Major adverse cardiac events (MACE) frequently determine the outcome of renal transplantation (RT). Stress testing is advocated for preoperative risk assessment, but limited information is available on the prognostic value of these tests. We aimed to retrospectively assess the value of preoperative dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE) in predicting MACE in patients undergoing RT.A total of 185 patients (age 56 +/- 11 years, 64% were men, creatinine level of 7.3 +/- 2.9 mg/d, 27% were smokers, 86% had hypertension, 54% had diabetes, 57% were dyslipidemic) with end-stage renal disease (ESRD) underwent DSE before RT. A standard DSE protocol was used with the administration of 5-50 mug/kg/min incremental doses in 3-minute intervals and up to 1 mg of atropine if needed to reach prespecified end points.Regional left ventricular wall motion abnormality (WMA) at rest (fixed), with stress (inducible), or both were present in 54, 35, and 18 patients, respectively. In 38 patients who underwent coronary angiography, the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of inducible WMA for predicting angiographic coronary artery disease (> or = 70% luminal diameter reduction) were 88%, 62%, 65%, and 87%, respectively. Cox regression analysis identified the presence of combined fixed and inducible WMA (ie, resting WMA that did not change during DSE, accompanied by new WMA evident during DSE; hazard ratio [HR] 5.6, P = .012), left atrial enlargement (HR 4.2, P = .002), and aortic valve sclerosis (HR 3.9, P = .013) as independent predictors of 48-month MACE (cardiac death, nonfatal acute myocardial infarction, and coronary revascularization after RT). Patients with all 3 predictors had a 48-month MACE of 60% compared with 5% in those with none (P = .007). Compared with those without WMA, patients with both fixed and inducible WMA had a higher rate of MACE at 48 months (7% vs 33%, P = .004).In RT candidates, DSE can effectively identify those at low and high risk of MACE.Myocardial scintigraphy and clinical stratification as predictors of events in renal transplant candidates.We tested the hypothesis that the universal application of myocardial scanning with single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) would result in better risk stratification in renal transplant candidates (RTC) compared with SPECT being restricted to patients who, in addition to renal disease, had other clinical risk factors.RTCs (n=363) underwent SPECT and clinical risk stratification according to the American Society of Transplantation (AST) algorithm and were followed up until a major adverse cardiovascular event (MACE) or death.Of the 363 patients, 79 patients (22%) had an abnormal SPECT scan and 270 (74%) were classified as high risk. Both methods correctly identified patients with increased probability of MACE. However, clinical stratification performed better (sensitivity and negative predictive value 99% and 99% vs. 25% and 87%, respectively). High-risk patients with an abnormal SPECT scan had a modest increased risk of events (log-rank = 0.03; hazard ratio [HR] = 1.37; 95% confidence interval [95% CI], 1.02-1.82). Eighty-six patients underwent coronary angiography, and coronary artery disease (CAD) was found in 60%. High-risk patients with CAD had an increased incidence of events (log-rank = 0.008; HR=3.85; 95% CI, 1.46-13.22), but in those with an abnormal SPECT scan, the incidence of events was not influenced by CAD (log-rank = 0.23). Forty-six patients died. Clinical stratification, but not SPECT, correlated with the probability of death (log-rank = 0.02; HR=3.25; 95% CI, 1.31-10.82).SPECT should be restricted to high-risk patients. Moreover, in contrast to SPECT, the AST algorithm was also useful for predicting death by any cause in RTCs and for selecting patients for invasive coronary testing.Comparison of the prognostic value of dipyridamole and dobutamine myocardial perfusion scintigraphy in hemodialysis patients.Screening for coronary artery disease (CAD) in hemodialysis patients is hampered by contraindications and/or limitations of the available techniques in this population. Myocardial perfusion scintigraphy (MPS) using dipyridamole has been considered inaccurate due to abnormally high basal levels of adenosine in uremia that could blunt the vasodilatory response. Since dobutamine may be more reliable, we directly compared the two in patients on hemodialysis. We performed MPS at rest and after separate dipyridamole or dobutamine stress in 121 chronic hemodialysis patients. More numerous, larger, and more intense reversible lesions were induced with dobutamine than with dipyridamole, mainly in the anteroseptal segments. Reversibility with dipyridamole but not dobutamine MPS was independently and strongly related with mortality associated with CAD and with fatal and non-fatal CAD. We hypothesize that the chronotropic action of dobutamine induced alterations of wall motion, leading to spurious perfusion defects, not unlike artifacts seen with left bundle branch block. Our study shows that even though dobutamine induced more pronounced myocardial ischemia than dipyridamole in chronic hemodialysis patients, dipyridamole MPS more accurately identifies patients at high risk for subsequent cardiac death or non-fatal CAD than dobutamine.The diagnostic and prognostic value of tissue Doppler imaging during dobutamine stress echocardiography in end-stage renal disease.To determine whether a quantitative measurement of peak systolic velocity (PSV) during dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE) detects severe coronary artery disease (CAD) and predicts mortality in patients with end-stage renal disease.One hundred and forty renal transplant candidates had DSE and coronary angiography. DSE analysis was performed using conventional visual wall motion assessment, longitudinal PSV, and combining the two modalities. Failure of PSV to rise by more than 50% predicted an ischemic response. Significant CAD was defined as luminal stenosis greater than 70%.The number of positive DSE studies according to conventional, PSV, and combined criteria was 41 (30%), 42 (31%), and 46 (34%) respectively. Forty patients (29%) had significant CAD at angiography. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values for conventional DSE analysis were 84, 91, 86, and 90% respectively. The same values for PSV analysis were 86, 92, 86, and 91%, respectively. The same values for the combination of visual and PSV analysis were 88, 94, 87, and 92% respectively. The differences between the three methods were not statistically significant. Sensitivity for single-vessel CAD (P=0.05) and circumflex artery disease (P=0.05) diagnosis was higher with PSV compared with conventional DSE analysis. Failure of PSV to rise by more than 50% during DSE was associated with significantly increased mortality (P=0.001).A quantitative interpretation of DSE, based on the percentage rise of PSV during stress, accurately detects CAD and predicts prognosis in end-stage renal disease.Role of myocardial perfusion imaging in patients with end-stage renal disease undergoing coronary angiography.Patients with end-stage renal disease (ESRD) are at high risk of cardiovascular events. This study examined the prognostic power of stress myocardial perfusion imaging (MPI) in 150 patients with ESRD (mean age 53 +/- 9 years; 30% women; 66% with diabetes mellitus) being evaluated for renal transplantation with known coronary anatomy using angiography. Baseline data in addition to perfusion and angiographic parameters were compared between survivors and nonsurvivors. All-cause mortality was defined as the outcome measure. An abnormal MPI result was present in 85% of patients, 30% had left ventricular (LV) ejection fraction (EF) < or =40%, and 40% had multivessel coronary artery disease using angiography. At a mean follow-up of 3.4 +/- 1.5 years, 53 patients died (35%). LVEF < or =40%, LV dilatation (LV end-diastolic volume >90 ml), and diabetes mellitus were associated with higher mortality (all p <0.05). Both total perfusion defect size and mean number of narrowed coronary arteries using angiography were significantly higher in those who died (p <0.05). In a multivariate model, abnormal MPI results (low LVEF or abnormal perfusion) and diabetes alone were independent predictors of death, whereas number of narrowed arteries using coronary angiography was not. Thus, MPI was a strong predictor of all-cause mortality in patients with ESRD. In conclusion, abnormal MPI results independently predicted worse survival and provided more powerful prognostic data than coronary angiography.Technetium myocardial perfusion scanning in prerenal transplant evaluation in the United kingdom.Because death with a functioning graft remains one of the most important causes of long-term renal transplant failure, cardiac risk stratification and screening for coronary artery disease are essential components of pretransplant assessment. Pretransplant screening for occult coronary artery disease in a subset of these patients may improve outcome. The UK follows the European Best practice guideline 1.5.5 E. Although echocardiography, thallium myocardial perfusion scanning (MPS), dobutamine stress echocardiography, and coronary angiography have been suggested as means of cardiovascular assessment, the best means of assessment remains undetermined. Therefore, we investigated the role of 99m technetium sestamibi myocardial perfusion scanning as an assessment tool for identifying those patients with end-stage renal failure at high risk of cardiovascular death after renal transplantation. Retrospectively, we studied 126 patients that had a MPS as part of their pretransplant assessment. Overall unadjusted survival was 65% at 3 years. Twelve deaths resulted from cardiovascular causes. A reversible defect on MPS was associated with a fatal cardiac event and all-cause mortality. The unadjusted hazard ratio of cardiac event with reversible defect on MPS was 3.1 (95% confidence interval, 1.1 to 18.2) and hazard ratio of death with reversible defect on MPS was 1.92 (95% confidence interval, 1.1 to 4.4). Thus, MPS may be a useful tool in cardiac risk stratification and in selecting patients with a favorable outcome after renal transplantation. Our patients with a reversible defect in particular have increased cardiac mortality. This group may benefit from coronary angiography.Prognostic value of cardiovascular screening in potential renal transplant recipients: a single-center prospective observational study.We assessed the outcome of pretransplant cardiac assessment in a single center. Three hundred patients with end-stage renal disease underwent electrocardiogram, Bruce exercise testing (ETT) and ventricular assessment by cardiac MRI. Patients with high index of suspicion of coronary artery disease (CAD) underwent coronary angiography and percutaneous coronary intervention (PCI) if indicated. Two hundred and twenty-two patients were accepted onto the renal transplant waiting list; 80 patients were transplanted during the follow-up period and 60 died (7 following transplantation). Successful transplantation was associated with improved survival (mean survival 4.5 +/- 0.6 years vs. listed not transplanted 4.1 +/- 1.4 years vs. not listed 3.1 +/- 1.7 years; p < 0.001). Ninety-nine patients underwent coronary angiography; 65 had normal or low-grade CAD and 34 obstructive CAD. Seventeen patients (5.6%) were treated by PCI. There was no apparent survival difference between patients who underwent PCI or coronary artery bypass graft compared to those who underwent angiography without intervention or no angiography (p = 0.67). Factors associated with nonlisting for renal transplantation included burden of preexisting cardiovascular disease, poor exercise tolerance and severity of CAD. Pretransplant cardiovascular screening provides prognostic information and information that can be used to restrict access to transplantation. However, if the aim is to identify and treat CAD, the benefits are far from clear.[Prognostic value of dobutamine stress echocardiography in patients with terminal renal insufficiency undergoing hemodialysis--a 5-year follow up].Patients with end-stage renal failure have high morbidity and mortality rates due to cardiovascular complications. Screening for coronary heart disease in these patients is of utmost importance. The aim of this study was to investigate the prognostic value of the dobutamine test in patients on hemodyalisis during a 5-year follow-up period.During the pretransplantation period, 24 patients on chronic hemodialysis underwent echocardiography and dobutamine echocardiography. The average age of patients was 51.50 +/- 7.35 years. The mean duration of dialysis was 74 +/- 40 months.The dobutamine stress test was positive in 50% of patients, and undefined in 12.5%. The wall motion score index before the test was 1, and after the test it was 1.54 +/- 0.27. There were no serious complications. Left ventricular mass, diastolic and systolic dimension and posterior wall were significantly higher in patients with positive dobutamine stress results and they were associated with late cardiac morbidity and mortality. Five-year survival in patients with positive dobutamine stress results was 33.3% and 52.3% in patients with negative dobutamine results. Causes of mortality were as follows: cardiac 45.4%, cerebrovascular 18.1%, other causes 36.4%. Cardiogical complications were not the cause of death in any of the patients with negative dobutamine results. In dobutamine positive group 62.5% died from cardiological complications. During the 5-year period, cardiac death and manifest coronary disease occurred in 75% of patients with positive dobutamine stress results and only in one patient with negative dobutamine results. Sensitivity was 75%, specificity 89% and positive predictive value 90%.Dobutamine stress echocardiography has a good predictive value for future cardiac events in hemnodyalisis patients, and in screening for coronary disease.Renal transplant outcome in high-cardiovascular risk recipients.Cardiovascular (CV) disease is the foremost cause of mortality and an important cause of morbidity in renal transplant recipients. The disease burden is likely to increase as older patients are accepted for transplantation. The outcome of these high-CV risk patients after renal transplantation, especially with known pre-transplant coronary artery disease (CAD), has not been studied. Hence, we looked at the CV outcome in patients with known pre-transplant CAD.All renal transplants performed between 1998 and 2002 at our center, followed up to 2005, were divided into high- and low-risk groups, based on the presence of one or more of the following: pre-transplant angina, myocardial infarction, and positive coronary angiogram. The two groups were compared for post-transplant cardiac events and patient and graft survival. The factors predictive of post-transplant cardiac events were also determined by Cox-regression multivariate analysis.Forty-five patients (10.5%), out of 429, had post-transplant cardiac events; 31.3% in the high risk, and 6.5% in the low-risk group (p = 0.001). Five-yr patient survival was lower in the high-risk group (82.8% vs. 93.1%, p = 0.004), while five-yr overall graft survival and death censored graft survival were statistically not different (74.8% vs. 84.1%, p = 0.08 and 87.3% vs. 90%, p = 0.25). Forty-one percent of patients who were treated with angioplasty plus stenting or bypass graft prior to transplantation had post-transplant cardiac events, as compared with 28% of those without intervention in the high-risk group and 6.5% of patients in the low-risk group (p = 0.001). Age, pre-transplant cardiac disease, arrhythmias, and low-ejection fraction (< or = 40%) were significant independent predictors of post-transplant cardiac events.Post-transplant survival of high-CV risk patients (with known CAD) is lower than that of low-risk recipients but remains acceptable. Cardiac interventions may reduce perioperative risk but do not reduce the probability of post-transplant cardiac events to that of low-risk group.Stress echocardiography: abnormal response of tissue Doppler-derived indices to dobutamine in the absence of obstructive coronary artery disease in patients with chronic renal failure.Abnormal tissue Doppler (TD)-derived indices during dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE) can predict the presence of coronary artery disease (CAD) in patients with normal renal function. These indices include a reduction in annular systolic velocity (S'), a decrease in early diastolic annular velocity (E'), and prolongation of the time to E'. However, the ability of these indices to detect or exclude CAD in patients with chronic renal failure (CRF) is unclear.To examine the ability of TD-derived indices to detect or exclude the presence of CAD in patients with CRF.We evaluated a total of 30 patients (13 males, mean age 57 +/- 15 years) using both DSE and coronary angiography. This cohort consisted of 12 control patients with normal renal function (mean creatinine 0.5 mg/dL) and 18 patient with CRF (mean creatinine 2.5 mg/dL). At each stage of the DSE, left ventricular (LV) diastolic function was assessed using conventional (peak early (E) and late (A) transmitral, E/A ratio, E-wave deceleration time (DT), and isovolumic relaxation time (IVRT)) and TD-derived indices (lateral annular systolic (S'), early diastolic (E'), and late atrial velocities (A'), time to E' and E/E').All 30 patients had a normal DSE based on systolic regional function and a normal coronary angiogram. There was no difference in E, A, E/A, DT or IVRT between the two groups at each stage. Despite normal coronaries, patients with CRF demonstrated lower S' and E' velocities at peak stress compared to the control patients (8.0 +/- 2.2 cm/sec vs 15.1 +/- 2.6, P < 0.05 and 6.7 +/- 1.6 cm/sec vs 13.3 +/- 3.1, P < 0.05, respectively). During DSE, the time to E' at peak stress in CRF patients was also prolonged compared to control (400 +/- 44 ms vs 329 +/- 51, P < 0.05). Patients with CRF also had increased filling pressures (as estimated by E/E') as compared to controls at peak stress (14.7 +/- 5.2 vs 7.4 +/- 1.5, P < 0.05, respectively).In patients with CRF, a reduction in TD derived indices does not predict the presence of obstructive CAD.Ischaemia imaging in type 2 diabetic kidney transplant candidates--is coronary angiography essential?Coronary artery disease (CAD) remains the leading cause of death in type 2 diabetes mellitus (DM) patients undergoing renal transplantation. There is a high prevalence of silent CAD in these patients. Controversy exists regarding the role of dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE) in detection of CAD. Our purpose was to compare DSE with coronary angiography (CA) for the detection of CAD in type 2 diabetic patients undergoing evaluation for renal transplantation.Forty (36 male, four female) type 2 diabetic patients with end-stage renal disease (ESRD) were subjected to DSE followed by CA as a part of their pre-renal transplant evaluation. The ability of DSE to predict 70% stenosis in one or more coronary arteries as determined by CA was evaluated. Mean age of the patients was 49.2 +/- 5 years (range 39-60 years).DSE was positive in 10 (25%) patients, while 19 patients (48%) had a more than 70% lesion in at least one epicardial vessel on CA (six patients had single vessel, three had double vessel and 10 had triple vessel disease). The sensitivity and specificity in identifying CAD was 47.3 and 95.2%, respectively, while positive predictive value and negative predictive value was 90% and 66%. Accuracy of DSE was 72.5%. All four patients with diffuse diabetic coronary artery disease had negative DSE.DSE is a poor predictor of coronary artery disease in type 2 DM patients being evaluated for renal transplantation. CA should be included in evaluation of type 2 diabetic patients who are renal transplant candidates.Prevalence and determinants of coronary and aortic calcifications assessed by chest CT in renal transplant recipients.Coronary artery calcifications independently predict cardiovascular events (CVE) in the general population. We assessed the prevalence and determinants of coronary (CAC) and thoracic aorta (AoC) calcifications in renal transplant recipients (RTR).Consecutive RTR living in Belgium, with an isolated kidney graft functioning for more than 1 year, were asked to participate. They underwent a 16-slice spiral computerized tomography in order to measure calcium mass. Demographic, clinical, biochemical and urinary parameters were recorded.We included 281 patients. CAC and AoC were detected in 81 and 85%, with geometric means (SD) of 52.2 (4.9) and 99.3 (8.2) mg, respectively. By multiple linear regression, independent predictors of both types of calcifications included older age, longer time on dialysis, a history of CVE, of multiple transplantations and of smoking. Other determinants of CAC were male gender, current statin use and history of parathyroidectomy, and other determinants of AoC included higher pulse pressure, shorter time under mycophenolate mofetil and current use of anti-vitamin-K.The prevalence of both CAC and AoC is substantial in RTR. We delineate independent determinants either common to both CAC and AoC or specific to one, and known as classic or chronic kidney disease related risk factors.Electron-beam computerized tomography correlates with coronary angiogram in chronic kidney disease patients.Electron-beam computerized tomography (EBCT) is able to noninvasively quantify coronary artery calcification (CAC). Chronic kidney disease (CKD) patients frequently have CAC, and clinicians are puzzled regarding the clinical significance of this finding and the diagnostic accuracy of coronary EBCT in CKD. The aim of this study was to determine the correlation in CKD patients between CAC measured by EBCT and 50% stenosis determined by coronary angiography (CA), the gold standard to identify atherosclerotic lesions.We recruited 37 patients with CKD from a single institution and compared their coronary EBCT and CA results using standard statistical analysis.Patients with at least one vessel with > or = 50% stenosis by CA had higher mean CAC scores [2,407.9 +/- (SD) 3,165.3 vs. 227 +/- 443.4; p < 0.001] and higher median CAC scores (1,052 vs. 25.8; p < 0.001) as compared with those having no stenosis > or = 50%. The sensitivity was 85.7%, and the specificity 82.6% using 50% stenosis as the definition for coronary artery disease and using a CAC score of 400 as a cutoff value for the EBCT results. The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve was 0.84. The diagnostic accuracy (proportion of correct results) was 83.8%. The negative predictive value was 90.5%. The receiver operating characteristic curve suggests that the optimal cutoff value for CAC scores in our cohort is 315.9, increasing the area under the receiver operating characteristic curve to 0.91. The total coronary artery stenosis was significantly associated with the CAC score (p = 0.01).EBCT has a very good predictive value for obstructive coronary artery disease. EBCT could be used as a screening tool in CKD patients with a low-to-intermediate risk for coronary artery disease.Echocardiography-based score to predict outcome after renal transplantation.Given the high cardiac mortality of renal transplant recipients, identification of high-risk patients is important to offer appropriate treatment before transplantation.To determine patients with high mortality after renal transplantation despite selection according to current criteria.Preoperative parameters were collected from 203 renal transplant recipients over a follow-up time of 3.6 (1.9) years. The primary end point was all-cause mortality.22 deaths (11%) and 12 cardiac failures (6%) were observed. Non-survivors were older (p< or =0.001), had larger left ventricular end-systolic diameter (LVSD) (p< or =0.001) and end-diastolic diameter (p = 0.002), and lower ejection fraction (p< or =0.001). Left ventricular mass index (p = 0.001), maximal wall thickness (p = 0.006) and the proportion with mitral annular calcification (p = 0.001) were significantly higher in the non-survivors. The risk factors for ischaemic heart disease and exercise test data were not significantly different between the two groups. Four independent predictors of mortality after renal transplantation were identified: age > or =50 years (p = 0.002), LVESD > or =3.5 cm (p = 0.002), maximal wall thickness > or =1.4 cm (p = 0.014) and mitral annular calcification (p = 0.036). The 5-year survival estimates for 0, 1, 2 and 3 prognostic factors were 96%, 86%, 69% and 38%, respectively. No patient had four prognostic factors. In patients > or =50 years, the 5-year survival estimates for 0, 1 and 2 additional prognostic factors were 73%, 45% and 18%, respectively.In addition to selection according to current guidelines, age and three conventional echocardiography parameters may further improve risk stratification before renal transplantation.Utility of carotid intimal medial thickness as a screening tool for evaluation of coronary artery disease in pre-transplant end stage renal disease.Coronary artery disease (CAD) is associated with a higher incidence of allograft failure and mortality in patients with end-stage renal disease (ESRD) following renal transplant.To evaluate the efficacy of using carotid intimal medial thickness (CIMT) to predict the presence of CAD in patients with ESRD, using coronary angiography (CAG) as the gold standard.This prospective study enrolled consecutive patients with ESRD who underwent CAG as a part of pretransplant evaluation to rule out the presence of atherosclerotic CAD. An operator who was blinded with respect to the results of the CAG, measured carotid IMT in all patients prior to CAG and recorded it on videotape. Two independent observers blinded to the results of CAG measured carotid IMT offline to validate its predictive accuracy as a noninvasive test in predicting the presence or absence of CAD. Measurement of carotid IMT was done on USG B mode 7.5 MHZ probe [HP 5500 andover, Massachusetts]. Student's t-test was used for inter-group comparisons. Pearson correlation coefficient test was used to assess the relation between CAD and various risk factors and carotid IMT. Linear regression analysis was applied to identify independent factors determining presence of CAD. A P value < 0.05 was considered statistically significant.Mean CIMT was significantly higher in those with CAD as compared to those without [0.80+/- 0.06 vs.0.70+/-0.06 mm, P< 0.0001). Patients with CIMT> 0.75 mm were older and had more incidence of diabetes(78% vs. 47%; P=0.001). Only 4/53 (7%) of patients with CIMT< 0.75 mm had CAD, vs. 38/52 (73%) in those with CIMT >0.75 mm. The sensitivity and specificity of using CIMT > 0.75 as a predictor of CAD was 90.47%and 73% and its positive and negative predictive values were 0.73 and 0.92. On multivariate analysis, only CIMT was a significant predictor of CAD.Carotid IMT can be used to predict CAD in patients with ESRD. In the absence of other risk factors,patients with IMT< 0.75 mm may not need a pretransplant CAG.Routine coronary angiography in diabetic nephropathy patients before transplantation.We evaluated the incidence of significant coronary artery stenoses (CAS), angina pectoris (AP), revascularization and associated risk factors in 155 consecutive diabetic nephropathy transplant candidates. Kidney and kidney-pancreas transplant candidates with diabetes for more than 10 years and/or retinopathy and/or biopsy verified diabetic nephropathy were included. The inclusion period was 1999-2004. Seventy-two percent of patients were male. Sixty-one percent had type 1 diabetes and 39% had type 2 diabetes and mean age was 46 years (+/-10) and 58 years (+/-11), respectively. History of heart disease was present in 34% of patients, 34% had cerebro-vascular and/or peripheral atherosclerotic disease, and 51% had neither. Fifty-five percent had a smoking history and 46% were on dialysis. Significant CAS was found in 45% of patients, of whom 17% had AP. No patients below 35 years of age had significant CAS (n = 11, p = 0.001). Revascularization was performed in 57% of patients with significant CAS. The only risk factor for significant CAS in multiple logistic regression was age (p = 0.046). Approximately half of the patients had significant CAS, and half of these underwent revascularization. Most patients with CAS did not have symptoms of myocardial ischemia. The data justify screening diabetic nephropathy transplant candidates with coronary angiography before transplantation.Risk stratification of patients with chronic kidney disease: results of screening strategies incorporating clinical risk scoring and dobutamine stress echocardiography.Cardiac disease is the principal cause of death in patients with chronic kidney disease (CKD). Ischemia at dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE) is associated with adverse events in these patients. We sought the efficacy of combining clinical risk evaluation with DSE.We allocated 244 patients with CKD (mean age 54 years, 140 men, 169 dialysis-dependent at baseline) into low- and high-risk groups based on two disease-specific scores and the Framingham risk model. All underwent DSE and were further stratified according to DSE results. Patients were followed over 20 +/- 14 months for events (death, myocardial infarction, acute coronary syndrome).There were 49 deaths and 32 cardiac events. Using the different clinical scores, allocation of high risk varied from 34% to 79% of patients, and 39% to 50% of high-risk patients had an abnormal DSE. In the high-risk groups, depending on the clinical score chosen, 25% to 44% with an abnormal DSE had a cardiac event, compared with 8% to 22% with a normal DSE. Cardiac events occurred in 2.0%, 3.1%, and 9.7% of the low-risk patients, using the two disease-specific and Framingham scores, respectively, and DSE results did not add to risk evaluation in this subgroup. Independent DSE predictors of cardiac events were a lower resting diastolic blood pressure, angina during the test, and the combination of ischemia with resting left ventricular dysfunction.In CKD patients, high-risk findings by DSE can predict outcome. A stepwise strategy of combining clinical risk scores with DSE for CAD screening in CKD reduces the number of tests required and identifies a high-risk subgroup among whom DSE results more effectively stratify high and low risk.Validation of a screening protocol for identifying low-risk candidates with type 1 diabetes mellitus for kidney with or without pancreas transplantation.Certain clinical risk factors are associated with significant coronary artery disease in kidney transplant candidates with diabetes mellitus. We sought to validate the use of a clinical algorithm in predicting post-transplantation mortality in patients with type 1 diabetes. We also examined the prevalence of significant coronary lesions in high-risk transplant candidates.All patients with type 1 diabetes evaluated between 1991 and 2001 for kidney with/without pancreas transplantation were classified as high-risk based on the presence of any of the following risk factors: age >or=45 yr, smoking history >or=5 pack years, diabetes duration >or=25 yr or any ST-T segment abnormalities on electrocardiogram. Remaining patients were considered low risk. All high-risk candidates were advised to undergo coronary angiography. The primary outcome of interest was all-cause mortality post-transplantation.Eighty-four high-risk and 42 low-risk patients were identified. Significant coronary artery stenosis was detected in 31 high-risk candidates. Mean arterial pressure was a significant predictor of coronary stenosis (odds ratio 1.68; 95% confidence interval 1.14-2.46), adjusted for age, sex and duration of diabetes. In 75 candidates who underwent transplantation with median follow-up of 47 months, the use of clinical risk factors predicted all eight deaths. No deaths occurred in low-risk patients. A significant mortality difference was noted between the two risk groups (p = 0.03).This clinical algorithm can identify patients with type 1 diabetes at risk for mortality after kidney with/without pancreas transplant. Patients without clinical risk factors can safely undergo transplantation without further cardiac evaluation.Significance of coronary artery calcification score (CACS) for the detection of coronary artery disease (CAD) in chronic dialysis patients.Coronary artery disease (CAD) is a principal cause of death in patients with end-stage renal disease (ESRD). The coronary artery calcification score (CACS), determined by electron-beam computed tomography (EBCT), is useful for the detection of CAD in non-ESRD patients. There are few reports on the usefulness of EBCT for the detection of CAD, however, in ESRD patients. We examined the relation between CACS and CAD in ESRD patients.Coronary angiography (CAG) was used to diagnose CAD in patients with significant coronary artery stenosis (>or=50%). We examined 76 ESRD patients on chronic dialysis therapy from 1997 to 2005, of which 51 are men, 25 are women, mean (S.D.) age of 57.9 (12.1) years and mean (S.D.) HD duration of 7.7 (6.6) years. There were 50 (35 men, 15 women) patients with CAD and 26 (16 men, 10 women) without CAD.The median CACS was 1290 in all patients, 1689 in the CAD group and 527 in the non-CAD group; the mean (S.D.) CACS was 1833 (2003) in all patients, 2338 (2209) in the CAD group and 861 (991) in the non-CAD group. CACS was significantly higher in the CAD group than in the non-CAD group. The CACS cutoff values for predicting CAD were calculated at intervals of 100. At the cutoff values of >or=100, >or=500, >or=1000, >or=2000, and >or=3000, the sensitivity was 98%, 90%, 68%, 42%, and 32% and the specificity was 35%, 50%, 69%, 85%, and 96%, respectively.EBCT is not adequate for screening asymptomatic ESRD patients. Because EBCT is less invasive than CAG, further study is necessary to determine whether CAG should be performed in all high-risk ESRD patients on chronic dialysis.Value of 99mTc-methoxyisobutylisonitrile (99mTc-MIBI) gated SPECT for the detection of silent myocardial ischemia in hemodialysis patients: clinical variables associated with abnormal test results.Although coronary artery disease is a major cause of mortality and morbidity in patients undergoing hemodialysis, there is no accurate diagnostic strategy for these patients.To assess the value of 99mTc-methoxyisobutylisonitrile (99mTc-MIBI) gated single-photon emission computed tomography for the detection of silent myocardial ischemia in patients undergoing hemodialysis and to evaluate the clinical variables associated with abnormal test results.Thirty-one asymptomatic patients undergoing hemodialysis (20 men, 11 women), with a mean age of 45 years (range, 25-75 years), were included in the study. Serum electrolytes, creatinine, homocysteine and adhesion molecules were measured prior to dialysis. Ambulatory blood pressure, carotid intima-media thickness measurements, echocardiography and stress 99mTc-MIBI imaging were performed in all patients, whereas coronary angiography was performed only in patients with abnormal myocardial perfusion scintigraphy and/or echocardiography.Gated myocardial perfusion scintigraphy results were abnormal in nine patients (29%) and coronary angiography was abnormal in six patients. After a median follow-up of 20 months (range, 14-28 months), nine patients experienced a cardiac event. Seven of the nine patients (78%) with abnormal myocardial perfusion scintigraphy suffered a cardiac event, compared with only two of 22 patients (9%) with normal myocardial perfusion scintigraphy (P<0.0001). Patients with abnormal perfusion scintigraphy had higher serum C-reactive protein, homocysteine and adhesion molecule levels and the duration of hemodialysis was significantly longer.In asymptomatic hemodialysis patients, gated myocardial perfusion scintigraphy is a safe and non-invasive screening technique for the detection of coronary artery disease and for predicting future cardiac events. The presence of ischemia correlates significantly with markers of inflammation. The discordant results (abnormal myocardial perfusion scintigraphy/normal coronary angiography) can be attributed to angiographically unrecognized occult atherosclerotic changes and abnormal vasodilatation capacity of the coronary circulation.Assessment of coronary artery disease in hemodialysis patients with delayed systolic blood pressure response after exercise testing.We evaluated usefulness of the postexercise systolic blood pressure (SBP) response for detecting coronary artery disease (CAD) in hemodialysis patients.A treadmill exercise testing was done, and the SBP response was measured in 44 hemodialysis patients (30 men, 14 women; age 41 to 81 years). The postexercise SBP response was defined as the ratio of SBP after 3 minutes of recovery to SBP at peak exercise.The SBP ratio of the 25 subjects with coronary artery stenosis (1.01+/- 0.13) was significantly greater (p<0.01) than 19 subjects without coronary artery stenosis (0.83+/- 0.10). An SBP ratio greater than 0.92 identified CAD with higher sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy than did the conventional ST-segment depression criterion (76 vs. 56%, 90 vs. 53%, and 82 vs. 55%, respectively).Determination of the SBP ratio is a clinically useful, noninvasive method for accurately detecting CAD in hemodialysis patients.Clinical, resting echo and dipyridamole stress echocardiography findings for the screening of renal transplant candidates.Preoperative screening for coronary artery disease is recommended in high-risk renal transplant candidates. Aim of this study was to prospectively assess the value of a comprehensive risk stratification strategy including clinical, resting echo, and dipyridamole stress echo findings before renal transplantation.The study group consisted of 71 renal transplant candidates (47 men; age 54+/-11 years) fulfilling one or more of the following high-risk clinical criteria: history of coronary artery disease, wall motion abnormalities at resting echo, dialysis dependency lasting >5 years, presence of 2 or more risk factors. Clinical history, resting echo, and dipyridamole stress echo (up to 0.84 mg over 10 min + atropine up to 1 mg) were obtained in all subjects.Mean number of risk factors was 2.5+/-1.0. Known coronary artery disease and diabetes were present, respectively, in 2 (3%) and 11 (15%) persons. No patient had left ventricular ejection fraction <45%. Left ventricular hypertrophy was found in 53 (74%) cases. Stress echo showed 100% safety and 97% overall feasibility. Inducible ischemia (new wall motion abnormalities) was detected in 3 (4%) subjects. During follow-up (36+/-12 months), 8 (11%) cardiac events occurred: 2 deaths, 2 myocardial infarctions, 3 coronary interventions, and 1 pulmonary edema. The perioperative period and subsequent follow-up (22+/-12 months) was uneventful among 32 patients who received renal transplantation. Four-year event-free survival was 92% in those without ischemia; it was 96% in the non-diabetic population. Diabetes (HR=4.78), age (HR=1.14), and left ventricular mass index (HR=1.02) were independent prognostic indicators among clinical and resting echo variables. The global chi-square of the statistical model was 18.8; it increased to 27.3 (+45%) after the addition of stress echo result.Renal transplant candidates can undergo effective stratification of risk by combining clinical, resting echo and dipyridamole stress echo findings.Dobutamine stress echocardiography and the resting but not exercise electrocardiograph predict severe coronary artery disease in renal transplant candidates.After renal transplantation half of all deaths are cardiac, so prior detection and treatment of severe coronary artery disease (CAD) is advocated. The aim of this study was to identify non-invasive predictors of severe CAD in a group of renal transplant candidates.One hundred and twenty-five renal transplant candidates (mean age 52+/-12 years, 80 male, mean creatinine 608+/-272 micromol/l) were studied. All had coronary angiography, dobutamine stress echocardiography, and resting and exercise electrocardiograph (ECG). Severe CAD was defined as luminal stenosis >70% by visual estimation in at least one epicardial artery. The resting ECG was recorded as abnormal if there was evidence of pathological Q waves, left ventricular hypertrophy, ST depression or elevation > or=1 mm, T wave inversion or bundle branch block. Total exercise time, maximal ST segment change, maximal heart rate and systolic blood pressure, limiting symptoms and Duke score were calculated during the exercise ECG test.Of the patients, 36 (29%) had severe CAD, 55% were on dialysis and 39% were diabetic. Patients with severe CAD were significantly older (P<0.001), had higher total cholesterol (P = 0.05), higher CRP level (P = 0.05), larger left ventricular (LV), end systolic and end diastolic diameter (P = 0.007 for each), and lower LV ejection fraction (P = 0.01). A significantly higher percentage were diabetic (P = 0.05), had previous graft failure (P = 0.05), mitral annular calcification (P = 0.04), an abnormal resting ECG (P = 0.001) and positive stress echo result (P<0.001). Cardiac symptoms and exercise ECG parameters were not significantly different in the two groups. Stepwise logistic regression identified an abnormal resting ECG (OR 7, 95% CI 2, 34, P = 0.013) and positive stress echo result (OR 23, 95% CI 6, 88, P<0.001) as independent predictors of severe CAD.In selecting which potential renal transplant candidates should undergo coronary angiography, resting ECG and dobutamine stress echocardiography are the best predictors of severe CAD.Dobutamine stress echocardiography and cardiac troponin T for the detection of significant coronary artery disease and predicting outcome in renal transplant candidates.Ischaemic heart disease is the leading cause of mortality and morbidity in patients with end-stage renal disease (ESRD) and after renal transplantation. However, the optimal non-invasive test for coronary artery disease (CAD) diagnosis in this population has yet to be established. The aim of this study was to assess the diagnostic accuracy of dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE) and baseline plasma cardiac troponin T (cTnT) for detecting significant CAD and predicting adverse cardiac events in patients referred for renal transplantation.Coronary angiography, DSE, and baseline cTnT measurements were performed in 118 consecutive patients (mean age 52+/-12 years, 75 male) with ESRD (mean creatinine 608+/-272 micromol/L) referred for renal transplantation. The mean follow-up period was 1.32+/-0.48 years. Significant CAD was defined as a reduction in luminal diameter >70% by visual estimation in at least one major epicardial vessel. An abnormal DSE result defined as the development of a new regional wall motion abnormality in one or more normal resting segments or a deterioration of wall motion in one or more resting hypokinetic segments. A baseline cTnT>0.1 microg/L was taken as positive.Significant CAD in at least one vessel was present in 35 patients (30%). The number of patients with significant 3 vessel and 2 vessel disease was 6 and 7, respectively. An abnormal DSE result was present in 36 (31%) patients. Thirty-one (26%) had cTnT>0.1 microg/L. Sixty-four (54%) patients were on dialysis and 46 (39%) were diabetic. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values for DSE in detecting significant coronary artery disease were 88%, 94%, 86% and 95%, respectively. The same values for a raised cTnT were 54%, 62%, 40% and 74%, respectively. The combination of an abnormal DSE result and raised cTnT gave values of 61%, 91%, 76%, and 80%, respectively. Over the follow-up period, mortality was significantly higher in those with a raised baseline cTnT but not those with an abnormal DSE result or significant CAD.DSE is an accurate technique for the detection of significant CAD in renal transplant candidates. An elevated cTnT does not predict significant CAD in this population and when used in conjunction with DSE, reduces the sensitivity of the combined tests. cTnT is an important marker of prognosis in renal transplant candidates.Incidence of coronary heart disease and cardiac events in patients undergoing kidney and pancreatic transplantation.One major cause of graft loss after kidney transplantation or simultaneous kidney and pancreas transplantation is death of the recipient due to cardiac events. Records of 261 patients who underwent sole kidney (group A) or combined kidney-pancreas transplantation (group B) were retrospectively analyzed. Patients were divided into groups with basic cardiac evaluation (chest X-ray, electrocardiogram) and patients with additional diagnostics [echocardiography, exercise stress test, myocardial perfusion test, and coronary angiography (CAG)]. The results of the performed CAGs were as follows: proven coronary artery disease (CAD) in 22 patients (12.43%) in group A and 37 patients (44.05%) in group B; stenosis of one main coronary artery of 70% or greater in 8.47% (group A) and 16.67% (group B) of the patients. Subsequent revascularization procedures were performed in 15 candidates (8.47%) of group A and 11 (13.10%) of group B. The incidence of posttransplant cardiac events (PCE) was lower in recipients in both groups who underwent additional cardiac evaluation. Late postoperative deaths were reported in 3.45% of kidney recipients with no additional evaluation (group A), in 2.06% of patients with further diagnostics (group A), and in only 1.19% of patients with invasive pretransplant evaluation (group B). Patients with known CAD and no further invasive diagnostics or subsequent revascularization are at great risk. PCE were observed in three of seven patients in this subgroup. Careful cardiac evaluation including echocardiography, exercise stress test, myocardial perfusion test, and CAG is associated with a low incidence of PCE.[Prevalence of coronary artery disease in type I diabetic candidates for double transplantation (kidney and pancreas)].To assess the prevalence of coronary artery disease (CAD) in a population of type I diabetic, nephropathic patients in a dialysis program and candidates for double transplantation (kidney and pancreas).From January 2000 to July 2002, 58 type I diabetic patients underwent coronary cineangiography as part of an assessment protocol for double transplantation. Coronary artery disease was defined as any irregularity in the coronary arteries and was classified according to the degree of luminal stenosis as mild (< 30%), moderate (> or = 30 to 70%), and severe (> 70%).The mean age of the patients was 34 +/- 12 years, and 32 (55%) were men. No patient had a history of angina or acute myocardial infarction. The major risk factors for the disease were systemic arterial hypertension in 93% of the patients, dyslipidemia in 38%, familial history in 25%, and smoking in 20%. The mean duration of diabetes was 20.8 +/- 9 years, and the duration of dialysis was 26 +/- 9 months. Coronary angiography revealed coronary artery disease in 42 (72%) patients, which was mild in 20 (34%) patients, moderate in 9 (16%), and severe in 13 (22%).Patients with type I diabetes in a dialysis program and candidates for double transplantation had an elevated prevalence of coronary artery disease. It is worth noting that those patients had no symptoms of the disease.High prevalence of occult coronary artery stenosis in patients with chronic kidney disease at the initiation of renal replacement therapy: an angiographic examination.The prevalence of coronary artery stenosis (CAS) at the initiation of renal replacement therapy (RRT) in patients with chronic kidney disease (CKD) and no previous history of angina and/or myocardial infarction (MI) has not been fully elucidated. The prevalence of significant CAS was evaluated in 30 asymptomatic stage 5 CKD patients without a history of angina and/or MI by coronary angiography at the initiation of RRT. The correlations of various parameters with the prevalence of CAS were also examined. Atherosclerotic surrogate markers, including intima-media thickness of carotid artery and ankle-brachial BP index (ABI), were also evaluated. Significant CAS (>50% stenosis) was seen in 16 (53.3%) of 30 asymptomatic CKD patients on coronary angiography at the start of RRT. Stress cardiac scintigraphy was not effective for detecting hidden cardiac ischemia among the CKD patients. Univariate analysis showed that diabetes (P = 0.01), left ventricular mass index (P = 0.04), hyperlipidemia (P = 0.04), total cholesterol (P = 0.02), LDL cholesterol (P < 0.01), intima-media thickness (P = 0.04), and fibrinogen (P = 0.01) were positively correlated with the presence of CAS, whereas ABI (P < 0.01) showed a negative correlation with CAS. Stepwise logistic regression analysis revealed that diabetes and fibrinogen were significant and independent risk factors for CAS in asymptomatic CKD patients who started RRT. The results clearly demonstrated that despite the absence of cardiac events, stage 5 CKD patients are already in a very high risk group for CAS at the initiation of RRT, which was also closely associated with a significant decrease in ABI.Pretransplant cardiac investigations in the Irish renal transplant population--the effectiveness of our current screening techniques in predicting cardiac events.Coronary artery disease (CAD) is prevalent among endstage renal failure patients and remains the major cause of mortality following renal transplantation. Death with a functioning transplant institute remains the most common cause of kidney graft failure. In this study we attempt to evaluate the effectiveness of the clinical history and current screening techniques available in predicting posttransplant CAD and also assess the role of coronary angiography as a pretransplant screening technique.Clinical data of 190 renal transplant patients was analyzed. Any clinical history of cardiac disease and all preoperative cardiac screening data was recorded for each patient. The study endpoints were the subsequent development of myocardial infarction (MI), undergoing coronary artery bypass graft (CABG) or death.Factors that were significantly associated with reaching a study endpoint included: age at transplant [Hazard Ratio (HR) 1.91, P<0.001], history of heart failure (HR 8.22, P<0.001), presence of CAD on coronary angiography (HR 5.55, P=0.033), anterior Q wave on electrocardiograph (ECG) (HR 8.6, P<0.001), carotid artery disease (HR 3.74, P=0.030) and history of a cerebrovascular accident (HR of 4.32, P=0.008). The screening techniques of exercise stress testing and echocardiography were not conclusive as predictive variables of outcome.Clinical history and ECG results are good, practical and low-cost screening methods. In our study exercise stress testing and echocardiography were found to be of limited value. Coronary angiography is appropriate in certain high-risk groups but not necessary as part of screening in all potential renal transplant recipients.Prognostic value of inducible myocardial ischemia in predicting cardiovascular events after renal transplantation.The aims of the present study were to determine the prevalence of inducible myocardial ischemia (IMI) in renal transplant recipients (RTR) more than 50 years old, to identify predictors of IMI, and to search for its prognostic value.Among the 377 renal transplantations performed between 1989 and 1998 in a single institution, 120 were done in patients > or =50 years old, and 97 were recruited for the study. During the last quarter of 1998, all of them underwent an exercise test (EST), an exercise-thallium 201 single photon emission computed tomography coupled with dipyridamole (SPECT), and 81% of them had a dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE). Patients with IMI subsequently underwent coronary angiography to detect coronary stenosis.IMI was present in 12 of the 97 patients (10%). The diagnosis was evidenced by EST in four cases, by SPECT in 11 cases, and DSE in three cases. Five of these 12 patients (42%) had significant coronary artery stenosis (> or =50%). Multivariate analysis of several pre- and post-transplant variables evidenced acute rejection and left ventricular hypertrophy as significant correlates of IMI (both P < 0.03). Patients were prospectively followed-up for 48 months for the occurrence of major cardiovascular events. Kaplan-Meier analysis revealed a significant increase in cardiovascular events in the IMI group (P < 0.0001). In addition, the Cox proportional hazards model revealed that IMI and diabetes mellitus had an independent significant effect on the occurrence of major cardiovascular events.IMI was present in 10% of RTR aged > or =50 years, and was predicted by acute rejection and left ventricular hypertrophy. IMI had a strong effect on major cardiovascular events in this population.Myocardial scintigraphy using a fatty acid analogue detects coronary artery disease in hemodialysis patients.Coronary artery disease contributes significantly to mortality in end-stage renal disease (ESRD) patients. Single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) using an iodinated fatty acid analogue, iodine-123-methyl iodophenylpentadecanoic acid (123I-BMIPP), can assess fatty acid metabolism in the myocardium. We investigated the ability of 123I-BMIPP SPECT to detect coronary artery disease in hemodialysis patients compared with 201thallium chloride (201Tl) SPECT.We prospectively studied 130 ESRD patients undergoing hemodialysis for a mean of 88.6 months (male/female, 77/53; mean age, 63.8 years). Dual SPECT using 123I-BMIPP and 201Tl was performed, followed by coronary angiography. SPECT findings were graded in 17 segments on a five-point scale (0, normal uptake; 4, none) and assessed as a summed score.By coronary angiography, 71.5% of patients (93/130) had significant coronary stenosis (> or =75%), and five patients showed coronary spasm without coronary stenosis. When a BMIPP summed score of 6 or more was defined as abnormal, sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy for detecting coronary artery disease by BMIPP SPECT were 98.0%, 65.6%, and 90.0%, respectively; in contrast, these parameters for detecting coronary artery disease by Tl SPECT were 84.7%, 46.9%, and 75.0%, respectively, when a Tl summed score of 1 or more was defined as abnormal. In receiver operating characteristic analysis, the area under the curve was 0.895 in BMIPP and 0.727 in Tl SPECT, respectively.Resting BMIPP SPECT is superior to Tl SPECT for detecting coronary lesions, and provides safe screening for coronary artery disease among maintenance hemodialysis patients.Cardiac evaluation for simultaneous pancreas-kidney transplantation and incidence of cardiac perioperative complications: preliminary study.Type I diabetes mellitus (IDDM) is associated with an increased cardiovascular risk, and eligibility protocols for simultaneous pancreas-kidney transplantation (SPKT) are consequently accurate for preoperative cardiovascular assessment. According to our algorithm, coronary angiography in SPKT candidates is indicated for patients not only experiencing previous cardiac events or symptoms, but also those with long-standing diabetes (more than 25 years) and/or age over 45 years. Furthermore, a basal transthoracic echocardiographic exam (TTE) is performed to assess cardiac volumes, left ventricular mass, systolic function, and kinesis. The aims of this study were to evaluate perioperative cardiac morbidity and mortality in 18 SPKT-eligible patients, divided into two groups on the basis of the presence/absence of angiographically evident coronary artery disease (CAD), as well as to assess the impact of left ventricular hypertrophy (LVH) on cardiac complications. Cardiac intraoperative morbidity and mortality and postoperative mortality and major morbidity were absent; minor cardiac morbidity consisted only of silent ischemic ECG alterations, without significant differences between groups, although the incidence seemed to be higher in the CAD-positive population. LVH detected preoperatively by TTE exam also failed to correlate with the incidence of such complications. Selection of SPKT candidates by coronary angiography may have positive effects on perioperative cardiac morbidity and mortality. A larger sample size is needed to give the study statistical power. Medium- and long-term follow-up studies are warranted to evaluate the effects of preoperative selection on survival rates.Coronary artery calcification measured with electron-beam computerized tomography correlates poorly with coronary artery angiography in dialysis patients.Coronary artery calcification measured by electron-beam computerized tomography (EBCT) correlates with plaque burden and vessel stenosis and is predictive of future cardiac events in the general population. Uremic vascular calcification is common and widespread, tends to be medial as well as intimal, and may not relate solely to atherosclerotic lesions. Despite this difference and in the absence of any direct evidence in uremic patients, it is generally implied that coronary artery calcification equates to occlusive atherosclerosis.We set out to compare the predictive value of coronary artery calcification assessed by EBCT with contemporaneous coronary angiography. We studied 18 patients with end-stage renal disease undergoing maintenance dialysis. Seventy-two coronary vessels were analyzed for angiographic evidence of stenotic disease and correlated with individual vessel calcification score.There was no significant correlation between degree of vessel stenosis and calcification score for individual vessels in patients with a positive calcium scan. Specificity was 48% and the positive predictive value was 53%. However, a calcification score <20 strongly correlated with the absence of significant luminal narrowing, and a 0 calcification score had a negative predictive value of 87.5%.Coronary artery calcification measured by EBCT is not an accurate marker of the degree of vessel stenosis in coronary artery disease in uremic patients and should not be used as a single screening test for atherosclerotic coronary disease.Usefulness of tachycardic-stress perfusion imaging to predict coronary artery disease in high-risk patients with chronic renal failure.Uncertainty remains as to the most appropriate preoperative screening investigation to evaluate patient cardiac risk in prospective renal transplant recipients. We prospectively compared tachycardic-stress (exercise/pacing) scintigraphy with coronary angiography for the detection of significant coronary artery disease in this group. With a negative predictive value of 92%, tachycardic-stress scintigraphy may reduce the need for unnecessary coronary angiography in these patients.Coronary angiography is the best predictor of events in renal transplant candidates compared with noninvasive testing.Guidelines for the detection of coronary artery disease (CAD) and assess of risk in renal transplant candidates are based on the results of noninvasive testing, according to data originated in the nonuremic population. We evaluated prospectively the accuracy of 2 noninvasive tests and risk stratification in detecting CAD (>or=70% obstruction) and assessing cardiac risk by using coronary angiography (CA). One hundred twenty-six renal transplant candidates who were classified as at moderate (>or=50 years) or high (diabetes, extracardiac atherosclerosis, or clinical coronary artery disease) coronary risk underwent myocardial scintigraphy (SPECT), dobutamine stress echocardiography, and CA and were followed for 6 to 48 months. The prevalence of CAD was 42%. The sensitivities and negative predictive values for the 2 noninvasive tests and risk stratification were <75%. After 6 to 48 months, there were 18 cardiac events, 9 fatal. Risk stratification (P=0.007) and CA (P=0.0002) predicted the crude probability of surviving free of cardiac events. The probability of event-free survival at 6, 12, 24, 36, and 48 months were 98%, 98%, 94%, 94%, and 94% in patients with <70% stenosis on CA and 97%, 87%, 61%, 56%, and 54% in patients with >or=70% stenosis. Multivariate analysis showed that the sole predictor of cardiac events was critical coronary lesions (P=0.003). Coronary angiography may still be necessary for detecting CAD and determining cardiac risk in renal transplant candidates. The data suggest that current algorithms based on noninvasive testing in this population should be revised.Prognostic value of myocardial perfusion imaging in predicting outcome after renal transplantation.Cardiovascular disease is a significant cause of morbidity and mortality after renal transplantation. Pretransplant screening in a subset of these patients for occult coronary artery disease (CAD) may improve outcome. The objective of this study was to examine the outcome of 600 patients after renal transplantation for end-stage renal disease. Prospective outcome data were collected on 600 consecutive patients who had renal transplantation between 1996 and 1998 at our institution at 42 +/- 12 months after surgery. Stress single-photon emission computed tomographic (SPECT) myocardial perfusion imaging was performed in 174 patients before surgery, 136 (78%) of whom had diabetes mellitus. There were a total of 59 events: 17 cardiac deaths, 14 nonfatal myocardial infarctions, and 28 noncardiac deaths. There were 12 cardiac events and 11 noncardiac deaths among those who had SPECT myocardial perfusion imaging. In a multivariate analysis that included important risk factors, age (p = 0.03 and 0.003, respectively) and diabetes (p = 0.02 and 0.005, respectively) were the predictors of total events and cardiac events in patients who did not undergo stress SPECT perfusion imaging. In the subgroup who had stress perfusion imaging, an abnormal perfusion SPECT study was the only predictor of cardiac events (p = 0.006). The 42-month cardiac event-free survival rate was 97% in patients with normal SPECT images and 85% in patients with abnormal SPECT images (RR 5.04, 95% confidence interval 1.4 to 17.6, p = 0.006). Thus, there is a 2.8% event rate per year after renal transplantation, and approximately 50% of these events are noncardiac. In high-risk patients (most of whom had diabetes) with preoperative stress perfusion imaging, those with normal images had significantly lower cardiac events than those with abnormal images. These results have important implications in patient screening and postoperative management.Relationship between elevated serum troponin values in end-stage renal disease patients and abnormal isotopic cardiac scans following stress.One hundred asymptomatic high-risk renal transplant candidates were screened for asymptomatic coronary artery disease using stress cardiac isotopic imaging. The cardiac markers, serum cTnT, cTnI, and CKMB, were collected pre and post stress testing. Of the 99 patients whose cardiac scans were technically satisfactory, 32 were normal, 49 had a definite imaging abnormality and the scan was indeterminate in the remaining 18 patients. Based on these results, patients were stratified into either normal, indeterminate or abnormal scan groups. They then were analyzed to detect any correlations between cardiac perfusion defects and either elevated pre-stress cardiac markers or consistent changes 24h after stress testing. While the mean pre-stress serum values for both cardiac troponin T (0.117 +/- 0.12 microgram/L) and cardiac troponin I (0.235 +/- 0.89 microgram/L) were increased in the abnormal cardiac scan group, only the cTnT value proved to differ significantly from the normal group (p < 0.01). For the indeterminate group neither marker was different from the normal scan group. Only an elevated serum cTnT > 0.1 microgram/L (OR 3.042, p = 0.030) proved to discriminate an abnormal scan in this population. It is concluded that the increase in pre-stress serum cTnT encountered in patients with chronic renal failure, with or without evidence of overt, symptomatic coronary artery disease, may represent a combination of subclinical myocardial damage and a prolonged half-life of the marker in the serum. Because of the frequency of elevated serum concentrations of cTnT and, to a lesser degree cTnI, the physician should exercise caution when interpreting a single elevated Troponin value during the evaluation of chest pain in patients with end-stage renal disease. A cTnT > 0.1 microgram/L increases the likelihood of finding significant coronary artery disease three fold in high-risk ESRD patients being evaluated for renal transplantation.Combined dipyridamole-exercise stress echocardiography for detection of myocardial ischemia in hemodialysis patients: an alternative to stress nuclear imaging.Stress nuclear imaging is the noninvasive technique currently used to detect coronary artery disease (CAD) in dialysis patients. Stress echocardiography is recognized as an alternative to stress nuclear imaging for the general population. The aim of this study is to assess the diagnostic accuracy of stress echocardiography for detecting myocardial ischemia in hemodialysis patients.Stress echocardiography and stress technetium-99m-tetrofosmin (Myoview; Amersham International Plc) imaging were performed simultaneously for 66 asymptomatic hemodialysis patients in a single session, using a combination of high-dose dipyridamole and symptom-limited exercise. Coronary angiography was performed in 44 patients with at least one abnormal noninvasive test result or who were considered high-risk despite normal noninvasive test results.Results for stress echocardiography were abnormal in 15 patients (22%); stress Myoview, in 14 patients (21%); and coronary angiography, in 12 patients (18%). The sensitivity of stress echocardiography for detecting myocardial ischemia (defined as stress Myoview defect) was 86%; specificity, 94%; positive predictive value, 80%; negative predictive value, 96%; and overall accuracy, 92%. The sensitivity of stress echocardiography for detecting CAD (defined as abnormal coronary angiography result) was 83%; specificity, 84%; positive predictive value, 67%; negative predictive value, 93%; and overall accuracy, 84%. Stress echocardiography and stress Myoview did not differ significantly in overall accuracy for detecting CAD (84% versus 91%; P = not significant).In hemodialysis patients, combined dipyridamole-exercise echocardiography is an accurate method to detect both myocardial ischemia and CAD and represents an alternative to stress nuclear imaging.Predicting cardiac events with Tl201 dipyridamole myocardial scintigraphy in renal transplant recipients.Renal transplant recipients should be screened for coronary artery disease. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the usefulness of thallium-201 dipyridamole myocardial perfusion single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) to predict major cardiac events in these patients.Eighty-two consecutive patients (61 males) in hemodialysis (HD) treatment, awaiting renal transplantation, underwent dipyridamole Tl-201 SPECT for pretransplant risk stratification. SPECT semiquantitative analysis showed a normal perfusion pattern in 52 patients (group A) and fixed defects in 9 (group B). Reversible perfusion defects were found in 21 (group C). Cardiac death, myocadial infarction, and unstable angina were sought as cardiac events. During a follow-up lasting 28.3 +/- 21.6 months, three patients of group A died for a non-cardiac cause. In group C, six patients (28.6%) had a cadiac event: one had a non-q wave myocardial infarction after renal transplantation; five were admitted with unstable angina. No cardiac events were observed in groups A and B (p = 0.0001). SPECT semiquantitative analysis showed that a summed difference score > or = 3 significantly increased the risk of cardiac events (odds ratio 4.5, C.I. 2.5-8.1).Cardiac events were only observed in HD patients with Tl-201 SPECT dipyridamole reversible defects (group C). A normal pattern or a fixed defect in Tl-201 dipyridamole SPECT in HD patients identified a good long-term prognosis.Pre-transplant cardiac testing for kidney-pancreas transplant candidates and association with cardiac outcomes.Coronary artery disease is a major cause of mortality following renal transplantation, especially in those patients with diabetes. The accurate prediction of cardiac risk is therefore a major focus of the pre-transplant evaluation. The objective of this study was to retrospectively evaluate the ability of non-invasive cardiac testing (standard echocardiography, stress echocardiography, exercise tolerance testing, and nuclear myocardial perfusion) performed within 1 yr of kidney-pancreas transplant to predict post-transplant myocardial infarction.Clinical history and pre-transplant cardiac testing performed within 1 yr prior to transplantation were reviewed in a non-blinded fashion for 165 kidney-pancreas transplantation patients receiving allografts between June 1990 and May 1998. The predictive values of clinical symptoms and cardiac testing for cardiac events (fatal and non-fatal myocardial infarctions) up to 1 yr post-transplant were calculated.Clinical history had a negative predictive value of 98% for cardiac events occurring within 1 yr following testing and 97% within 1 yr post-transplant. Collectively, non-invasive testing had a negative predictive value of 97% for 1 yr post-testing and 1 yr post-transplant.Clinical history alone is highly suggestive but not sufficient for the prediction of post-kidney-pancreas transplant myocardial infarction. Although a useful supplement, cardiac testing does not predict all cardiac events out to 1 yr post-testing. In this high-risk patient population with diabetes and renal failure, other methods of risk assessment are needed to more accurately predict long-term cardiac outcome for patients awaiting transplantation.Informational contribution of noninvasive screening tests for coronary artery disease in patients on chronic renal replacement therapy.The prevalence of coronary artery disease (CAD) is high in patients on renal replacement therapy; therefore, reliable noninvasive screening tests are needed. We retrospectively determined the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative likelihood ratios (LRs) for a history of chest pain, resting and exercise electrocardiography (ECG), thallium dipyridamole scintigraphy, and echocardiography in 42 patients undergoing chronic hemodialysis and 42 patients after renal transplantation who also underwent coronary angiography. In addition, the prognostic power of each test for the occurrence of a cardiovascular event after angiography (therapeutic intervention, myocardial infarction, or cardiovascular death) was evaluated during a follow-up of 37 months. Forty-three patients had significant CAD on angiography. Angina pectoris had a sensitivity of 65% and specificity of 66%, corresponding to a positive LR of 1.9 and a negative LR of 0.5. A variable number of patients underwent noninvasive tests before angiography. Results were similar in patients undergoing hemodialysis and after renal transplantation and in patients with or without angina pectoris. Exercise ECG could not be performed in the majority of patients, and resting ECG (sensitivity, 67%; specificity, 52%; corresponding to a positive LR of 1.4 and negative LR of 0.6) and scintigraphy (sensitivity, 80%; specificity, 37%; positive LR, 1.3; negative LR, 0.5) in patients on renal replacement therapy were not useful for the diagnosis of CAD. Angina also markedly increased the relative odds for the occurrence of a cardiovascular event during follow-up (relative odds, 4.6) compared with other noninvasive tests. Angina pectoris had the best informational and prognostic value of noninvasive screening methods, but angiography seems to be the only method to clearly document CAD in patients on renal replacement therapy.Preoperative dobutamine stress echocardiography versus cardiac arteriography for risk assessment prior to renal transplantation.Because coronary artery disease is the leading cause of death in patients with end-stage renal disease, we prospectively studied the prognostic value of dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE) compared to coronary angiography (CA) as an evaluative tool. Thirty-three patients at high risk for coronary artery disease were selected from a cohort of 133 renal transplant candidates and underwent both DSE and CA. In this study, the value of DSE was found to exist in its strong negative predictive value (92%). A negative DSE coupled with a negative clinical cardiac evaluation was found to practicably exclude the necessity for CA. DSE can thus serve as a non-invasive, low cost screening test.Noninvasive assessment of cardiac risk in type I diabetic patients being evaluated for combined pancreas-kidney transplantation using dipyridamole-MIBI perfusion tomographic scintigraphy.This study was performed to determine the value of dipyridamole-99m Tc-methoxy-isobutyl isonitrile perfusion (99mTC-MIBI) tomographic scintigraphy in the assessment of cardiac risk in patients being evaluated prior to combined pancreas-kidney transplantation (PKT). We performed perfusion tomographic scintigraphy using single photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) on 77 patients. The tomographic images did not show clinically relevant findings in 65 patients. In the remaining 12 patients, coronary arteriography was performed: 2 showed normal results, 4 showed no stenosis, and 6 showed significant stenosis ( > or = 70%). Seventy-two patients underwent PKT. During the follow-up (6-48 months), there were seven cardiac events, 4 patients with significant stenosis, and 3 with nonsignificant stenosis upon coronary arteriography, and all had pathological tomographic images. 99mTc-MIBI tomographic scintigraphy may be useful in identifying patients at low risk of incurring cardiac events after PKT and may, in a large group of patients, obviate the need for routine coronary angiography.Dobutamine stress echocardiography for the detection of significant coronary artery disease in renal transplant candidates.Prophylactic coronary revascularization may reduce the risk for cardiac events in diabetic renal transplant candidates. No published data exist on the accuracy of dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE) for the diagnosis of angiographically defined coronary artery disease (CAD) in renal transplant candidates. The purpose of this study is to examine the accuracy of DSE for the detection of CAD in high-risk renal transplant candidates compared with coronary angiography. Fifty renal transplant candidates with diabetic nephropathy (39 patients) or end-stage renal disease (ESRD) from other causes (11 patients) underwent prospectively performed DSE, followed by quantitative coronary angiography (QCA) and qualitative visual assessment of CAD severity. Twenty of 50 DSE tests were positive for inducible ischemia. Twenty-seven patients (54%) had a stenosis of 50% or greater by QCA, 12 patients (24%) had a stenosis of greater than 70% by QCA, and 16 patients (32%) had a stenosis greater than 75% by visual estimation. The sensitivity and specificity of DSE for CAD diagnosis were respectively 52% and 74% compared with QCA stenosis of 50% or greater, 75% and 71% compared with QCA stenosis greater than 70%, and 75% and 76% for stenosis greater than 75% by visual estimate. On long-term follow-up (22.5 +/- 10.1 months), 6 of 30 patients (20%) with negative DSE results and 11 of 20 patients (55%) with positive DSE results had a cardiac death, myocardial infarction (MI), or coronary revascularization. Six of 27 patients (22%) with a QCA stenosis of 50% or greater had a cardiac death or MI compared with none of the 23 patients (0%) with QCA stenosis less than 50% (P = 0.025). We conclude that DSE is a useful but imperfect screening test for angiographically defined CAD in renal transplant candidates.Diagnostic accuracy and prognostic value of combined dipyridamole-exercise thallium imaging in hemodialysis patients.Non-invasive detection of coronary artery disease in dialysis patients, a major cause of mortality, often remains difficult. The aim of the study was to test the diagnostic and prognostic accuracies of combined dipyridamole-exercise thallium imaging in dialysis patients.Dipyridamole-exercise thallium imaging and coronary angiography were both performed prospectively in 60 asymptomatic hemodialysis patients who were followed up, long term, by recording any major coronary event.Coronary angiography was abnormal in 13 patients (21%), and there was abnormal thallium uptake in 17 patients. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and overall accuracy of thallium to detect a coronary artery disease were 92, 89, 71, 98 and 90%, respectively. After a median follow-up of 2.8 years, 12 patients experienced at least one major coronary event (4 cardiac deaths, 5 myocardial infarctions and 3 revascularizations). Eight of the 17 patients with abnormal thallium uptake (47%) suffered a coronary event, compared to only 4 of the 43 patients (9%) with a normal thallium uptake (P < 0.001). The positive prognostic predictive value of thallium imaging was 47% and its negative predictive value was 91%. The probability of survival free of coronary events was significantly higher in patients with normal thallium uptake than in those with abnormal thallium uptake (crude risk ratio 7.6; P < 0.001) even after adjustment for several risk factors for cardiovascular disease (adjusted risk ratio 9.2; P < 0.005).In dialysis patients, combined dipyridamole-exercise thallium imaging is an accurate method for detecting coronary stenosis and for predicting future coronary events.Prognostic value of dipyridamole thallium-201 screening to minimize perioperative cardiac complications in diabetics undergoing kidney or kidney-pancreas transplantation.To minimize perioperative cardiac events, we utilize a screening protocol consisting of intravenous dipyridamole thallium-201 myocardial imaging (DPT), with the selective use of coronary angiography based on the presence of reversible defect(s) on DPT test. A retrospective study was performed to determine the prognostic value of this protocol and to identify any clinical parameters predictive of an abnormal DPT test. To accomplish this, a detailed chart analysis of 176 consecutive kidney (n = 89) and kidney-pancreas (n = 87) transplant recipients who had undergone pretransplant DPT testing was performed. The results of the DPT test were interpreted as normal in 111, fixed defect in 15, and reversible defect(s) in 50 patients. Forty-two of the 50 patients with reversible defect(s) underwent coronary angiography. Twelve of the 27 patients with significant coronary artery disease (CAD, > 50% stenosis in one or more coronary arteries) underwent pretransplant revascularization and the remaining 15 were treated medically. Cardiac events (documented acute myocardial infarction or sudden cardiac death) within 6 wk of transplant were stratified by the results of this protocol. Also, various clinical parameters were compared between patients with normal and abnormal (fixed and reversible defect) DPT tests. Only one of the 111 (0.9%) transplant recipients with a normal DPT test had a perioperative cardiac event. None of the 15 (0%) patients with a fixed defect and none of the 15 (0%) patients with reversible defect(s), but a nonsignificant (< 50% narrowing) coronary angiogram, had a perioperative cardiac event. Three of the 27 (11.1%) patients with reversible defect(s) and significant disease on coronary angiography, who had undergone pre-transplant revascularization or were managed medically, had a perioperative coronary event. Of 14 recipients parameters analyzed, age > 50 yr was the only variable predictive of an abnormal DPT test. We conclude that the incidence of perioperative cardiac events in patients with a normal or fixed defect, or reversible defect(s) but a nonsignificant (< 50% narrowing) coronary angiogram is very low, indicating the high correlation of these findings on DPT and an uneventful (cardiac) post-transplant course. The incidence of perioperative cardiac complications amongst the high-risk transplant recipients with reversible defect(s) and significant CAD on coronary angiogram may be minimized by appropriate preoperative medical management or revascularization. None of the clinical variables except age > 50 yr was predictive of an abnormal DPT test.Non-invasive cardiac investigations in patients awaiting renal transplantation.Patients with chronic renal failure undergoing renal transplantation have a high prevalence of cardiovascular disease. Invasive investigation may identify those at risk of cardiac death during or after renal transplantation, but which patients should undergo cardiac catheterization is currently not clear. In 95 patients awaiting renal transplantation we assessed the ability of echocardiography and exercise electrocardiography to identify patients at risk of cardiac death. Echocardiography identified impaired left ventricular (LV) systolic function in 20%, severe in 8%. Of the patients with severe LV dysfunction, 25% died before transplantation. Of those undergoing exercise electrocardiography, 44% did not achieve 85% of maximum predicted heart rate. No coronary artery disease requiring intervention was identified by exercise testing. These findings indicate that echocardiography, but not exercise electrocardiography, should be part of the assessment for renal transplantation.Pretransplant dobutamine stress echocardiography is useful and cost-effective in renal transplant candidates.Atherosclerotic vascular complications in diabetic transplant candidates.Serious vascular complications limit the success of renal transplantation in diabetic patients. Nearly half of diabetic transplant recipients die within 3 years after transplantation from a vascular complication. However, it has been difficult to determine before transplantation which patients are likely to do poorly. Because atherosclerosis is a systemic disease, we hypothesized that diabetic transplant candidates with pretransplant coronary artery disease would be at high risk for vascular complications even if asymptomatic at the time of pretransplant evaluation. Our hypothesis was that insulin-dependent (IDDM) transplant candidates with coronary artery disease identified with pretransplant coronary angiography would have an increased number of vascular events (amputation, cerebral vascular accident [CVA], or myocardial infarction [MI]) within 3 years of follow-up. We prospectively studied 198 consecutive diabetic transplant candidates grouped on the basis of coronary artery disease. Group 1 patients had no stenosis that was 50% or greater, group 2 patients had one or more stenoses between 50% and 74%, and group 3 patients had one or more stenoses of 75% or greater. During median follow-up of 41 months, 64 patients experienced 98 amputations, 28 MIs, and seven CVAs. At 36 months of follow-up, 55% of group 3 patients, 30% of group 2 patients, and 11% of group 1 patients had experienced a vascular event (P < 0.001). Cox regression confirmed the association of coronary artery disease with subsequent vascular events. Patients with coronary artery disease had a sevenfold increased risk of amputation and a fourfold increased risk of myocardial infarction. Six of seven CVAs occurred in patients with coronary artery disease. We conclude that coronary artery disease identified at pretransplant evaluation is associated with an increased risk of noncoronary vascular complications within 3 years after evaluation.Evaluation of diabetic patients for renal and pancreas transplantation: noninvasive screening for coronary artery disease using radionuclide methods.Pharmacologic stress thallium scintigraphy is commonly performed in the risk assessment of diabetic patients with nephropathy before kidney and/or pancreas transplantation; however, controversy exists regarding the test's accuracy in detecting coronary artery disease. Our purpose was to compare pharmacologic stress thallium scintigraphy and also exercise radionuclide ventriculography with coronary angiography in diabetic patients undergoing evaluation for transplantation. In addition, we also determined the association of the test results with outcome after transplantation. The medical records of 47 patients (mean age, 37+/-9 years) without clinical evidence of coronary artery disease were reviewed. Forty-one patients had pharmacologic stress thallium scintigraphy performed during their evaluation. Sensitivity was 62% and specificity was 76% for detecting > or = 75% coronary artery stenosis (sensitivity was 53% and specificity was 73% for > or = 50% stenosis). Thirty-five patients had exercise radionuclide ventriculography performed. Sensitivity was 50% and specificity was 67% for detecting > or = 75% coronary artery stenosis (sensitivity was 44% and specificity was 63% for > or = 50% stenosis). Thirty patients had both pharmacologic stress thallium scintigraphy and exercise radionuclide ventriculography performed; when either test was abnormal, sensitivity in the detection of > or = 50% or > or = 75% stenosis tended to increase compared with pharmacologic stress thallium scintigraphy alone (0.05<P<0.10), whereas specificity decreased (P<0.01). The incidence of adverse cardiac outcomes was identical for patients with abnormal thallium scintigrams and undergoing transplantation (2/11) compared with patients with normal scintigrams and undergoing transplantation (4/22). We conclude that: (1) pharmacologic stress thallium scintigraphy and exercise radionuclide ventriculography are suboptimal screening tests for coronary artery disease in diabetic patients awaiting kidney and/or pancreas transplantation; (2) using the two radionuclide tests in combination results in a decrease in specificity; and (3) patients with abnormal thallium scintigrams can receive transplants with outcomes similar to those for patients with normal thallium scintigrams.[Diagnostic value of myocardial thallium stress scintigraphy in the detection of coronary artery disease in patients undergoing chronic hemodialysis].Atherosclerotic heart disease is the leading cause of death in patients with end stage renal disease, but its non invasive detection remains difficult because of a low efficacy of exercise testing. The aim of the study was to evaluate diagnostic accuracy of thallium myocardial imaging after dipyridamole combined with exercise. Forty two chronic dialysis patients (34 men, 8 women) aged 55 +/- 11 years (range: 36 to 75) without symptom of angina nor myocardial infarction were studied. In each patient, an echocardiography, a myocardial scintigraphy with dipyridamole combined with symptom-limited exercise, and coronarography were performed. A coronary heart disease was diagnosed by coronarography in 10 patients (4.5 and 1 respectively with 1, 2 and 3 vessels diseased). Echocardiography detected a left ventricular hypertrophy (LVH) in 26 patients and a regional asynergia in 14 patients. A positive scintigraphy was present in 11 patients. Three false-positive and 2 false-negative on scintigraphy were noted. Sensibility, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were respectively evaluated at 80, 73, 73 and 93%. All the five patients with either false-positive or false-negative scintigraphy exhibited a LVH. CONCLUSION. In chronic dialysis patients, coronary heart disease may be detected by thallium myocardial imaging after dipyridamole combined with exercise.Usefulness of dobutamine stress echocardiography in detecting coronary artery disease in end-stage renal disease.The cardiovascular evaluation of patients with end-stage renal disease (ESRD) has been hampered by the suboptimal sensitivity and specificity of currently employed diagnostic tests. Dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE) is a recently developed technique which is accurate for the diagnosis of coronary artery disease (CAD) in general populations. The purpose of this study was to assess its diagnostic accuracy and prognostic implications in patients with ESRD. Patients with ESRD (n = 97) underwent DSE as part of a preoperative evaluation before being listed for renal transplantation. Patients were followed for 12 +/- 6 months (range 1 to 24) after the study. Rest and dobutamine stress echocardiograms were analyzed for regional and global function. Coronary angiography was performed in 30 patients, and 25 underwent renal transplantation in the follow-up period. DSE had a sensitivity of 95% (92% for 1-vessel, 100% for > or = 2-vessel disease), specificity of 86%, and accuracy of 90% for the detection of CAD. During the follow-up period, 6 patients died; DSE revealed inducible ischemia in 4, and catheterization before death revealed multivessel CAD in 2. Conversely, a normal DSE identified a very low risk population, with a 97% probability of being free of cardiac complications or death during the follow-up period. We conclude that DSE accurately identifies CAD in patients with ESRD and identifies a cohort of patients at low risk for cardiac complications.Preoperative evaluation for diabetic renal transplantation: impact of clinical, laboratory, and echocardiographic parameters on patient and allograft survival.To assess the impact on renal transplant patients and graft survival of clinical, laboratory, and echocardiographic parameters commonly measured prior to surgery.Forty-seven consecutive diabetics with preoperative echocardiograms at the time of transplantation.Clinical history, standard chest roentgenogram, electrocardiogram, blood tests, echocardiograms, and HLA testing at baseline; follow-up from 2 to 7 years with periodic reassessment of graft function.Patient survival did not appear to be influenced by age, sex, or type of allograft. A history of either myocardial infarction, congestive heart failure, or angina was present in 15 patients with 3-year survival of 50% (72% if not present, p less than 0.05). Histocompatibility testing did not impact on survival. Serum sodium, potassium, calcium, phosphate, and calcium-phosphate product did not discern different survival groups. A hematocrit greater than 30% was present in 15 patients with 3-year survival of 43% (73% if not present, p less than 0.05). Greater than 10% antibody sensitization of the recipient resulted in a 3-year survival of 38% in eight patients (68% if not present, p less than 0.05). Radiologic evidence of cardiomegaly or congestive heart failure and standard electrocardiographic evidence for left ventricular hypertrophy or strain did not impact on survival. Echocardiographic measurements of left ventricular end-diastolic diameter, posterior wall thickness, or ejection fraction were also not predictive. Increased end-systolic diameter (10 patients, 30% 3-year survival versus 69%, p less than 0.05) and decreased velocity of circumferential fiber shortening (11 patients, 45% 3-year survival versus 71%, p less than 0.05) both appeared to be related to survival. Increased accuracy of prediction could be obtained by adding risk factors so that a history of coronary artery disease and increased end-systolic diameter predicted 3-year survival of 42% versus 82% if neither was present. In terms of graft survival, no clinical, radiographic, or electrocardiographic result yielded predictive information. Among the laboratory tests, only highly antibody-sensitized patients (eight patients, 0% 3-year survival versus 66% 3-year survival, p less than 0.001) showed different survival patterns. Echocardiographic elevated end-systolic diameter predicted a significantly (p less than 0.001) decreased graft survival (3-year survival 33% versus 63%).Preoperative prediction of patient and graft survival in diabetic renal transplantation may be enhanced by echocardiographic assessment of systolic load and function. For patients with normal systolic function, whose hematocrit is below 30%, with preformed antibodies less than 10%, renal transplantation has an excellent prognosis; invasive cardiac procedures are not likely required. Since these risk factors are likely additive, a high-risk group may be identified. These latter patients should undergo coronary angiography.Noninvasive assessment of cardiac risk in insulin-dependent diabetic patients being evaluated for pancreatic transplantation using thallium-201 myocardial perfusion scintigraphy.We examined the value of thallium-201 myocardial perfusion scintigraphy in noninvasive assessment of cardiac risk in 36 insulin-dependent (type 1) diabetic patients being evaluated for pancreas or combined pancreas/kidney transplantation. An extensive cardiovascular evaluation including electrocardiogram was performed in all patients, and most patients were also evaluated by two-dimensional and Doppler echocardiography. Exercise thallium studies were performed in 31 patients. Five patients were unable to exercise and underwent dipyridamole-thallium study. The thallium images were abnormal in 12 patients, 10 of whom underwent coronary arteriography. Significant coronary artery disease was found in 7 of these patients. Nineteen patients underwent pancreatic (3 patients) or pancreato-renal (16) transplantation without any occurrence of cardiac death or nonfatal myocardial infarction peri-operatively or on follow-up ranging from 7 months to 21 months. In contrast, 3 cardiac events occurred in 12 patients not approved for transplantation, each of whom had an abnormal thallium study exhibiting significant ischemia. Resting left ventricular global and regional function was not helpful in determining perioperative risk. Thus, thallium-201 myocardial perfusion scintigraphy may be useful in identifying diabetic patients at low risk for pancreas transplantation and may obviate the need for routine coronary angiography in these patients.Thallium stress testing does not predict cardiovascular risk in diabetic patients with end-stage renal disease undergoing cadaveric renal transplantation.This study assessed the usefulness of thallium stress testing as a predictor of perioperative cardiovascular risk in diabetic patients with end-stage renal disease undergoing cadaveric renal transplantation. Demographic factors influencing the exercise performance in these patients were also examined.The medical records of 189 consecutive patients with diabetic nephropathy who were evaluated for cadaveric renal transplantation were reviewed. Thallium stress testing was the initial examination of cardiovascular status in 141 patients. An adequate examination was one in which at least 70% of maximum heart rate was achieved. A thallium stress test was normal if there were no ST segment depressions on the electrocardiogram and no perfusion abnormalities on the thallium scan. Forty-four patients underwent cardiac catheterization as the initial evaluation (Group C) and four patients underwent transplantation without a formal cardiovascular evaluation (Group D).Sixty-four of the 141 patients undergoing thallium stress testing had an adequate and normal examination (Group A). The incidence of perioperative cardiac events in this group was 2%. Seventy-seven patients (Group B) had an abnormal (n = 41) or an inadequate (n = 36) thallium stress test and most (n = 61) then underwent coronary angiography. The use of beta-blockers was the only predictor of an abnormal or inadequate thallium stress test (10 of 64 versus 27 of 77, chi 2 = 6.66, p less than or equal to 0.025). Forty-three percent (26 of 61 in Group B) of patients with inadequate or abnormal thallium stress tests had significant coronary artery disease on cardiac catheterization. The perioperative risk of cardiac events was not different in Group A versus Groups B, C, and D combined. Survival of Group A and B patients was not different but was significantly longer than that of Group C patients (p less than 0.001). Thallium stress testing was less expensive than cardiac catheterization ($1,000 versus $4,000 to $5,000).Thallium stress testing allowed 45% of patients to avoid cardiac catheterization before renal transplantation. Discontinuing beta-blockers before thallium stress tests may improve exercise performance. The risk of perioperative cardiac events after transplantation was low and not different among patient groups. The relatively low predictive value of thallium stress testing for significant coronary artery disease and perioperative cardiac events in diabetic patients with end-stage renal disease suggests the need for the development of a more cost-effective, noninvasive screening test for this patient population.Assessment of coronary artery disease by thallium scan in type-1 diabetic uremic patients awaiting combined pancreas and renal transplantation.Twenty-five type-1 diabetic uremic patients (14 men, 11 women, mean age forty +/- eleven years, range, nineteen to sixty) were prospectively analyzed for coronary artery disease (CAD) by thallium scan (TLS) before synchronus pancreas and kidney transplantation. Duration of diabetes ranged from ten to thirty-two years (mean twenty-two +/- five). Fifteen patients (60%) were in dialysis from two to sixty months (mean twenty +/- eighteen). Advanced diabetic degenerative complications were present in all patients. Twenty exercise and five pharmacologic thallium scans were performed. Forty-four percent of patients (6 men, 5 women, mean age forty-two +/- eleven years, range, twenty-six to sixty) had a positive (reversible or permanent defects) TLS. In 2/11 cases, severe CAD required further cardiac investigations for therapeutic management decision. A statistical correlation with resting ECG nonspecific ST-segment and T-wave abnormalities was observed (p less than 0.05) despite the absence of angor in 8 of the 11 patients. On the contrary, no statistical correlations were found regarding high blood pressure, smoking, hypercholesterolemia, duration of diabetes, and duration of dialysis. In this particular diabetic population (young age, male/female ratio = 1.2) with high incidence of silent ischemia, resting ECG repolarization abnormalities, though predictive, were not specific or prognostic of CAD severity; in these cases, exercise and pharmacologic TLS, a noninvasive and sensitive cardiovascular test, may be of great interest in diagnosis of CAD, allowing adequate cardiac management before, during, and after pancreas transplantation.Predictive value of thallium-201-dipyridamole myocardial stress scintigraphy in chronic hemodialysis patients and transplant recipients.The prognostic impact of thallium(Tl)-201-dipyridamole (DPM) stress and redistribution scintigraphy done in 36 patients on chronic hemodialysis (HD) and in 23 renal transplant recipients (TRs) was evaluated according to cardiovascular complications and survival in a follow-up period of six years. Though symptomatic ischemic heart disease (IHD) was present in 33% of HD patients and in 17% of TRs, 50% and 39%, respectively, had Tl-201 findings indicative of IHD. The duration of HD treatment was similar for patients with an abnormal or normal scintigraphic finding. Abnormal Tl-201 results were seen more frequently in older patients. During follow-up, 27 of 36 HD-patients died, 16 had an abnormal and 11 a normal Tl-201-DPM finding; cardiovascular complications were the cause of death in 88% and 18% of these patients, respectively. Thus the incidence of death from fatal cardiac events was 12% per year at risk for the former and 1.9% per year at risk for the latter. In TRs survival was not different for patients with an abnormal or normal Tl-201 finding (56% vs. 64%). However, fatal or nonfatal cardiovascular events were seen more frequently in patients with an abnormal Tl-201 results (78% versus 7%; p less than 0.0001). Stepwise logistic analysis and survival analysis demonstrated Tl-201-DPM stress/redistribution scintigraphy to be the only predictor for identifying patients at increased risk for cardiovascular events. In patients with abnormal Tl-201-DPM scintigraphy subsequent survival was extended for symptomatic patients as compared to asymptomatic ones )30.3 +/- 21.6 versus 22.0 +/- 17.3 months; p less than 0.008).Prognostic value of intravenous dipyridamole thallium imaging in patients with diabetes mellitus considered for renal transplantation.Patients with diabetes and end-stage renal failure are known to have a high risk for cardiac morbidity and mortality associated with renal transplantation. The most efficient method to determine preoperative cardiac risk has not been established. To determine the effectiveness of intravenous dipyridamole thallium imaging in predicting cardiac events, 40 diabetic renal transplant candidates were studied preoperatively in a prospective trial. The study group consisted of 40 patients whose average age was 42 years (range 27 to 64); 34 (85%) were hypertensive and 21 (53%) were cigarette smokers. Cardiac history included chest pain in 6 patients and prior myocardial infarction in 3 patients. Dipyridamole thallium imaging showed reversible defects in 9 patients, fixed defects in 8 patients and normal scans in 23 patients. Dipyridamole thallium imaging was performed using 0.56 mg/kg of dipyridamole infused intravenously over 4 minutes. Cardiac events occurred only in patients with reversible thallium defects, of which there were 6. Of these 6 patients, 3 had cardiac events before transplantation and 3 had them in the early postoperative phase (within 6 weeks of surgery). Of 21 patients who underwent renal transplantation, 3 had cardiac events within 6 weeks of transplantation. The average duration of follow-up was 11 months (range 1 to 21). Thus, dipyridamole thallium imaging is an effective method of identifying renal transplant candidates likely to develop cardiac complications. Routine coronary angiography may not be necessary to screen all renal transplant candidates for coronary artery disease before surgery.Perfusion thallium imaging of type I diabetes patients with end stage renal disease: comparison of oral and intravenous dipyridamole administration.Eighty patients with type I diabetes and end stage renal disease were prospectively evaluated for coronary artery disease with dipyridamole-thallium-201 scintigraphy and quantitative coronary angiography. Forty patients received dipyridamole orally, and 40 received it intravenously. The prevalence of coronary artery disease was 53%. There were no significant differences in the accuracy of the two dipyridamole tests (sensitivity = 85%, specificity = 85%, accuracy = 85% for the oral group; sensitivity = 86%, specificity = 72%, accuracy = 79% for the intravenous group). Combining the 80 patients into a single group gave a sensitivity of 86%, a specificity of 79%, and an accuracy of 83% for the detection of coronary disease. Although the accuracy of this test in this patient population was similar to that previously reported for other groups, the prevalence of disease was high and resulted in a low predictive value of a negative test (83%).Ineffectiveness of dipyridamole SPECT thallium imaging as a screening technique for coronary artery disease in patients with end-stage renal failure.The efficacy of dipyridamole single photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) thallium as a screening test for coronary artery disease (CAD), was studied in 45 patients with end-stage renal failure undergoing evaluation for renal transplantation. Coronary arteriography, dipyridamole SPECT thallium imaging and clinical follow-up were performed in all patients. Nineteen patients (42%) had an obstruction of 50% or more in at least one coronary artery. Fourteen patients had a positive thallium scan, but 7 of these were false-positives (sensitivity 37%, specificity 73%). The sensitivity was considerably lower than that quoted for non-ESRF patients in the literature, and significantly lower than a control group of 19 patients without ESRF having comparable severity and distribution of CAD. Five of the 6 patients who died of cardiac causes over a mean follow-up period of 25 months had normal thallium imaging, but all had significant coronary artery disease at cardiac catheterization. Dipyridamole SPECT thallium imaging has not proved a useful screening test for angiographically significant CAD, and does not predict cardiac prognosis in this population.Cardiac evaluation of candidates for kidney transplantation: value of exercise radionuclide angiocardiography.In view of the high incidence and mortality of coronary artery disease (CAD) in patients with kidney transplantation, a systematic cardiac evaluation was prospectively performed in 103 uraemic patients eligible for transplantation. After clinical examination, 28 patients with symptoms of CAD or diabetes mellitus were referred directly for coronary angiography, whereas the remaining 75 patients had rest and exercise radionuclide angiocardiography for evaluation of possible asymptomatic CAD. Among them, left ventricular ejection fraction was below 40% at rest or fell during exercise by at least 5 EF% in 12 patients; coronary angiography in nine showed CAD in four and hypertensive heart disease in five. In the remaining 63 (of 75) patients without severe resting left ventricular dysfunction or exercise ischaemia, the follow-up of 28 +/- 7 months revealed no clinical manifestation of CAD. Overall incidence of CAD in symptomatic and asymptomatic patients during a follow-up of 27 months after cardiac evaluation was 20 and 25% in nondiabetic and diabetic candidates for kidney transplantation, respectively (P = n.s.). Thus, clinical examination combined with exercise radionuclide angiocardiography in patients without signs or symptoms of heart disease had a high predictive accuracy for presence or absence of late manifestations of CAD. Exercise radionuclide angiocardiography is therefore a useful method for screening kidney transplantation candidates for asymptomatic CAD.Use of digital subtraction fluorography in screening for coronary artery disease in patients with chronic renal failure.The diagnosis of coronary artery disease remains a major problem in patients with end-stage renal disease. Screening with conventional noninvasive techniques is limited by the poor exercise capacity of these patients. This study evaluated the accuracy of digital subtraction fluorography in detecting coronary calcification as a noninvasive, nonexercise screening test for coronary artery disease. Eighty-six patients under evaluation for renal transplantation and considered at increased risk of coronary artery disease were studied by coronary arteriography and digital subtraction fluorography for coronary calcification. Significant coronary disease (greater than or equal to 50% obstruction in at least one vessel) was present in 36 (42%) patients. The detection of coronary calcification by digital subtraction fluorography had a sensitivity of 78% and a specificity of 66%. The probability of disease being present in the absence of coronary calcification in this group was 18%. The detection of coronary calcification by digital subtraction fluorography appears to be a satisfactory and inexpensive screening test in this setting.Evaluation of cardiovascular risk for renal transplantation in diabetic patients.Cardiovascular disease contributes in a major way to morbidity and mortality in diabetic patients with end-stage renal disease. Sixty patients with type I diabetes were evaluated prior to renal transplantation to determine the risk of cardiovascular complications. On the basis of results of thallium stress testing and/or cardiac catheterization, each patient was assigned to one of five categories. There were no cardiovascular events in the seven patients who had negative results on stress testing. Of the remaining 53 patients, all of whom underwent cardiac catheterization, 30 had normal coronary arteries. None of these 30 patients had any cardiac morbidity, and the two deaths that occurred in this group were not attributable to cardiac causes. Significant coronary artery disease was present in 38 percent of the patients. The overall mortality rate was 5.4 percent in those patients without coronary artery disease and 43.5 percent in those with the disease. In addition, the mortality rate in patients with coronary disease classified as severe was 62 percent, whereas it was 20 percent in those categorized as having moderate disease. The data indicate that patients with diabetes and end-stage renal disease who are at highest risk for cardiovascular events can be identified, and these patients probably should not undergo renal transplantation.Coronary artery disease in 100 diabetics with end-stage renal failure.Predictive value of thallium stress testing for coronary and cardiovascular events in uremic diabetic patients before renal transplantation.Coronary artery disease and the ability of noninvasive exercise perfusion imaging with thallium-201 to predict future coronary and cardiovascular events was prospectively evaluated in a group of 85 insulin-dependent diabetic renal transplantation candidates. Sixty patients received renal allografts (36 living related donors, 24 cadaver donors) after a thallium stress test; the actuarial 2 year patient survival rate after transplantation was 84 percent. Twenty-five patients remained on dialysis, and the 2 year actuarial survival rate from onset of dialysis was 41 percent, significantly lower than the actuarial survival rate of transplanted patients (p less than 0.01). Thirteen transplanted patients had positive thallium stress test results, and 6 (46 percent) had cardiovascular events (two fatal). In contrast, of 47 transplant patients with negative thallium stress test results, only 13 (28 percent) had cardiovascular events (four fatal). Five patients treated by hemodialysis only had positive test results and three (60 percent) had cardiovascular events (two fatal), whereas of 20 hemodialysis patients with negative test results, 9 (45 percent) suffered cardiovascular events (four fatal). In this study, cardiovascular events included arrhythmia, stroke, and pulmonary embolism. Within the total group, 4 of 18 patients (22 percent) with a positive test result (22 percent) had a fatal myocardial infarction, whereas only 3 of 67 patients (4 percent) with a negative result had a fatal myocardial infarction (p less than 0.05). In comparison, 24 of 85 patients had a history or electrocardiographic evidence of preexisting cardiovascular disease, and 13 (54 percent) had subsequent cardiovascular events (5 of 11 patients with positive test results and 8 of 13 patients with negative results). In summary, renal transplant candidates with positive thallium stress test results appear to be at increased risk compared with those with negative results for the development of fatal myocardial infarction, but thallium stress testing is no more predictive for future coronary and cardiovascular events than is a history or an abnormal electrocardiogram.Asymptomatic coronary artery disease: angiographic assessment of diabetics evaluated for renal transplantation.Twenty-one insulin-dependent diabetics with azotemic nephropathy were evaluated for renal transplantation by selective coronary angiography and cine left ventriculography. All had hypertension, retinopathy, neuropathy, and required salt restriction plus diuretics for volume overload. There was no clinical or electrocardiographic evidence of ischemic coronary artery disease in twenty. Ten patients (five males, five females, mean age 29.3 years; mean duration of diabetes 21.9 years; mean serum cholesterol 239 mg%) had significant coronary artery disease, seven demonstrating focal abnormalities in left ventricular wall motion. Two patients (one male, one female; mean age 36.5 years; mean duration of diabetes 28.5 years; mean serum cholesterol 250 mg%) had no significant coronary artery disease, but demonstrated diffusely abnormal left ventricular wall motion with diminished ejection fraction. Thirty-eight percent had significant coronary artery disease unpredictable by electrocardiographic or clinical data. The finding of no significant coronary artery disease in 52% of a group with severe renal-hypertensive complications of diabetes is surprising. Two patients may have a demonstrated cardiomyopathy.Natural history of asymptomatic coronary arteriographic lesions in diabetic patients with end-stage renal disease.Arteriosclerotic heart disease is a major cause of death in insulin-requiring juvenile diabetic patients treated for end-stage renal disease. Eleven consecutive diabetic patients without clinical evidence of coronary artery disease underwent complete cardiac evaluations, including coronary arteriography, as part of transplant recipient work-ups. Seven were women and four were men; their mean age was 32 (21 to 50 years). Angiographically, every patient had multifocal atherosclerotic coronary disease. Four of seven patients tested had positive-stress electrocardiograms. In this group of patients followed for a mean of 19.8 months, eight died. Of these deaths, six were due to coronary heart disease and another due to a stroke. In two patients who became clinically symptomatic, serial angiograms revealed progressive disease of the coronary circulation; in one case, despite normal renal allograft function and serum lipid levels. The mode of end-stage renal disease treatment, serum lipids or blood pressure control could not be linked to mortality. It is concluded that arteriosclerotic heart disease is common in diabetic patients with end-stage renal disease even when angina is absent. The natural history in this high risk population is an important consideration in the selection of patients for end-stage renal disease treatment.Coronary computed tomography angiography in dialysis patients undergoing pre-renal transplantation cardiac risk stratification.This study addresses the safety, feasibility, and interpretability of coronary computed tomography angiography (CCTA) in excluding significant coronary artery disease in end-stage renal disease patients on dialysis undergoing pre-renal transplant cardiac risk evaluation.Twenty nine patients (55.5 +/- 10.2 years) undergoing cardiac risk assessment prior to renal transplantation, underwent research CCTA with calcium scoring and formed the study group. All CCTAs were performed using retrospective acquisition, with beta-blockade provided one hour prior to scanning.No major complications occurred in this group up to 30 days after CCTA. Of the total of 374 segments interpreted by both readers, only 36 (10%) were uninterpretable by both readers. Of these, 31 (86%) were from distal segments or branches. On a segmental level, there was 95% concordance between both readers for < 50% stenosis detection. Only three out of 28 (11%) CCTAs were deemed uninterpretable. Ten patients (36%) had zero calcium score, despite being on dialysis with no evidence of obstructive coronary artery disease by CCTA.CCTA is feasible and safe in end-stage renal disease dialysis patients with the advent of 64-slice CCTA. Despite significant calcium burden, there was excellent inter-observer agreement at segment level for the left main and all three proximal-mid coronary arteries in excluding obstructive coronary artery disease (> 50% stenosis).A preoperative echocardiographic predictive model for assessment of cardiovascular outcome after renal transplantation.Major adverse cardiac events (MACE) frequently determine the outcome of renal transplantation (RT). Stress testing is advocated for preoperative risk assessment, but limited information is available on the prognostic value of these tests. We aimed to retrospectively assess the value of preoperative dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE) in predicting MACE in patients undergoing RT.A total of 185 patients (age 56 +/- 11 years, 64% were men, creatinine level of 7.3 +/- 2.9 mg/d, 27% were smokers, 86% had hypertension, 54% had diabetes, 57% were dyslipidemic) with end-stage renal disease (ESRD) underwent DSE before RT. A standard DSE protocol was used with the administration of 5-50 mug/kg/min incremental doses in 3-minute intervals and up to 1 mg of atropine if needed to reach prespecified end points.Regional left ventricular wall motion abnormality (WMA) at rest (fixed), with stress (inducible), or both were present in 54, 35, and 18 patients, respectively. In 38 patients who underwent coronary angiography, the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of inducible WMA for predicting angiographic coronary artery disease (> or = 70% luminal diameter reduction) were 88%, 62%, 65%, and 87%, respectively. Cox regression analysis identified the presence of combined fixed and inducible WMA (ie, resting WMA that did not change during DSE, accompanied by new WMA evident during DSE; hazard ratio [HR] 5.6, P = .012), left atrial enlargement (HR 4.2, P = .002), and aortic valve sclerosis (HR 3.9, P = .013) as independent predictors of 48-month MACE (cardiac death, nonfatal acute myocardial infarction, and coronary revascularization after RT). Patients with all 3 predictors had a 48-month MACE of 60% compared with 5% in those with none (P = .007). Compared with those without WMA, patients with both fixed and inducible WMA had a higher rate of MACE at 48 months (7% vs 33%, P = .004).In RT candidates, DSE can effectively identify those at low and high risk of MACE.Myocardial scintigraphy and clinical stratification as predictors of events in renal transplant candidates.We tested the hypothesis that the universal application of myocardial scanning with single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) would result in better risk stratification in renal transplant candidates (RTC) compared with SPECT being restricted to patients who, in addition to renal disease, had other clinical risk factors.RTCs (n=363) underwent SPECT and clinical risk stratification according to the American Society of Transplantation (AST) algorithm and were followed up until a major adverse cardiovascular event (MACE) or death.Of the 363 patients, 79 patients (22%) had an abnormal SPECT scan and 270 (74%) were classified as high risk. Both methods correctly identified patients with increased probability of MACE. However, clinical stratification performed better (sensitivity and negative predictive value 99% and 99% vs. 25% and 87%, respectively). High-risk patients with an abnormal SPECT scan had a modest increased risk of events (log-rank = 0.03; hazard ratio [HR] = 1.37; 95% confidence interval [95% CI], 1.02-1.82). Eighty-six patients underwent coronary angiography, and coronary artery disease (CAD) was found in 60%. High-risk patients with CAD had an increased incidence of events (log-rank = 0.008; HR=3.85; 95% CI, 1.46-13.22), but in those with an abnormal SPECT scan, the incidence of events was not influenced by CAD (log-rank = 0.23). Forty-six patients died. Clinical stratification, but not SPECT, correlated with the probability of death (log-rank = 0.02; HR=3.25; 95% CI, 1.31-10.82).SPECT should be restricted to high-risk patients. Moreover, in contrast to SPECT, the AST algorithm was also useful for predicting death by any cause in RTCs and for selecting patients for invasive coronary testing.Comparison of the prognostic value of dipyridamole and dobutamine myocardial perfusion scintigraphy in hemodialysis patients.Screening for coronary artery disease (CAD) in hemodialysis patients is hampered by contraindications and/or limitations of the available techniques in this population. Myocardial perfusion scintigraphy (MPS) using dipyridamole has been considered inaccurate due to abnormally high basal levels of adenosine in uremia that could blunt the vasodilatory response. Since dobutamine may be more reliable, we directly compared the two in patients on hemodialysis. We performed MPS at rest and after separate dipyridamole or dobutamine stress in 121 chronic hemodialysis patients. More numerous, larger, and more intense reversible lesions were induced with dobutamine than with dipyridamole, mainly in the anteroseptal segments. Reversibility with dipyridamole but not dobutamine MPS was independently and strongly related with mortality associated with CAD and with fatal and non-fatal CAD. We hypothesize that the chronotropic action of dobutamine induced alterations of wall motion, leading to spurious perfusion defects, not unlike artifacts seen with left bundle branch block. Our study shows that even though dobutamine induced more pronounced myocardial ischemia than dipyridamole in chronic hemodialysis patients, dipyridamole MPS more accurately identifies patients at high risk for subsequent cardiac death or non-fatal CAD than dobutamine.The diagnostic and prognostic value of tissue Doppler imaging during dobutamine stress echocardiography in end-stage renal disease.To determine whether a quantitative measurement of peak systolic velocity (PSV) during dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE) detects severe coronary artery disease (CAD) and predicts mortality in patients with end-stage renal disease.One hundred and forty renal transplant candidates had DSE and coronary angiography. DSE analysis was performed using conventional visual wall motion assessment, longitudinal PSV, and combining the two modalities. Failure of PSV to rise by more than 50% predicted an ischemic response. Significant CAD was defined as luminal stenosis greater than 70%.The number of positive DSE studies according to conventional, PSV, and combined criteria was 41 (30%), 42 (31%), and 46 (34%) respectively. Forty patients (29%) had significant CAD at angiography. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values for conventional DSE analysis were 84, 91, 86, and 90% respectively. The same values for PSV analysis were 86, 92, 86, and 91%, respectively. The same values for the combination of visual and PSV analysis were 88, 94, 87, and 92% respectively. The differences between the three methods were not statistically significant. Sensitivity for single-vessel CAD (P=0.05) and circumflex artery disease (P=0.05) diagnosis was higher with PSV compared with conventional DSE analysis. Failure of PSV to rise by more than 50% during DSE was associated with significantly increased mortality (P=0.001).A quantitative interpretation of DSE, based on the percentage rise of PSV during stress, accurately detects CAD and predicts prognosis in end-stage renal disease.Role of myocardial perfusion imaging in patients with end-stage renal disease undergoing coronary angiography.Patients with end-stage renal disease (ESRD) are at high risk of cardiovascular events. This study examined the prognostic power of stress myocardial perfusion imaging (MPI) in 150 patients with ESRD (mean age 53 +/- 9 years; 30% women; 66% with diabetes mellitus) being evaluated for renal transplantation with known coronary anatomy using angiography. Baseline data in addition to perfusion and angiographic parameters were compared between survivors and nonsurvivors. All-cause mortality was defined as the outcome measure. An abnormal MPI result was present in 85% of patients, 30% had left ventricular (LV) ejection fraction (EF) < or =40%, and 40% had multivessel coronary artery disease using angiography. At a mean follow-up of 3.4 +/- 1.5 years, 53 patients died (35%). LVEF < or =40%, LV dilatation (LV end-diastolic volume >90 ml), and diabetes mellitus were associated with higher mortality (all p <0.05). Both total perfusion defect size and mean number of narrowed coronary arteries using angiography were significantly higher in those who died (p <0.05). In a multivariate model, abnormal MPI results (low LVEF or abnormal perfusion) and diabetes alone were independent predictors of death, whereas number of narrowed arteries using coronary angiography was not. Thus, MPI was a strong predictor of all-cause mortality in patients with ESRD. In conclusion, abnormal MPI results independently predicted worse survival and provided more powerful prognostic data than coronary angiography.Technetium myocardial perfusion scanning in prerenal transplant evaluation in the United kingdom.Because death with a functioning graft remains one of the most important causes of long-term renal transplant failure, cardiac risk stratification and screening for coronary artery disease are essential components of pretransplant assessment. Pretransplant screening for occult coronary artery disease in a subset of these patients may improve outcome. The UK follows the European Best practice guideline 1.5.5 E. Although echocardiography, thallium myocardial perfusion scanning (MPS), dobutamine stress echocardiography, and coronary angiography have been suggested as means of cardiovascular assessment, the best means of assessment remains undetermined. Therefore, we investigated the role of 99m technetium sestamibi myocardial perfusion scanning as an assessment tool for identifying those patients with end-stage renal failure at high risk of cardiovascular death after renal transplantation. Retrospectively, we studied 126 patients that had a MPS as part of their pretransplant assessment. Overall unadjusted survival was 65% at 3 years. Twelve deaths resulted from cardiovascular causes. A reversible defect on MPS was associated with a fatal cardiac event and all-cause mortality. The unadjusted hazard ratio of cardiac event with reversible defect on MPS was 3.1 (95% confidence interval, 1.1 to 18.2) and hazard ratio of death with reversible defect on MPS was 1.92 (95% confidence interval, 1.1 to 4.4). Thus, MPS may be a useful tool in cardiac risk stratification and in selecting patients with a favorable outcome after renal transplantation. Our patients with a reversible defect in particular have increased cardiac mortality. This group may benefit from coronary angiography.Prognostic value of cardiovascular screening in potential renal transplant recipients: a single-center prospective observational study.We assessed the outcome of pretransplant cardiac assessment in a single center. Three hundred patients with end-stage renal disease underwent electrocardiogram, Bruce exercise testing (ETT) and ventricular assessment by cardiac MRI. Patients with high index of suspicion of coronary artery disease (CAD) underwent coronary angiography and percutaneous coronary intervention (PCI) if indicated. Two hundred and twenty-two patients were accepted onto the renal transplant waiting list; 80 patients were transplanted during the follow-up period and 60 died (7 following transplantation). Successful transplantation was associated with improved survival (mean survival 4.5 +/- 0.6 years vs. listed not transplanted 4.1 +/- 1.4 years vs. not listed 3.1 +/- 1.7 years; p < 0.001). Ninety-nine patients underwent coronary angiography; 65 had normal or low-grade CAD and 34 obstructive CAD. Seventeen patients (5.6%) were treated by PCI. There was no apparent survival difference between patients who underwent PCI or coronary artery bypass graft compared to those who underwent angiography without intervention or no angiography (p = 0.67). Factors associated with nonlisting for renal transplantation included burden of preexisting cardiovascular disease, poor exercise tolerance and severity of CAD. Pretransplant cardiovascular screening provides prognostic information and information that can be used to restrict access to transplantation. However, if the aim is to identify and treat CAD, the benefits are far from clear.[Prognostic value of dobutamine stress echocardiography in patients with terminal renal insufficiency undergoing hemodialysis--a 5-year follow up].Patients with end-stage renal failure have high morbidity and mortality rates due to cardiovascular complications. Screening for coronary heart disease in these patients is of utmost importance. The aim of this study was to investigate the prognostic value of the dobutamine test in patients on hemodyalisis during a 5-year follow-up period.During the pretransplantation period, 24 patients on chronic hemodialysis underwent echocardiography and dobutamine echocardiography. The average age of patients was 51.50 +/- 7.35 years. The mean duration of dialysis was 74 +/- 40 months.The dobutamine stress test was positive in 50% of patients, and undefined in 12.5%. The wall motion score index before the test was 1, and after the test it was 1.54 +/- 0.27. There were no serious complications. Left ventricular mass, diastolic and systolic dimension and posterior wall were significantly higher in patients with positive dobutamine stress results and they were associated with late cardiac morbidity and mortality. Five-year survival in patients with positive dobutamine stress results was 33.3% and 52.3% in patients with negative dobutamine results. Causes of mortality were as follows: cardiac 45.4%, cerebrovascular 18.1%, other causes 36.4%. Cardiogical complications were not the cause of death in any of the patients with negative dobutamine results. In dobutamine positive group 62.5% died from cardiological complications. During the 5-year period, cardiac death and manifest coronary disease occurred in 75% of patients with positive dobutamine stress results and only in one patient with negative dobutamine results. Sensitivity was 75%, specificity 89% and positive predictive value 90%.Dobutamine stress echocardiography has a good predictive value for future cardiac events in hemnodyalisis patients, and in screening for coronary disease.Renal transplant outcome in high-cardiovascular risk recipients.Cardiovascular (CV) disease is the foremost cause of mortality and an important cause of morbidity in renal transplant recipients. The disease burden is likely to increase as older patients are accepted for transplantation. The outcome of these high-CV risk patients after renal transplantation, especially with known pre-transplant coronary artery disease (CAD), has not been studied. Hence, we looked at the CV outcome in patients with known pre-transplant CAD.All renal transplants performed between 1998 and 2002 at our center, followed up to 2005, were divided into high- and low-risk groups, based on the presence of one or more of the following: pre-transplant angina, myocardial infarction, and positive coronary angiogram. The two groups were compared for post-transplant cardiac events and patient and graft survival. The factors predictive of post-transplant cardiac events were also determined by Cox-regression multivariate analysis.Forty-five patients (10.5%), out of 429, had post-transplant cardiac events; 31.3% in the high risk, and 6.5% in the low-risk group (p = 0.001). Five-yr patient survival was lower in the high-risk group (82.8% vs. 93.1%, p = 0.004), while five-yr overall graft survival and death censored graft survival were statistically not different (74.8% vs. 84.1%, p = 0.08 and 87.3% vs. 90%, p = 0.25). Forty-one percent of patients who were treated with angioplasty plus stenting or bypass graft prior to transplantation had post-transplant cardiac events, as compared with 28% of those without intervention in the high-risk group and 6.5% of patients in the low-risk group (p = 0.001). Age, pre-transplant cardiac disease, arrhythmias, and low-ejection fraction (< or = 40%) were significant independent predictors of post-transplant cardiac events.Post-transplant survival of high-CV risk patients (with known CAD) is lower than that of low-risk recipients but remains acceptable. Cardiac interventions may reduce perioperative risk but do not reduce the probability of post-transplant cardiac events to that of low-risk group.Stress echocardiography: abnormal response of tissue Doppler-derived indices to dobutamine in the absence of obstructive coronary artery disease in patients with chronic renal failure.Abnormal tissue Doppler (TD)-derived indices during dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE) can predict the presence of coronary artery disease (CAD) in patients with normal renal function. These indices include a reduction in annular systolic velocity (S'), a decrease in early diastolic annular velocity (E'), and prolongation of the time to E'. However, the ability of these indices to detect or exclude CAD in patients with chronic renal failure (CRF) is unclear.To examine the ability of TD-derived indices to detect or exclude the presence of CAD in patients with CRF.We evaluated a total of 30 patients (13 males, mean age 57 +/- 15 years) using both DSE and coronary angiography. This cohort consisted of 12 control patients with normal renal function (mean creatinine 0.5 mg/dL) and 18 patient with CRF (mean creatinine 2.5 mg/dL). At each stage of the DSE, left ventricular (LV) diastolic function was assessed using conventional (peak early (E) and late (A) transmitral, E/A ratio, E-wave deceleration time (DT), and isovolumic relaxation time (IVRT)) and TD-derived indices (lateral annular systolic (S'), early diastolic (E'), and late atrial velocities (A'), time to E' and E/E').All 30 patients had a normal DSE based on systolic regional function and a normal coronary angiogram. There was no difference in E, A, E/A, DT or IVRT between the two groups at each stage. Despite normal coronaries, patients with CRF demonstrated lower S' and E' velocities at peak stress compared to the control patients (8.0 +/- 2.2 cm/sec vs 15.1 +/- 2.6, P < 0.05 and 6.7 +/- 1.6 cm/sec vs 13.3 +/- 3.1, P < 0.05, respectively). During DSE, the time to E' at peak stress in CRF patients was also prolonged compared to control (400 +/- 44 ms vs 329 +/- 51, P < 0.05). Patients with CRF also had increased filling pressures (as estimated by E/E') as compared to controls at peak stress (14.7 +/- 5.2 vs 7.4 +/- 1.5, P < 0.05, respectively).In patients with CRF, a reduction in TD derived indices does not predict the presence of obstructive CAD.Ischaemia imaging in type 2 diabetic kidney transplant candidates--is coronary angiography essential?Coronary artery disease (CAD) remains the leading cause of death in type 2 diabetes mellitus (DM) patients undergoing renal transplantation. There is a high prevalence of silent CAD in these patients. Controversy exists regarding the role of dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE) in detection of CAD. Our purpose was to compare DSE with coronary angiography (CA) for the detection of CAD in type 2 diabetic patients undergoing evaluation for renal transplantation.Forty (36 male, four female) type 2 diabetic patients with end-stage renal disease (ESRD) were subjected to DSE followed by CA as a part of their pre-renal transplant evaluation. The ability of DSE to predict 70% stenosis in one or more coronary arteries as determined by CA was evaluated. Mean age of the patients was 49.2 +/- 5 years (range 39-60 years).DSE was positive in 10 (25%) patients, while 19 patients (48%) had a more than 70% lesion in at least one epicardial vessel on CA (six patients had single vessel, three had double vessel and 10 had triple vessel disease). The sensitivity and specificity in identifying CAD was 47.3 and 95.2%, respectively, while positive predictive value and negative predictive value was 90% and 66%. Accuracy of DSE was 72.5%. All four patients with diffuse diabetic coronary artery disease had negative DSE.DSE is a poor predictor of coronary artery disease in type 2 DM patients being evaluated for renal transplantation. CA should be included in evaluation of type 2 diabetic patients who are renal transplant candidates.Prevalence and determinants of coronary and aortic calcifications assessed by chest CT in renal transplant recipients.Coronary artery calcifications independently predict cardiovascular events (CVE) in the general population. We assessed the prevalence and determinants of coronary (CAC) and thoracic aorta (AoC) calcifications in renal transplant recipients (RTR).Consecutive RTR living in Belgium, with an isolated kidney graft functioning for more than 1 year, were asked to participate. They underwent a 16-slice spiral computerized tomography in order to measure calcium mass. Demographic, clinical, biochemical and urinary parameters were recorded.We included 281 patients. CAC and AoC were detected in 81 and 85%, with geometric means (SD) of 52.2 (4.9) and 99.3 (8.2) mg, respectively. By multiple linear regression, independent predictors of both types of calcifications included older age, longer time on dialysis, a history of CVE, of multiple transplantations and of smoking. Other determinants of CAC were male gender, current statin use and history of parathyroidectomy, and other determinants of AoC included higher pulse pressure, shorter time under mycophenolate mofetil and current use of anti-vitamin-K.The prevalence of both CAC and AoC is substantial in RTR. We delineate independent determinants either common to both CAC and AoC or specific to one, and known as classic or chronic kidney disease related risk factors.Electron-beam computerized tomography correlates with coronary angiogram in chronic kidney disease patients.Electron-beam computerized tomography (EBCT) is able to noninvasively quantify coronary artery calcification (CAC). Chronic kidney disease (CKD) patients frequently have CAC, and clinicians are puzzled regarding the clinical significance of this finding and the diagnostic accuracy of coronary EBCT in CKD. The aim of this study was to determine the correlation in CKD patients between CAC measured by EBCT and 50% stenosis determined by coronary angiography (CA), the gold standard to identify atherosclerotic lesions.We recruited 37 patients with CKD from a single institution and compared their coronary EBCT and CA results using standard statistical analysis.Patients with at least one vessel with > or = 50% stenosis by CA had higher mean CAC scores [2,407.9 +/- (SD) 3,165.3 vs. 227 +/- 443.4; p < 0.001] and higher median CAC scores (1,052 vs. 25.8; p < 0.001) as compared with those having no stenosis > or = 50%. The sensitivity was 85.7%, and the specificity 82.6% using 50% stenosis as the definition for coronary artery disease and using a CAC score of 400 as a cutoff value for the EBCT results. The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve was 0.84. The diagnostic accuracy (proportion of correct results) was 83.8%. The negative predictive value was 90.5%. The receiver operating characteristic curve suggests that the optimal cutoff value for CAC scores in our cohort is 315.9, increasing the area under the receiver operating characteristic curve to 0.91. The total coronary artery stenosis was significantly associated with the CAC score (p = 0.01).EBCT has a very good predictive value for obstructive coronary artery disease. EBCT could be used as a screening tool in CKD patients with a low-to-intermediate risk for coronary artery disease.Echocardiography-based score to predict outcome after renal transplantation.Given the high cardiac mortality of renal transplant recipients, identification of high-risk patients is important to offer appropriate treatment before transplantation.To determine patients with high mortality after renal transplantation despite selection according to current criteria.Preoperative parameters were collected from 203 renal transplant recipients over a follow-up time of 3.6 (1.9) years. The primary end point was all-cause mortality.22 deaths (11%) and 12 cardiac failures (6%) were observed. Non-survivors were older (p< or =0.001), had larger left ventricular end-systolic diameter (LVSD) (p< or =0.001) and end-diastolic diameter (p = 0.002), and lower ejection fraction (p< or =0.001). Left ventricular mass index (p = 0.001), maximal wall thickness (p = 0.006) and the proportion with mitral annular calcification (p = 0.001) were significantly higher in the non-survivors. The risk factors for ischaemic heart disease and exercise test data were not significantly different between the two groups. Four independent predictors of mortality after renal transplantation were identified: age > or =50 years (p = 0.002), LVESD > or =3.5 cm (p = 0.002), maximal wall thickness > or =1.4 cm (p = 0.014) and mitral annular calcification (p = 0.036). The 5-year survival estimates for 0, 1, 2 and 3 prognostic factors were 96%, 86%, 69% and 38%, respectively. No patient had four prognostic factors. In patients > or =50 years, the 5-year survival estimates for 0, 1 and 2 additional prognostic factors were 73%, 45% and 18%, respectively.In addition to selection according to current guidelines, age and three conventional echocardiography parameters may further improve risk stratification before renal transplantation.Utility of carotid intimal medial thickness as a screening tool for evaluation of coronary artery disease in pre-transplant end stage renal disease.Coronary artery disease (CAD) is associated with a higher incidence of allograft failure and mortality in patients with end-stage renal disease (ESRD) following renal transplant.To evaluate the efficacy of using carotid intimal medial thickness (CIMT) to predict the presence of CAD in patients with ESRD, using coronary angiography (CAG) as the gold standard.This prospective study enrolled consecutive patients with ESRD who underwent CAG as a part of pretransplant evaluation to rule out the presence of atherosclerotic CAD. An operator who was blinded with respect to the results of the CAG, measured carotid IMT in all patients prior to CAG and recorded it on videotape. Two independent observers blinded to the results of CAG measured carotid IMT offline to validate its predictive accuracy as a noninvasive test in predicting the presence or absence of CAD. Measurement of carotid IMT was done on USG B mode 7.5 MHZ probe [HP 5500 andover, Massachusetts]. Student's t-test was used for inter-group comparisons. Pearson correlation coefficient test was used to assess the relation between CAD and various risk factors and carotid IMT. Linear regression analysis was applied to identify independent factors determining presence of CAD. A P value < 0.05 was considered statistically significant.Mean CIMT was significantly higher in those with CAD as compared to those without [0.80+/- 0.06 vs.0.70+/-0.06 mm, P< 0.0001). Patients with CIMT> 0.75 mm were older and had more incidence of diabetes(78% vs. 47%; P=0.001). Only 4/53 (7%) of patients with CIMT< 0.75 mm had CAD, vs. 38/52 (73%) in those with CIMT >0.75 mm. The sensitivity and specificity of using CIMT > 0.75 as a predictor of CAD was 90.47%and 73% and its positive and negative predictive values were 0.73 and 0.92. On multivariate analysis, only CIMT was a significant predictor of CAD.Carotid IMT can be used to predict CAD in patients with ESRD. In the absence of other risk factors,patients with IMT< 0.75 mm may not need a pretransplant CAG.Routine coronary angiography in diabetic nephropathy patients before transplantation.We evaluated the incidence of significant coronary artery stenoses (CAS), angina pectoris (AP), revascularization and associated risk factors in 155 consecutive diabetic nephropathy transplant candidates. Kidney and kidney-pancreas transplant candidates with diabetes for more than 10 years and/or retinopathy and/or biopsy verified diabetic nephropathy were included. The inclusion period was 1999-2004. Seventy-two percent of patients were male. Sixty-one percent had type 1 diabetes and 39% had type 2 diabetes and mean age was 46 years (+/-10) and 58 years (+/-11), respectively. History of heart disease was present in 34% of patients, 34% had cerebro-vascular and/or peripheral atherosclerotic disease, and 51% had neither. Fifty-five percent had a smoking history and 46% were on dialysis. Significant CAS was found in 45% of patients, of whom 17% had AP. No patients below 35 years of age had significant CAS (n = 11, p = 0.001). Revascularization was performed in 57% of patients with significant CAS. The only risk factor for significant CAS in multiple logistic regression was age (p = 0.046). Approximately half of the patients had significant CAS, and half of these underwent revascularization. Most patients with CAS did not have symptoms of myocardial ischemia. The data justify screening diabetic nephropathy transplant candidates with coronary angiography before transplantation.Risk stratification of patients with chronic kidney disease: results of screening strategies incorporating clinical risk scoring and dobutamine stress echocardiography.Cardiac disease is the principal cause of death in patients with chronic kidney disease (CKD). Ischemia at dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE) is associated with adverse events in these patients. We sought the efficacy of combining clinical risk evaluation with DSE.We allocated 244 patients with CKD (mean age 54 years, 140 men, 169 dialysis-dependent at baseline) into low- and high-risk groups based on two disease-specific scores and the Framingham risk model. All underwent DSE and were further stratified according to DSE results. Patients were followed over 20 +/- 14 months for events (death, myocardial infarction, acute coronary syndrome).There were 49 deaths and 32 cardiac events. Using the different clinical scores, allocation of high risk varied from 34% to 79% of patients, and 39% to 50% of high-risk patients had an abnormal DSE. In the high-risk groups, depending on the clinical score chosen, 25% to 44% with an abnormal DSE had a cardiac event, compared with 8% to 22% with a normal DSE. Cardiac events occurred in 2.0%, 3.1%, and 9.7% of the low-risk patients, using the two disease-specific and Framingham scores, respectively, and DSE results did not add to risk evaluation in this subgroup. Independent DSE predictors of cardiac events were a lower resting diastolic blood pressure, angina during the test, and the combination of ischemia with resting left ventricular dysfunction.In CKD patients, high-risk findings by DSE can predict outcome. A stepwise strategy of combining clinical risk scores with DSE for CAD screening in CKD reduces the number of tests required and identifies a high-risk subgroup among whom DSE results more effectively stratify high and low risk.Validation of a screening protocol for identifying low-risk candidates with type 1 diabetes mellitus for kidney with or without pancreas transplantation.Certain clinical risk factors are associated with significant coronary artery disease in kidney transplant candidates with diabetes mellitus. We sought to validate the use of a clinical algorithm in predicting post-transplantation mortality in patients with type 1 diabetes. We also examined the prevalence of significant coronary lesions in high-risk transplant candidates.All patients with type 1 diabetes evaluated between 1991 and 2001 for kidney with/without pancreas transplantation were classified as high-risk based on the presence of any of the following risk factors: age >or=45 yr, smoking history >or=5 pack years, diabetes duration >or=25 yr or any ST-T segment abnormalities on electrocardiogram. Remaining patients were considered low risk. All high-risk candidates were advised to undergo coronary angiography. The primary outcome of interest was all-cause mortality post-transplantation.Eighty-four high-risk and 42 low-risk patients were identified. Significant coronary artery stenosis was detected in 31 high-risk candidates. Mean arterial pressure was a significant predictor of coronary stenosis (odds ratio 1.68; 95% confidence interval 1.14-2.46), adjusted for age, sex and duration of diabetes. In 75 candidates who underwent transplantation with median follow-up of 47 months, the use of clinical risk factors predicted all eight deaths. No deaths occurred in low-risk patients. A significant mortality difference was noted between the two risk groups (p = 0.03).This clinical algorithm can identify patients with type 1 diabetes at risk for mortality after kidney with/without pancreas transplant. Patients without clinical risk factors can safely undergo transplantation without further cardiac evaluation.Significance of coronary artery calcification score (CACS) for the detection of coronary artery disease (CAD) in chronic dialysis patients.Coronary artery disease (CAD) is a principal cause of death in patients with end-stage renal disease (ESRD). The coronary artery calcification score (CACS), determined by electron-beam computed tomography (EBCT), is useful for the detection of CAD in non-ESRD patients. There are few reports on the usefulness of EBCT for the detection of CAD, however, in ESRD patients. We examined the relation between CACS and CAD in ESRD patients.Coronary angiography (CAG) was used to diagnose CAD in patients with significant coronary artery stenosis (>or=50%). We examined 76 ESRD patients on chronic dialysis therapy from 1997 to 2005, of which 51 are men, 25 are women, mean (S.D.) age of 57.9 (12.1) years and mean (S.D.) HD duration of 7.7 (6.6) years. There were 50 (35 men, 15 women) patients with CAD and 26 (16 men, 10 women) without CAD.The median CACS was 1290 in all patients, 1689 in the CAD group and 527 in the non-CAD group; the mean (S.D.) CACS was 1833 (2003) in all patients, 2338 (2209) in the CAD group and 861 (991) in the non-CAD group. CACS was significantly higher in the CAD group than in the non-CAD group. The CACS cutoff values for predicting CAD were calculated at intervals of 100. At the cutoff values of >or=100, >or=500, >or=1000, >or=2000, and >or=3000, the sensitivity was 98%, 90%, 68%, 42%, and 32% and the specificity was 35%, 50%, 69%, 85%, and 96%, respectively.EBCT is not adequate for screening asymptomatic ESRD patients. Because EBCT is less invasive than CAG, further study is necessary to determine whether CAG should be performed in all high-risk ESRD patients on chronic dialysis.Value of 99mTc-methoxyisobutylisonitrile (99mTc-MIBI) gated SPECT for the detection of silent myocardial ischemia in hemodialysis patients: clinical variables associated with abnormal test results.Although coronary artery disease is a major cause of mortality and morbidity in patients undergoing hemodialysis, there is no accurate diagnostic strategy for these patients.To assess the value of 99mTc-methoxyisobutylisonitrile (99mTc-MIBI) gated single-photon emission computed tomography for the detection of silent myocardial ischemia in patients undergoing hemodialysis and to evaluate the clinical variables associated with abnormal test results.Thirty-one asymptomatic patients undergoing hemodialysis (20 men, 11 women), with a mean age of 45 years (range, 25-75 years), were included in the study. Serum electrolytes, creatinine, homocysteine and adhesion molecules were measured prior to dialysis. Ambulatory blood pressure, carotid intima-media thickness measurements, echocardiography and stress 99mTc-MIBI imaging were performed in all patients, whereas coronary angiography was performed only in patients with abnormal myocardial perfusion scintigraphy and/or echocardiography.Gated myocardial perfusion scintigraphy results were abnormal in nine patients (29%) and coronary angiography was abnormal in six patients. After a median follow-up of 20 months (range, 14-28 months), nine patients experienced a cardiac event. Seven of the nine patients (78%) with abnormal myocardial perfusion scintigraphy suffered a cardiac event, compared with only two of 22 patients (9%) with normal myocardial perfusion scintigraphy (P<0.0001). Patients with abnormal perfusion scintigraphy had higher serum C-reactive protein, homocysteine and adhesion molecule levels and the duration of hemodialysis was significantly longer.In asymptomatic hemodialysis patients, gated myocardial perfusion scintigraphy is a safe and non-invasive screening technique for the detection of coronary artery disease and for predicting future cardiac events. The presence of ischemia correlates significantly with markers of inflammation. The discordant results (abnormal myocardial perfusion scintigraphy/normal coronary angiography) can be attributed to angiographically unrecognized occult atherosclerotic changes and abnormal vasodilatation capacity of the coronary circulation.Assessment of coronary artery disease in hemodialysis patients with delayed systolic blood pressure response after exercise testing.We evaluated usefulness of the postexercise systolic blood pressure (SBP) response for detecting coronary artery disease (CAD) in hemodialysis patients.A treadmill exercise testing was done, and the SBP response was measured in 44 hemodialysis patients (30 men, 14 women; age 41 to 81 years). The postexercise SBP response was defined as the ratio of SBP after 3 minutes of recovery to SBP at peak exercise.The SBP ratio of the 25 subjects with coronary artery stenosis (1.01+/- 0.13) was significantly greater (p<0.01) than 19 subjects without coronary artery stenosis (0.83+/- 0.10). An SBP ratio greater than 0.92 identified CAD with higher sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy than did the conventional ST-segment depression criterion (76 vs. 56%, 90 vs. 53%, and 82 vs. 55%, respectively).Determination of the SBP ratio is a clinically useful, noninvasive method for accurately detecting CAD in hemodialysis patients.Clinical, resting echo and dipyridamole stress echocardiography findings for the screening of renal transplant candidates.Preoperative screening for coronary artery disease is recommended in high-risk renal transplant candidates. Aim of this study was to prospectively assess the value of a comprehensive risk stratification strategy including clinical, resting echo, and dipyridamole stress echo findings before renal transplantation.The study group consisted of 71 renal transplant candidates (47 men; age 54+/-11 years) fulfilling one or more of the following high-risk clinical criteria: history of coronary artery disease, wall motion abnormalities at resting echo, dialysis dependency lasting >5 years, presence of 2 or more risk factors. Clinical history, resting echo, and dipyridamole stress echo (up to 0.84 mg over 10 min + atropine up to 1 mg) were obtained in all subjects.Mean number of risk factors was 2.5+/-1.0. Known coronary artery disease and diabetes were present, respectively, in 2 (3%) and 11 (15%) persons. No patient had left ventricular ejection fraction <45%. Left ventricular hypertrophy was found in 53 (74%) cases. Stress echo showed 100% safety and 97% overall feasibility. Inducible ischemia (new wall motion abnormalities) was detected in 3 (4%) subjects. During follow-up (36+/-12 months), 8 (11%) cardiac events occurred: 2 deaths, 2 myocardial infarctions, 3 coronary interventions, and 1 pulmonary edema. The perioperative period and subsequent follow-up (22+/-12 months) was uneventful among 32 patients who received renal transplantation. Four-year event-free survival was 92% in those without ischemia; it was 96% in the non-diabetic population. Diabetes (HR=4.78), age (HR=1.14), and left ventricular mass index (HR=1.02) were independent prognostic indicators among clinical and resting echo variables. The global chi-square of the statistical model was 18.8; it increased to 27.3 (+45%) after the addition of stress echo result.Renal transplant candidates can undergo effective stratification of risk by combining clinical, resting echo and dipyridamole stress echo findings.Dobutamine stress echocardiography and the resting but not exercise electrocardiograph predict severe coronary artery disease in renal transplant candidates.After renal transplantation half of all deaths are cardiac, so prior detection and treatment of severe coronary artery disease (CAD) is advocated. The aim of this study was to identify non-invasive predictors of severe CAD in a group of renal transplant candidates.One hundred and twenty-five renal transplant candidates (mean age 52+/-12 years, 80 male, mean creatinine 608+/-272 micromol/l) were studied. All had coronary angiography, dobutamine stress echocardiography, and resting and exercise electrocardiograph (ECG). Severe CAD was defined as luminal stenosis >70% by visual estimation in at least one epicardial artery. The resting ECG was recorded as abnormal if there was evidence of pathological Q waves, left ventricular hypertrophy, ST depression or elevation > or=1 mm, T wave inversion or bundle branch block. Total exercise time, maximal ST segment change, maximal heart rate and systolic blood pressure, limiting symptoms and Duke score were calculated during the exercise ECG test.Of the patients, 36 (29%) had severe CAD, 55% were on dialysis and 39% were diabetic. Patients with severe CAD were significantly older (P<0.001), had higher total cholesterol (P = 0.05), higher CRP level (P = 0.05), larger left ventricular (LV), end systolic and end diastolic diameter (P = 0.007 for each), and lower LV ejection fraction (P = 0.01). A significantly higher percentage were diabetic (P = 0.05), had previous graft failure (P = 0.05), mitral annular calcification (P = 0.04), an abnormal resting ECG (P = 0.001) and positive stress echo result (P<0.001). Cardiac symptoms and exercise ECG parameters were not significantly different in the two groups. Stepwise logistic regression identified an abnormal resting ECG (OR 7, 95% CI 2, 34, P = 0.013) and positive stress echo result (OR 23, 95% CI 6, 88, P<0.001) as independent predictors of severe CAD.In selecting which potential renal transplant candidates should undergo coronary angiography, resting ECG and dobutamine stress echocardiography are the best predictors of severe CAD.Dobutamine stress echocardiography and cardiac troponin T for the detection of significant coronary artery disease and predicting outcome in renal transplant candidates.Ischaemic heart disease is the leading cause of mortality and morbidity in patients with end-stage renal disease (ESRD) and after renal transplantation. However, the optimal non-invasive test for coronary artery disease (CAD) diagnosis in this population has yet to be established. The aim of this study was to assess the diagnostic accuracy of dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE) and baseline plasma cardiac troponin T (cTnT) for detecting significant CAD and predicting adverse cardiac events in patients referred for renal transplantation.Coronary angiography, DSE, and baseline cTnT measurements were performed in 118 consecutive patients (mean age 52+/-12 years, 75 male) with ESRD (mean creatinine 608+/-272 micromol/L) referred for renal transplantation. The mean follow-up period was 1.32+/-0.48 years. Significant CAD was defined as a reduction in luminal diameter >70% by visual estimation in at least one major epicardial vessel. An abnormal DSE result defined as the development of a new regional wall motion abnormality in one or more normal resting segments or a deterioration of wall motion in one or more resting hypokinetic segments. A baseline cTnT>0.1 microg/L was taken as positive.Significant CAD in at least one vessel was present in 35 patients (30%). The number of patients with significant 3 vessel and 2 vessel disease was 6 and 7, respectively. An abnormal DSE result was present in 36 (31%) patients. Thirty-one (26%) had cTnT>0.1 microg/L. Sixty-four (54%) patients were on dialysis and 46 (39%) were diabetic. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values for DSE in detecting significant coronary artery disease were 88%, 94%, 86% and 95%, respectively. The same values for a raised cTnT were 54%, 62%, 40% and 74%, respectively. The combination of an abnormal DSE result and raised cTnT gave values of 61%, 91%, 76%, and 80%, respectively. Over the follow-up period, mortality was significantly higher in those with a raised baseline cTnT but not those with an abnormal DSE result or significant CAD.DSE is an accurate technique for the detection of significant CAD in renal transplant candidates. An elevated cTnT does not predict significant CAD in this population and when used in conjunction with DSE, reduces the sensitivity of the combined tests. cTnT is an important marker of prognosis in renal transplant candidates.Incidence of coronary heart disease and cardiac events in patients undergoing kidney and pancreatic transplantation.One major cause of graft loss after kidney transplantation or simultaneous kidney and pancreas transplantation is death of the recipient due to cardiac events. Records of 261 patients who underwent sole kidney (group A) or combined kidney-pancreas transplantation (group B) were retrospectively analyzed. Patients were divided into groups with basic cardiac evaluation (chest X-ray, electrocardiogram) and patients with additional diagnostics [echocardiography, exercise stress test, myocardial perfusion test, and coronary angiography (CAG)]. The results of the performed CAGs were as follows: proven coronary artery disease (CAD) in 22 patients (12.43%) in group A and 37 patients (44.05%) in group B; stenosis of one main coronary artery of 70% or greater in 8.47% (group A) and 16.67% (group B) of the patients. Subsequent revascularization procedures were performed in 15 candidates (8.47%) of group A and 11 (13.10%) of group B. The incidence of posttransplant cardiac events (PCE) was lower in recipients in both groups who underwent additional cardiac evaluation. Late postoperative deaths were reported in 3.45% of kidney recipients with no additional evaluation (group A), in 2.06% of patients with further diagnostics (group A), and in only 1.19% of patients with invasive pretransplant evaluation (group B). Patients with known CAD and no further invasive diagnostics or subsequent revascularization are at great risk. PCE were observed in three of seven patients in this subgroup. Careful cardiac evaluation including echocardiography, exercise stress test, myocardial perfusion test, and CAG is associated with a low incidence of PCE.[Prevalence of coronary artery disease in type I diabetic candidates for double transplantation (kidney and pancreas)].To assess the prevalence of coronary artery disease (CAD) in a population of type I diabetic, nephropathic patients in a dialysis program and candidates for double transplantation (kidney and pancreas).From January 2000 to July 2002, 58 type I diabetic patients underwent coronary cineangiography as part of an assessment protocol for double transplantation. Coronary artery disease was defined as any irregularity in the coronary arteries and was classified according to the degree of luminal stenosis as mild (< 30%), moderate (> or = 30 to 70%), and severe (> 70%).The mean age of the patients was 34 +/- 12 years, and 32 (55%) were men. No patient had a history of angina or acute myocardial infarction. The major risk factors for the disease were systemic arterial hypertension in 93% of the patients, dyslipidemia in 38%, familial history in 25%, and smoking in 20%. The mean duration of diabetes was 20.8 +/- 9 years, and the duration of dialysis was 26 +/- 9 months. Coronary angiography revealed coronary artery disease in 42 (72%) patients, which was mild in 20 (34%) patients, moderate in 9 (16%), and severe in 13 (22%).Patients with type I diabetes in a dialysis program and candidates for double transplantation had an elevated prevalence of coronary artery disease. It is worth noting that those patients had no symptoms of the disease.High prevalence of occult coronary artery stenosis in patients with chronic kidney disease at the initiation of renal replacement therapy: an angiographic examination.The prevalence of coronary artery stenosis (CAS) at the initiation of renal replacement therapy (RRT) in patients with chronic kidney disease (CKD) and no previous history of angina and/or myocardial infarction (MI) has not been fully elucidated. The prevalence of significant CAS was evaluated in 30 asymptomatic stage 5 CKD patients without a history of angina and/or MI by coronary angiography at the initiation of RRT. The correlations of various parameters with the prevalence of CAS were also examined. Atherosclerotic surrogate markers, including intima-media thickness of carotid artery and ankle-brachial BP index (ABI), were also evaluated. Significant CAS (>50% stenosis) was seen in 16 (53.3%) of 30 asymptomatic CKD patients on coronary angiography at the start of RRT. Stress cardiac scintigraphy was not effective for detecting hidden cardiac ischemia among the CKD patients. Univariate analysis showed that diabetes (P = 0.01), left ventricular mass index (P = 0.04), hyperlipidemia (P = 0.04), total cholesterol (P = 0.02), LDL cholesterol (P < 0.01), intima-media thickness (P = 0.04), and fibrinogen (P = 0.01) were positively correlated with the presence of CAS, whereas ABI (P < 0.01) showed a negative correlation with CAS. Stepwise logistic regression analysis revealed that diabetes and fibrinogen were significant and independent risk factors for CAS in asymptomatic CKD patients who started RRT. The results clearly demonstrated that despite the absence of cardiac events, stage 5 CKD patients are already in a very high risk group for CAS at the initiation of RRT, which was also closely associated with a significant decrease in ABI.Pretransplant cardiac investigations in the Irish renal transplant population--the effectiveness of our current screening techniques in predicting cardiac events.Coronary artery disease (CAD) is prevalent among endstage renal failure patients and remains the major cause of mortality following renal transplantation. Death with a functioning transplant institute remains the most common cause of kidney graft failure. In this study we attempt to evaluate the effectiveness of the clinical history and current screening techniques available in predicting posttransplant CAD and also assess the role of coronary angiography as a pretransplant screening technique.Clinical data of 190 renal transplant patients was analyzed. Any clinical history of cardiac disease and all preoperative cardiac screening data was recorded for each patient. The study endpoints were the subsequent development of myocardial infarction (MI), undergoing coronary artery bypass graft (CABG) or death.Factors that were significantly associated with reaching a study endpoint included: age at transplant [Hazard Ratio (HR) 1.91, P<0.001], history of heart failure (HR 8.22, P<0.001), presence of CAD on coronary angiography (HR 5.55, P=0.033), anterior Q wave on electrocardiograph (ECG) (HR 8.6, P<0.001), carotid artery disease (HR 3.74, P=0.030) and history of a cerebrovascular accident (HR of 4.32, P=0.008). The screening techniques of exercise stress testing and echocardiography were not conclusive as predictive variables of outcome.Clinical history and ECG results are good, practical and low-cost screening methods. In our study exercise stress testing and echocardiography were found to be of limited value. Coronary angiography is appropriate in certain high-risk groups but not necessary as part of screening in all potential renal transplant recipients.Prognostic value of inducible myocardial ischemia in predicting cardiovascular events after renal transplantation.The aims of the present study were to determine the prevalence of inducible myocardial ischemia (IMI) in renal transplant recipients (RTR) more than 50 years old, to identify predictors of IMI, and to search for its prognostic value.Among the 377 renal transplantations performed between 1989 and 1998 in a single institution, 120 were done in patients > or =50 years old, and 97 were recruited for the study. During the last quarter of 1998, all of them underwent an exercise test (EST), an exercise-thallium 201 single photon emission computed tomography coupled with dipyridamole (SPECT), and 81% of them had a dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE). Patients with IMI subsequently underwent coronary angiography to detect coronary stenosis.IMI was present in 12 of the 97 patients (10%). The diagnosis was evidenced by EST in four cases, by SPECT in 11 cases, and DSE in three cases. Five of these 12 patients (42%) had significant coronary artery stenosis (> or =50%). Multivariate analysis of several pre- and post-transplant variables evidenced acute rejection and left ventricular hypertrophy as significant correlates of IMI (both P < 0.03). Patients were prospectively followed-up for 48 months for the occurrence of major cardiovascular events. Kaplan-Meier analysis revealed a significant increase in cardiovascular events in the IMI group (P < 0.0001). In addition, the Cox proportional hazards model revealed that IMI and diabetes mellitus had an independent significant effect on the occurrence of major cardiovascular events.IMI was present in 10% of RTR aged > or =50 years, and was predicted by acute rejection and left ventricular hypertrophy. IMI had a strong effect on major cardiovascular events in this population.Myocardial scintigraphy using a fatty acid analogue detects coronary artery disease in hemodialysis patients.Coronary artery disease contributes significantly to mortality in end-stage renal disease (ESRD) patients. Single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) using an iodinated fatty acid analogue, iodine-123-methyl iodophenylpentadecanoic acid (123I-BMIPP), can assess fatty acid metabolism in the myocardium. We investigated the ability of 123I-BMIPP SPECT to detect coronary artery disease in hemodialysis patients compared with 201thallium chloride (201Tl) SPECT.We prospectively studied 130 ESRD patients undergoing hemodialysis for a mean of 88.6 months (male/female, 77/53; mean age, 63.8 years). Dual SPECT using 123I-BMIPP and 201Tl was performed, followed by coronary angiography. SPECT findings were graded in 17 segments on a five-point scale (0, normal uptake; 4, none) and assessed as a summed score.By coronary angiography, 71.5% of patients (93/130) had significant coronary stenosis (> or =75%), and five patients showed coronary spasm without coronary stenosis. When a BMIPP summed score of 6 or more was defined as abnormal, sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy for detecting coronary artery disease by BMIPP SPECT were 98.0%, 65.6%, and 90.0%, respectively; in contrast, these parameters for detecting coronary artery disease by Tl SPECT were 84.7%, 46.9%, and 75.0%, respectively, when a Tl summed score of 1 or more was defined as abnormal. In receiver operating characteristic analysis, the area under the curve was 0.895 in BMIPP and 0.727 in Tl SPECT, respectively.Resting BMIPP SPECT is superior to Tl SPECT for detecting coronary lesions, and provides safe screening for coronary artery disease among maintenance hemodialysis patients.Cardiac evaluation for simultaneous pancreas-kidney transplantation and incidence of cardiac perioperative complications: preliminary study.Type I diabetes mellitus (IDDM) is associated with an increased cardiovascular risk, and eligibility protocols for simultaneous pancreas-kidney transplantation (SPKT) are consequently accurate for preoperative cardiovascular assessment. According to our algorithm, coronary angiography in SPKT candidates is indicated for patients not only experiencing previous cardiac events or symptoms, but also those with long-standing diabetes (more than 25 years) and/or age over 45 years. Furthermore, a basal transthoracic echocardiographic exam (TTE) is performed to assess cardiac volumes, left ventricular mass, systolic function, and kinesis. The aims of this study were to evaluate perioperative cardiac morbidity and mortality in 18 SPKT-eligible patients, divided into two groups on the basis of the presence/absence of angiographically evident coronary artery disease (CAD), as well as to assess the impact of left ventricular hypertrophy (LVH) on cardiac complications. Cardiac intraoperative morbidity and mortality and postoperative mortality and major morbidity were absent; minor cardiac morbidity consisted only of silent ischemic ECG alterations, without significant differences between groups, although the incidence seemed to be higher in the CAD-positive population. LVH detected preoperatively by TTE exam also failed to correlate with the incidence of such complications. Selection of SPKT candidates by coronary angiography may have positive effects on perioperative cardiac morbidity and mortality. A larger sample size is needed to give the study statistical power. Medium- and long-term follow-up studies are warranted to evaluate the effects of preoperative selection on survival rates.Coronary artery calcification measured with electron-beam computerized tomography correlates poorly with coronary artery angiography in dialysis patients.Coronary artery calcification measured by electron-beam computerized tomography (EBCT) correlates with plaque burden and vessel stenosis and is predictive of future cardiac events in the general population. Uremic vascular calcification is common and widespread, tends to be medial as well as intimal, and may not relate solely to atherosclerotic lesions. Despite this difference and in the absence of any direct evidence in uremic patients, it is generally implied that coronary artery calcification equates to occlusive atherosclerosis.We set out to compare the predictive value of coronary artery calcification assessed by EBCT with contemporaneous coronary angiography. We studied 18 patients with end-stage renal disease undergoing maintenance dialysis. Seventy-two coronary vessels were analyzed for angiographic evidence of stenotic disease and correlated with individual vessel calcification score.There was no significant correlation between degree of vessel stenosis and calcification score for individual vessels in patients with a positive calcium scan. Specificity was 48% and the positive predictive value was 53%. However, a calcification score <20 strongly correlated with the absence of significant luminal narrowing, and a 0 calcification score had a negative predictive value of 87.5%.Coronary artery calcification measured by EBCT is not an accurate marker of the degree of vessel stenosis in coronary artery disease in uremic patients and should not be used as a single screening test for atherosclerotic coronary disease.Usefulness of tachycardic-stress perfusion imaging to predict coronary artery disease in high-risk patients with chronic renal failure.Uncertainty remains as to the most appropriate preoperative screening investigation to evaluate patient cardiac risk in prospective renal transplant recipients. We prospectively compared tachycardic-stress (exercise/pacing) scintigraphy with coronary angiography for the detection of significant coronary artery disease in this group. With a negative predictive value of 92%, tachycardic-stress scintigraphy may reduce the need for unnecessary coronary angiography in these patients.Coronary angiography is the best predictor of events in renal transplant candidates compared with noninvasive testing.Guidelines for the detection of coronary artery disease (CAD) and assess of risk in renal transplant candidates are based on the results of noninvasive testing, according to data originated in the nonuremic population. We evaluated prospectively the accuracy of 2 noninvasive tests and risk stratification in detecting CAD (>or=70% obstruction) and assessing cardiac risk by using coronary angiography (CA). One hundred twenty-six renal transplant candidates who were classified as at moderate (>or=50 years) or high (diabetes, extracardiac atherosclerosis, or clinical coronary artery disease) coronary risk underwent myocardial scintigraphy (SPECT), dobutamine stress echocardiography, and CA and were followed for 6 to 48 months. The prevalence of CAD was 42%. The sensitivities and negative predictive values for the 2 noninvasive tests and risk stratification were <75%. After 6 to 48 months, there were 18 cardiac events, 9 fatal. Risk stratification (P=0.007) and CA (P=0.0002) predicted the crude probability of surviving free of cardiac events. The probability of event-free survival at 6, 12, 24, 36, and 48 months were 98%, 98%, 94%, 94%, and 94% in patients with <70% stenosis on CA and 97%, 87%, 61%, 56%, and 54% in patients with >or=70% stenosis. Multivariate analysis showed that the sole predictor of cardiac events was critical coronary lesions (P=0.003). Coronary angiography may still be necessary for detecting CAD and determining cardiac risk in renal transplant candidates. The data suggest that current algorithms based on noninvasive testing in this population should be revised.Prognostic value of myocardial perfusion imaging in predicting outcome after renal transplantation.Cardiovascular disease is a significant cause of morbidity and mortality after renal transplantation. Pretransplant screening in a subset of these patients for occult coronary artery disease (CAD) may improve outcome. The objective of this study was to examine the outcome of 600 patients after renal transplantation for end-stage renal disease. Prospective outcome data were collected on 600 consecutive patients who had renal transplantation between 1996 and 1998 at our institution at 42 +/- 12 months after surgery. Stress single-photon emission computed tomographic (SPECT) myocardial perfusion imaging was performed in 174 patients before surgery, 136 (78%) of whom had diabetes mellitus. There were a total of 59 events: 17 cardiac deaths, 14 nonfatal myocardial infarctions, and 28 noncardiac deaths. There were 12 cardiac events and 11 noncardiac deaths among those who had SPECT myocardial perfusion imaging. In a multivariate analysis that included important risk factors, age (p = 0.03 and 0.003, respectively) and diabetes (p = 0.02 and 0.005, respectively) were the predictors of total events and cardiac events in patients who did not undergo stress SPECT perfusion imaging. In the subgroup who had stress perfusion imaging, an abnormal perfusion SPECT study was the only predictor of cardiac events (p = 0.006). The 42-month cardiac event-free survival rate was 97% in patients with normal SPECT images and 85% in patients with abnormal SPECT images (RR 5.04, 95% confidence interval 1.4 to 17.6, p = 0.006). Thus, there is a 2.8% event rate per year after renal transplantation, and approximately 50% of these events are noncardiac. In high-risk patients (most of whom had diabetes) with preoperative stress perfusion imaging, those with normal images had significantly lower cardiac events than those with abnormal images. These results have important implications in patient screening and postoperative management.Relationship between elevated serum troponin values in end-stage renal disease patients and abnormal isotopic cardiac scans following stress.One hundred asymptomatic high-risk renal transplant candidates were screened for asymptomatic coronary artery disease using stress cardiac isotopic imaging. The cardiac markers, serum cTnT, cTnI, and CKMB, were collected pre and post stress testing. Of the 99 patients whose cardiac scans were technically satisfactory, 32 were normal, 49 had a definite imaging abnormality and the scan was indeterminate in the remaining 18 patients. Based on these results, patients were stratified into either normal, indeterminate or abnormal scan groups. They then were analyzed to detect any correlations between cardiac perfusion defects and either elevated pre-stress cardiac markers or consistent changes 24h after stress testing. While the mean pre-stress serum values for both cardiac troponin T (0.117 +/- 0.12 microgram/L) and cardiac troponin I (0.235 +/- 0.89 microgram/L) were increased in the abnormal cardiac scan group, only the cTnT value proved to differ significantly from the normal group (p < 0.01). For the indeterminate group neither marker was different from the normal scan group. Only an elevated serum cTnT > 0.1 microgram/L (OR 3.042, p = 0.030) proved to discriminate an abnormal scan in this population. It is concluded that the increase in pre-stress serum cTnT encountered in patients with chronic renal failure, with or without evidence of overt, symptomatic coronary artery disease, may represent a combination of subclinical myocardial damage and a prolonged half-life of the marker in the serum. Because of the frequency of elevated serum concentrations of cTnT and, to a lesser degree cTnI, the physician should exercise caution when interpreting a single elevated Troponin value during the evaluation of chest pain in patients with end-stage renal disease. A cTnT > 0.1 microgram/L increases the likelihood of finding significant coronary artery disease three fold in high-risk ESRD patients being evaluated for renal transplantation.Combined dipyridamole-exercise stress echocardiography for detection of myocardial ischemia in hemodialysis patients: an alternative to stress nuclear imaging.Stress nuclear imaging is the noninvasive technique currently used to detect coronary artery disease (CAD) in dialysis patients. Stress echocardiography is recognized as an alternative to stress nuclear imaging for the general population. The aim of this study is to assess the diagnostic accuracy of stress echocardiography for detecting myocardial ischemia in hemodialysis patients.Stress echocardiography and stress technetium-99m-tetrofosmin (Myoview; Amersham International Plc) imaging were performed simultaneously for 66 asymptomatic hemodialysis patients in a single session, using a combination of high-dose dipyridamole and symptom-limited exercise. Coronary angiography was performed in 44 patients with at least one abnormal noninvasive test result or who were considered high-risk despite normal noninvasive test results.Results for stress echocardiography were abnormal in 15 patients (22%); stress Myoview, in 14 patients (21%); and coronary angiography, in 12 patients (18%). The sensitivity of stress echocardiography for detecting myocardial ischemia (defined as stress Myoview defect) was 86%; specificity, 94%; positive predictive value, 80%; negative predictive value, 96%; and overall accuracy, 92%. The sensitivity of stress echocardiography for detecting CAD (defined as abnormal coronary angiography result) was 83%; specificity, 84%; positive predictive value, 67%; negative predictive value, 93%; and overall accuracy, 84%. Stress echocardiography and stress Myoview did not differ significantly in overall accuracy for detecting CAD (84% versus 91%; P = not significant).In hemodialysis patients, combined dipyridamole-exercise echocardiography is an accurate method to detect both myocardial ischemia and CAD and represents an alternative to stress nuclear imaging.Predicting cardiac events with Tl201 dipyridamole myocardial scintigraphy in renal transplant recipients.Renal transplant recipients should be screened for coronary artery disease. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the usefulness of thallium-201 dipyridamole myocardial perfusion single-photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) to predict major cardiac events in these patients.Eighty-two consecutive patients (61 males) in hemodialysis (HD) treatment, awaiting renal transplantation, underwent dipyridamole Tl-201 SPECT for pretransplant risk stratification. SPECT semiquantitative analysis showed a normal perfusion pattern in 52 patients (group A) and fixed defects in 9 (group B). Reversible perfusion defects were found in 21 (group C). Cardiac death, myocadial infarction, and unstable angina were sought as cardiac events. During a follow-up lasting 28.3 +/- 21.6 months, three patients of group A died for a non-cardiac cause. In group C, six patients (28.6%) had a cadiac event: one had a non-q wave myocardial infarction after renal transplantation; five were admitted with unstable angina. No cardiac events were observed in groups A and B (p = 0.0001). SPECT semiquantitative analysis showed that a summed difference score > or = 3 significantly increased the risk of cardiac events (odds ratio 4.5, C.I. 2.5-8.1).Cardiac events were only observed in HD patients with Tl-201 SPECT dipyridamole reversible defects (group C). A normal pattern or a fixed defect in Tl-201 dipyridamole SPECT in HD patients identified a good long-term prognosis.Pre-transplant cardiac testing for kidney-pancreas transplant candidates and association with cardiac outcomes.Coronary artery disease is a major cause of mortality following renal transplantation, especially in those patients with diabetes. The accurate prediction of cardiac risk is therefore a major focus of the pre-transplant evaluation. The objective of this study was to retrospectively evaluate the ability of non-invasive cardiac testing (standard echocardiography, stress echocardiography, exercise tolerance testing, and nuclear myocardial perfusion) performed within 1 yr of kidney-pancreas transplant to predict post-transplant myocardial infarction.Clinical history and pre-transplant cardiac testing performed within 1 yr prior to transplantation were reviewed in a non-blinded fashion for 165 kidney-pancreas transplantation patients receiving allografts between June 1990 and May 1998. The predictive values of clinical symptoms and cardiac testing for cardiac events (fatal and non-fatal myocardial infarctions) up to 1 yr post-transplant were calculated.Clinical history had a negative predictive value of 98% for cardiac events occurring within 1 yr following testing and 97% within 1 yr post-transplant. Collectively, non-invasive testing had a negative predictive value of 97% for 1 yr post-testing and 1 yr post-transplant.Clinical history alone is highly suggestive but not sufficient for the prediction of post-kidney-pancreas transplant myocardial infarction. Although a useful supplement, cardiac testing does not predict all cardiac events out to 1 yr post-testing. In this high-risk patient population with diabetes and renal failure, other methods of risk assessment are needed to more accurately predict long-term cardiac outcome for patients awaiting transplantation.Informational contribution of noninvasive screening tests for coronary artery disease in patients on chronic renal replacement therapy.The prevalence of coronary artery disease (CAD) is high in patients on renal replacement therapy; therefore, reliable noninvasive screening tests are needed. We retrospectively determined the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative likelihood ratios (LRs) for a history of chest pain, resting and exercise electrocardiography (ECG), thallium dipyridamole scintigraphy, and echocardiography in 42 patients undergoing chronic hemodialysis and 42 patients after renal transplantation who also underwent coronary angiography. In addition, the prognostic power of each test for the occurrence of a cardiovascular event after angiography (therapeutic intervention, myocardial infarction, or cardiovascular death) was evaluated during a follow-up of 37 months. Forty-three patients had significant CAD on angiography. Angina pectoris had a sensitivity of 65% and specificity of 66%, corresponding to a positive LR of 1.9 and a negative LR of 0.5. A variable number of patients underwent noninvasive tests before angiography. Results were similar in patients undergoing hemodialysis and after renal transplantation and in patients with or without angina pectoris. Exercise ECG could not be performed in the majority of patients, and resting ECG (sensitivity, 67%; specificity, 52%; corresponding to a positive LR of 1.4 and negative LR of 0.6) and scintigraphy (sensitivity, 80%; specificity, 37%; positive LR, 1.3; negative LR, 0.5) in patients on renal replacement therapy were not useful for the diagnosis of CAD. Angina also markedly increased the relative odds for the occurrence of a cardiovascular event during follow-up (relative odds, 4.6) compared with other noninvasive tests. Angina pectoris had the best informational and prognostic value of noninvasive screening methods, but angiography seems to be the only method to clearly document CAD in patients on renal replacement therapy.Preoperative dobutamine stress echocardiography versus cardiac arteriography for risk assessment prior to renal transplantation.Because coronary artery disease is the leading cause of death in patients with end-stage renal disease, we prospectively studied the prognostic value of dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE) compared to coronary angiography (CA) as an evaluative tool. Thirty-three patients at high risk for coronary artery disease were selected from a cohort of 133 renal transplant candidates and underwent both DSE and CA. In this study, the value of DSE was found to exist in its strong negative predictive value (92%). A negative DSE coupled with a negative clinical cardiac evaluation was found to practicably exclude the necessity for CA. DSE can thus serve as a non-invasive, low cost screening test.Noninvasive assessment of cardiac risk in type I diabetic patients being evaluated for combined pancreas-kidney transplantation using dipyridamole-MIBI perfusion tomographic scintigraphy.This study was performed to determine the value of dipyridamole-99m Tc-methoxy-isobutyl isonitrile perfusion (99mTC-MIBI) tomographic scintigraphy in the assessment of cardiac risk in patients being evaluated prior to combined pancreas-kidney transplantation (PKT). We performed perfusion tomographic scintigraphy using single photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) on 77 patients. The tomographic images did not show clinically relevant findings in 65 patients. In the remaining 12 patients, coronary arteriography was performed: 2 showed normal results, 4 showed no stenosis, and 6 showed significant stenosis ( > or = 70%). Seventy-two patients underwent PKT. During the follow-up (6-48 months), there were seven cardiac events, 4 patients with significant stenosis, and 3 with nonsignificant stenosis upon coronary arteriography, and all had pathological tomographic images. 99mTc-MIBI tomographic scintigraphy may be useful in identifying patients at low risk of incurring cardiac events after PKT and may, in a large group of patients, obviate the need for routine coronary angiography.Dobutamine stress echocardiography for the detection of significant coronary artery disease in renal transplant candidates.Prophylactic coronary revascularization may reduce the risk for cardiac events in diabetic renal transplant candidates. No published data exist on the accuracy of dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE) for the diagnosis of angiographically defined coronary artery disease (CAD) in renal transplant candidates. The purpose of this study is to examine the accuracy of DSE for the detection of CAD in high-risk renal transplant candidates compared with coronary angiography. Fifty renal transplant candidates with diabetic nephropathy (39 patients) or end-stage renal disease (ESRD) from other causes (11 patients) underwent prospectively performed DSE, followed by quantitative coronary angiography (QCA) and qualitative visual assessment of CAD severity. Twenty of 50 DSE tests were positive for inducible ischemia. Twenty-seven patients (54%) had a stenosis of 50% or greater by QCA, 12 patients (24%) had a stenosis of greater than 70% by QCA, and 16 patients (32%) had a stenosis greater than 75% by visual estimation. The sensitivity and specificity of DSE for CAD diagnosis were respectively 52% and 74% compared with QCA stenosis of 50% or greater, 75% and 71% compared with QCA stenosis greater than 70%, and 75% and 76% for stenosis greater than 75% by visual estimate. On long-term follow-up (22.5 +/- 10.1 months), 6 of 30 patients (20%) with negative DSE results and 11 of 20 patients (55%) with positive DSE results had a cardiac death, myocardial infarction (MI), or coronary revascularization. Six of 27 patients (22%) with a QCA stenosis of 50% or greater had a cardiac death or MI compared with none of the 23 patients (0%) with QCA stenosis less than 50% (P = 0.025). We conclude that DSE is a useful but imperfect screening test for angiographically defined CAD in renal transplant candidates.Diagnostic accuracy and prognostic value of combined dipyridamole-exercise thallium imaging in hemodialysis patients.Non-invasive detection of coronary artery disease in dialysis patients, a major cause of mortality, often remains difficult. The aim of the study was to test the diagnostic and prognostic accuracies of combined dipyridamole-exercise thallium imaging in dialysis patients.Dipyridamole-exercise thallium imaging and coronary angiography were both performed prospectively in 60 asymptomatic hemodialysis patients who were followed up, long term, by recording any major coronary event.Coronary angiography was abnormal in 13 patients (21%), and there was abnormal thallium uptake in 17 patients. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and overall accuracy of thallium to detect a coronary artery disease were 92, 89, 71, 98 and 90%, respectively. After a median follow-up of 2.8 years, 12 patients experienced at least one major coronary event (4 cardiac deaths, 5 myocardial infarctions and 3 revascularizations). Eight of the 17 patients with abnormal thallium uptake (47%) suffered a coronary event, compared to only 4 of the 43 patients (9%) with a normal thallium uptake (P < 0.001). The positive prognostic predictive value of thallium imaging was 47% and its negative predictive value was 91%. The probability of survival free of coronary events was significantly higher in patients with normal thallium uptake than in those with abnormal thallium uptake (crude risk ratio 7.6; P < 0.001) even after adjustment for several risk factors for cardiovascular disease (adjusted risk ratio 9.2; P < 0.005).In dialysis patients, combined dipyridamole-exercise thallium imaging is an accurate method for detecting coronary stenosis and for predicting future coronary events.Prognostic value of dipyridamole thallium-201 screening to minimize perioperative cardiac complications in diabetics undergoing kidney or kidney-pancreas transplantation.To minimize perioperative cardiac events, we utilize a screening protocol consisting of intravenous dipyridamole thallium-201 myocardial imaging (DPT), with the selective use of coronary angiography based on the presence of reversible defect(s) on DPT test. A retrospective study was performed to determine the prognostic value of this protocol and to identify any clinical parameters predictive of an abnormal DPT test. To accomplish this, a detailed chart analysis of 176 consecutive kidney (n = 89) and kidney-pancreas (n = 87) transplant recipients who had undergone pretransplant DPT testing was performed. The results of the DPT test were interpreted as normal in 111, fixed defect in 15, and reversible defect(s) in 50 patients. Forty-two of the 50 patients with reversible defect(s) underwent coronary angiography. Twelve of the 27 patients with significant coronary artery disease (CAD, > 50% stenosis in one or more coronary arteries) underwent pretransplant revascularization and the remaining 15 were treated medically. Cardiac events (documented acute myocardial infarction or sudden cardiac death) within 6 wk of transplant were stratified by the results of this protocol. Also, various clinical parameters were compared between patients with normal and abnormal (fixed and reversible defect) DPT tests. Only one of the 111 (0.9%) transplant recipients with a normal DPT test had a perioperative cardiac event. None of the 15 (0%) patients with a fixed defect and none of the 15 (0%) patients with reversible defect(s), but a nonsignificant (< 50% narrowing) coronary angiogram, had a perioperative cardiac event. Three of the 27 (11.1%) patients with reversible defect(s) and significant disease on coronary angiography, who had undergone pre-transplant revascularization or were managed medically, had a perioperative coronary event. Of 14 recipients parameters analyzed, age > 50 yr was the only variable predictive of an abnormal DPT test. We conclude that the incidence of perioperative cardiac events in patients with a normal or fixed defect, or reversible defect(s) but a nonsignificant (< 50% narrowing) coronary angiogram is very low, indicating the high correlation of these findings on DPT and an uneventful (cardiac) post-transplant course. The incidence of perioperative cardiac complications amongst the high-risk transplant recipients with reversible defect(s) and significant CAD on coronary angiogram may be minimized by appropriate preoperative medical management or revascularization. None of the clinical variables except age > 50 yr was predictive of an abnormal DPT test.Non-invasive cardiac investigations in patients awaiting renal transplantation.Patients with chronic renal failure undergoing renal transplantation have a high prevalence of cardiovascular disease. Invasive investigation may identify those at risk of cardiac death during or after renal transplantation, but which patients should undergo cardiac catheterization is currently not clear. In 95 patients awaiting renal transplantation we assessed the ability of echocardiography and exercise electrocardiography to identify patients at risk of cardiac death. Echocardiography identified impaired left ventricular (LV) systolic function in 20%, severe in 8%. Of the patients with severe LV dysfunction, 25% died before transplantation. Of those undergoing exercise electrocardiography, 44% did not achieve 85% of maximum predicted heart rate. No coronary artery disease requiring intervention was identified by exercise testing. These findings indicate that echocardiography, but not exercise electrocardiography, should be part of the assessment for renal transplantation.Pretransplant dobutamine stress echocardiography is useful and cost-effective in renal transplant candidates.Atherosclerotic vascular complications in diabetic transplant candidates.Serious vascular complications limit the success of renal transplantation in diabetic patients. Nearly half of diabetic transplant recipients die within 3 years after transplantation from a vascular complication. However, it has been difficult to determine before transplantation which patients are likely to do poorly. Because atherosclerosis is a systemic disease, we hypothesized that diabetic transplant candidates with pretransplant coronary artery disease would be at high risk for vascular complications even if asymptomatic at the time of pretransplant evaluation. Our hypothesis was that insulin-dependent (IDDM) transplant candidates with coronary artery disease identified with pretransplant coronary angiography would have an increased number of vascular events (amputation, cerebral vascular accident [CVA], or myocardial infarction [MI]) within 3 years of follow-up. We prospectively studied 198 consecutive diabetic transplant candidates grouped on the basis of coronary artery disease. Group 1 patients had no stenosis that was 50% or greater, group 2 patients had one or more stenoses between 50% and 74%, and group 3 patients had one or more stenoses of 75% or greater. During median follow-up of 41 months, 64 patients experienced 98 amputations, 28 MIs, and seven CVAs. At 36 months of follow-up, 55% of group 3 patients, 30% of group 2 patients, and 11% of group 1 patients had experienced a vascular event (P < 0.001). Cox regression confirmed the association of coronary artery disease with subsequent vascular events. Patients with coronary artery disease had a sevenfold increased risk of amputation and a fourfold increased risk of myocardial infarction. Six of seven CVAs occurred in patients with coronary artery disease. We conclude that coronary artery disease identified at pretransplant evaluation is associated with an increased risk of noncoronary vascular complications within 3 years after evaluation.Evaluation of diabetic patients for renal and pancreas transplantation: noninvasive screening for coronary artery disease using radionuclide methods.Pharmacologic stress thallium scintigraphy is commonly performed in the risk assessment of diabetic patients with nephropathy before kidney and/or pancreas transplantation; however, controversy exists regarding the test's accuracy in detecting coronary artery disease. Our purpose was to compare pharmacologic stress thallium scintigraphy and also exercise radionuclide ventriculography with coronary angiography in diabetic patients undergoing evaluation for transplantation. In addition, we also determined the association of the test results with outcome after transplantation. The medical records of 47 patients (mean age, 37+/-9 years) without clinical evidence of coronary artery disease were reviewed. Forty-one patients had pharmacologic stress thallium scintigraphy performed during their evaluation. Sensitivity was 62% and specificity was 76% for detecting > or = 75% coronary artery stenosis (sensitivity was 53% and specificity was 73% for > or = 50% stenosis). Thirty-five patients had exercise radionuclide ventriculography performed. Sensitivity was 50% and specificity was 67% for detecting > or = 75% coronary artery stenosis (sensitivity was 44% and specificity was 63% for > or = 50% stenosis). Thirty patients had both pharmacologic stress thallium scintigraphy and exercise radionuclide ventriculography performed; when either test was abnormal, sensitivity in the detection of > or = 50% or > or = 75% stenosis tended to increase compared with pharmacologic stress thallium scintigraphy alone (0.05<P<0.10), whereas specificity decreased (P<0.01). The incidence of adverse cardiac outcomes was identical for patients with abnormal thallium scintigrams and undergoing transplantation (2/11) compared with patients with normal scintigrams and undergoing transplantation (4/22). We conclude that: (1) pharmacologic stress thallium scintigraphy and exercise radionuclide ventriculography are suboptimal screening tests for coronary artery disease in diabetic patients awaiting kidney and/or pancreas transplantation; (2) using the two radionuclide tests in combination results in a decrease in specificity; and (3) patients with abnormal thallium scintigrams can receive transplants with outcomes similar to those for patients with normal thallium scintigrams.[Diagnostic value of myocardial thallium stress scintigraphy in the detection of coronary artery disease in patients undergoing chronic hemodialysis].Atherosclerotic heart disease is the leading cause of death in patients with end stage renal disease, but its non invasive detection remains difficult because of a low efficacy of exercise testing. The aim of the study was to evaluate diagnostic accuracy of thallium myocardial imaging after dipyridamole combined with exercise. Forty two chronic dialysis patients (34 men, 8 women) aged 55 +/- 11 years (range: 36 to 75) without symptom of angina nor myocardial infarction were studied. In each patient, an echocardiography, a myocardial scintigraphy with dipyridamole combined with symptom-limited exercise, and coronarography were performed. A coronary heart disease was diagnosed by coronarography in 10 patients (4.5 and 1 respectively with 1, 2 and 3 vessels diseased). Echocardiography detected a left ventricular hypertrophy (LVH) in 26 patients and a regional asynergia in 14 patients. A positive scintigraphy was present in 11 patients. Three false-positive and 2 false-negative on scintigraphy were noted. Sensibility, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were respectively evaluated at 80, 73, 73 and 93%. All the five patients with either false-positive or false-negative scintigraphy exhibited a LVH. CONCLUSION. In chronic dialysis patients, coronary heart disease may be detected by thallium myocardial imaging after dipyridamole combined with exercise.Usefulness of dobutamine stress echocardiography in detecting coronary artery disease in end-stage renal disease.The cardiovascular evaluation of patients with end-stage renal disease (ESRD) has been hampered by the suboptimal sensitivity and specificity of currently employed diagnostic tests. Dobutamine stress echocardiography (DSE) is a recently developed technique which is accurate for the diagnosis of coronary artery disease (CAD) in general populations. The purpose of this study was to assess its diagnostic accuracy and prognostic implications in patients with ESRD. Patients with ESRD (n = 97) underwent DSE as part of a preoperative evaluation before being listed for renal transplantation. Patients were followed for 12 +/- 6 months (range 1 to 24) after the study. Rest and dobutamine stress echocardiograms were analyzed for regional and global function. Coronary angiography was performed in 30 patients, and 25 underwent renal transplantation in the follow-up period. DSE had a sensitivity of 95% (92% for 1-vessel, 100% for > or = 2-vessel disease), specificity of 86%, and accuracy of 90% for the detection of CAD. During the follow-up period, 6 patients died; DSE revealed inducible ischemia in 4, and catheterization before death revealed multivessel CAD in 2. Conversely, a normal DSE identified a very low risk population, with a 97% probability of being free of cardiac complications or death during the follow-up period. We conclude that DSE accurately identifies CAD in patients with ESRD and identifies a cohort of patients at low risk for cardiac complications.Preoperative evaluation for diabetic renal transplantation: impact of clinical, laboratory, and echocardiographic parameters on patient and allograft survival.To assess the impact on renal transplant patients and graft survival of clinical, laboratory, and echocardiographic parameters commonly measured prior to surgery.Forty-seven consecutive diabetics with preoperative echocardiograms at the time of transplantation.Clinical history, standard chest roentgenogram, electrocardiogram, blood tests, echocardiograms, and HLA testing at baseline; follow-up from 2 to 7 years with periodic reassessment of graft function.Patient survival did not appear to be influenced by age, sex, or type of allograft. A history of either myocardial infarction, congestive heart failure, or angina was present in 15 patients with 3-year survival of 50% (72% if not present, p less than 0.05). Histocompatibility testing did not impact on survival. Serum sodium, potassium, calcium, phosphate, and calcium-phosphate product did not discern different survival groups. A hematocrit greater than 30% was present in 15 patients with 3-year survival of 43% (73% if not present, p less than 0.05). Greater than 10% antibody sensitization of the recipient resulted in a 3-year survival of 38% in eight patients (68% if not present, p less than 0.05). Radiologic evidence of cardiomegaly or congestive heart failure and standard electrocardiographic evidence for left ventricular hypertrophy or strain did not impact on survival. Echocardiographic measurements of left ventricular end-diastolic diameter, posterior wall thickness, or ejection fraction were also not predictive. Increased end-systolic diameter (10 patients, 30% 3-year survival versus 69%, p less than 0.05) and decreased velocity of circumferential fiber shortening (11 patients, 45% 3-year survival versus 71%, p less than 0.05) both appeared to be related to survival. Increased accuracy of prediction could be obtained by adding risk factors so that a history of coronary artery disease and increased end-systolic diameter predicted 3-year survival of 42% versus 82% if neither was present. In terms of graft survival, no clinical, radiographic, or electrocardiographic result yielded predictive information. Among the laboratory tests, only highly antibody-sensitized patients (eight patients, 0% 3-year survival versus 66% 3-year survival, p less than 0.001) showed different survival patterns. Echocardiographic elevated end-systolic diameter predicted a significantly (p less than 0.001) decreased graft survival (3-year survival 33% versus 63%).Preoperative prediction of patient and graft survival in diabetic renal transplantation may be enhanced by echocardiographic assessment of systolic load and function. For patients with normal systolic function, whose hematocrit is below 30%, with preformed antibodies less than 10%, renal transplantation has an excellent prognosis; invasive cardiac procedures are not likely required. Since these risk factors are likely additive, a high-risk group may be identified. These latter patients should undergo coronary angiography.Noninvasive assessment of cardiac risk in insulin-dependent diabetic patients being evaluated for pancreatic transplantation using thallium-201 myocardial perfusion scintigraphy.We examined the value of thallium-201 myocardial perfusion scintigraphy in noninvasive assessment of cardiac risk in 36 insulin-dependent (type 1) diabetic patients being evaluated for pancreas or combined pancreas/kidney transplantation. An extensive cardiovascular evaluation including electrocardiogram was performed in all patients, and most patients were also evaluated by two-dimensional and Doppler echocardiography. Exercise thallium studies were performed in 31 patients. Five patients were unable to exercise and underwent dipyridamole-thallium study. The thallium images were abnormal in 12 patients, 10 of whom underwent coronary arteriography. Significant coronary artery disease was found in 7 of these patients. Nineteen patients underwent pancreatic (3 patients) or pancreato-renal (16) transplantation without any occurrence of cardiac death or nonfatal myocardial infarction peri-operatively or on follow-up ranging from 7 months to 21 months. In contrast, 3 cardiac events occurred in 12 patients not approved for transplantation, each of whom had an abnormal thallium study exhibiting significant ischemia. Resting left ventricular global and regional function was not helpful in determining perioperative risk. Thus, thallium-201 myocardial perfusion scintigraphy may be useful in identifying diabetic patients at low risk for pancreas transplantation and may obviate the need for routine coronary angiography in these patients.Thallium stress testing does not predict cardiovascular risk in diabetic patients with end-stage renal disease undergoing cadaveric renal transplantation.This study assessed the usefulness of thallium stress testing as a predictor of perioperative cardiovascular risk in diabetic patients with end-stage renal disease undergoing cadaveric renal transplantation. Demographic factors influencing the exercise performance in these patients were also examined.The medical records of 189 consecutive patients with diabetic nephropathy who were evaluated for cadaveric renal transplantation were reviewed. Thallium stress testing was the initial examination of cardiovascular status in 141 patients. An adequate examination was one in which at least 70% of maximum heart rate was achieved. A thallium stress test was normal if there were no ST segment depressions on the electrocardiogram and no perfusion abnormalities on the thallium scan. Forty-four patients underwent cardiac catheterization as the initial evaluation (Group C) and four patients underwent transplantation without a formal cardiovascular evaluation (Group D).Sixty-four of the 141 patients undergoing thallium stress testing had an adequate and normal examination (Group A). The incidence of perioperative cardiac events in this group was 2%. Seventy-seven patients (Group B) had an abnormal (n = 41) or an inadequate (n = 36) thallium stress test and most (n = 61) then underwent coronary angiography. The use of beta-blockers was the only predictor of an abnormal or inadequate thallium stress test (10 of 64 versus 27 of 77, chi 2 = 6.66, p less than or equal to 0.025). Forty-three percent (26 of 61 in Group B) of patients with inadequate or abnormal thallium stress tests had significant coronary artery disease on cardiac catheterization. The perioperative risk of cardiac events was not different in Group A versus Groups B, C, and D combined. Survival of Group A and B patients was not different but was significantly longer than that of Group C patients (p less than 0.001). Thallium stress testing was less expensive than cardiac catheterization ($1,000 versus $4,000 to $5,000).Thallium stress testing allowed 45% of patients to avoid cardiac catheterization before renal transplantation. Discontinuing beta-blockers before thallium stress tests may improve exercise performance. The risk of perioperative cardiac events after transplantation was low and not different among patient groups. The relatively low predictive value of thallium stress testing for significant coronary artery disease and perioperative cardiac events in diabetic patients with end-stage renal disease suggests the need for the development of a more cost-effective, noninvasive screening test for this patient population.Assessment of coronary artery disease by thallium scan in type-1 diabetic uremic patients awaiting combined pancreas and renal transplantation.Twenty-five type-1 diabetic uremic patients (14 men, 11 women, mean age forty +/- eleven years, range, nineteen to sixty) were prospectively analyzed for coronary artery disease (CAD) by thallium scan (TLS) before synchronus pancreas and kidney transplantation. Duration of diabetes ranged from ten to thirty-two years (mean twenty-two +/- five). Fifteen patients (60%) were in dialysis from two to sixty months (mean twenty +/- eighteen). Advanced diabetic degenerative complications were present in all patients. Twenty exercise and five pharmacologic thallium scans were performed. Forty-four percent of patients (6 men, 5 women, mean age forty-two +/- eleven years, range, twenty-six to sixty) had a positive (reversible or permanent defects) TLS. In 2/11 cases, severe CAD required further cardiac investigations for therapeutic management decision. A statistical correlation with resting ECG nonspecific ST-segment and T-wave abnormalities was observed (p less than 0.05) despite the absence of angor in 8 of the 11 patients. On the contrary, no statistical correlations were found regarding high blood pressure, smoking, hypercholesterolemia, duration of diabetes, and duration of dialysis. In this particular diabetic population (young age, male/female ratio = 1.2) with high incidence of silent ischemia, resting ECG repolarization abnormalities, though predictive, were not specific or prognostic of CAD severity; in these cases, exercise and pharmacologic TLS, a noninvasive and sensitive cardiovascular test, may be of great interest in diagnosis of CAD, allowing adequate cardiac management before, during, and after pancreas transplantation.Predictive value of thallium-201-dipyridamole myocardial stress scintigraphy in chronic hemodialysis patients and transplant recipients.The prognostic impact of thallium(Tl)-201-dipyridamole (DPM) stress and redistribution scintigraphy done in 36 patients on chronic hemodialysis (HD) and in 23 renal transplant recipients (TRs) was evaluated according to cardiovascular complications and survival in a follow-up period of six years. Though symptomatic ischemic heart disease (IHD) was present in 33% of HD patients and in 17% of TRs, 50% and 39%, respectively, had Tl-201 findings indicative of IHD. The duration of HD treatment was similar for patients with an abnormal or normal scintigraphic finding. Abnormal Tl-201 results were seen more frequently in older patients. During follow-up, 27 of 36 HD-patients died, 16 had an abnormal and 11 a normal Tl-201-DPM finding; cardiovascular complications were the cause of death in 88% and 18% of these patients, respectively. Thus the incidence of death from fatal cardiac events was 12% per year at risk for the former and 1.9% per year at risk for the latter. In TRs survival was not different for patients with an abnormal or normal Tl-201 finding (56% vs. 64%). However, fatal or nonfatal cardiovascular events were seen more frequently in patients with an abnormal Tl-201 results (78% versus 7%; p less than 0.0001). Stepwise logistic analysis and survival analysis demonstrated Tl-201-DPM stress/redistribution scintigraphy to be the only predictor for identifying patients at increased risk for cardiovascular events. In patients with abnormal Tl-201-DPM scintigraphy subsequent survival was extended for symptomatic patients as compared to asymptomatic ones )30.3 +/- 21.6 versus 22.0 +/- 17.3 months; p less than 0.008).Prognostic value of intravenous dipyridamole thallium imaging in patients with diabetes mellitus considered for renal transplantation.Patients with diabetes and end-stage renal failure are known to have a high risk for cardiac morbidity and mortality associated with renal transplantation. The most efficient method to determine preoperative cardiac risk has not been established. To determine the effectiveness of intravenous dipyridamole thallium imaging in predicting cardiac events, 40 diabetic renal transplant candidates were studied preoperatively in a prospective trial. The study group consisted of 40 patients whose average age was 42 years (range 27 to 64); 34 (85%) were hypertensive and 21 (53%) were cigarette smokers. Cardiac history included chest pain in 6 patients and prior myocardial infarction in 3 patients. Dipyridamole thallium imaging showed reversible defects in 9 patients, fixed defects in 8 patients and normal scans in 23 patients. Dipyridamole thallium imaging was performed using 0.56 mg/kg of dipyridamole infused intravenously over 4 minutes. Cardiac events occurred only in patients with reversible thallium defects, of which there were 6. Of these 6 patients, 3 had cardiac events before transplantation and 3 had them in the early postoperative phase (within 6 weeks of surgery). Of 21 patients who underwent renal transplantation, 3 had cardiac events within 6 weeks of transplantation. The average duration of follow-up was 11 months (range 1 to 21). Thus, dipyridamole thallium imaging is an effective method of identifying renal transplant candidates likely to develop cardiac complications. Routine coronary angiography may not be necessary to screen all renal transplant candidates for coronary artery disease before surgery.Perfusion thallium imaging of type I diabetes patients with end stage renal disease: comparison of oral and intravenous dipyridamole administration.Eighty patients with type I diabetes and end stage renal disease were prospectively evaluated for coronary artery disease with dipyridamole-thallium-201 scintigraphy and quantitative coronary angiography. Forty patients received dipyridamole orally, and 40 received it intravenously. The prevalence of coronary artery disease was 53%. There were no significant differences in the accuracy of the two dipyridamole tests (sensitivity = 85%, specificity = 85%, accuracy = 85% for the oral group; sensitivity = 86%, specificity = 72%, accuracy = 79% for the intravenous group). Combining the 80 patients into a single group gave a sensitivity of 86%, a specificity of 79%, and an accuracy of 83% for the detection of coronary disease. Although the accuracy of this test in this patient population was similar to that previously reported for other groups, the prevalence of disease was high and resulted in a low predictive value of a negative test (83%).Ineffectiveness of dipyridamole SPECT thallium imaging as a screening technique for coronary artery disease in patients with end-stage renal failure.The efficacy of dipyridamole single photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) thallium as a screening test for coronary artery disease (CAD), was studied in 45 patients with end-stage renal failure undergoing evaluation for renal transplantation. Coronary arteriography, dipyridamole SPECT thallium imaging and clinical follow-up were performed in all patients. Nineteen patients (42%) had an obstruction of 50% or more in at least one coronary artery. Fourteen patients had a positive thallium scan, but 7 of these were false-positives (sensitivity 37%, specificity 73%). The sensitivity was considerably lower than that quoted for non-ESRF patients in the literature, and significantly lower than a control group of 19 patients without ESRF having comparable severity and distribution of CAD. Five of the 6 patients who died of cardiac causes over a mean follow-up period of 25 months had normal thallium imaging, but all had significant coronary artery disease at cardiac catheterization. Dipyridamole SPECT thallium imaging has not proved a useful screening test for angiographically significant CAD, and does not predict cardiac prognosis in this population.Cardiac evaluation of candidates for kidney transplantation: value of exercise radionuclide angiocardiography.In view of the high incidence and mortality of coronary artery disease (CAD) in patients with kidney transplantation, a systematic cardiac evaluation was prospectively performed in 103 uraemic patients eligible for transplantation. After clinical examination, 28 patients with symptoms of CAD or diabetes mellitus were referred directly for coronary angiography, whereas the remaining 75 patients had rest and exercise radionuclide angiocardiography for evaluation of possible asymptomatic CAD. Among them, left ventricular ejection fraction was below 40% at rest or fell during exercise by at least 5 EF% in 12 patients; coronary angiography in nine showed CAD in four and hypertensive heart disease in five. In the remaining 63 (of 75) patients without severe resting left ventricular dysfunction or exercise ischaemia, the follow-up of 28 +/- 7 months revealed no clinical manifestation of CAD. Overall incidence of CAD in symptomatic and asymptomatic patients during a follow-up of 27 months after cardiac evaluation was 20 and 25% in nondiabetic and diabetic candidates for kidney transplantation, respectively (P = n.s.). Thus, clinical examination combined with exercise radionuclide angiocardiography in patients without signs or symptoms of heart disease had a high predictive accuracy for presence or absence of late manifestations of CAD. Exercise radionuclide angiocardiography is therefore a useful method for screening kidney transplantation candidates for asymptomatic CAD.Use of digital subtraction fluorography in screening for coronary artery disease in patients with chronic renal failure.The diagnosis of coronary artery disease remains a major problem in patients with end-stage renal disease. Screening with conventional noninvasive techniques is limited by the poor exercise capacity of these patients. This study evaluated the accuracy of digital subtraction fluorography in detecting coronary calcification as a noninvasive, nonexercise screening test for coronary artery disease. Eighty-six patients under evaluation for renal transplantation and considered at increased risk of coronary artery disease were studied by coronary arteriography and digital subtraction fluorography for coronary calcification. Significant coronary disease (greater than or equal to 50% obstruction in at least one vessel) was present in 36 (42%) patients. The detection of coronary calcification by digital subtraction fluorography had a sensitivity of 78% and a specificity of 66%. The probability of disease being present in the absence of coronary calcification in this group was 18%. The detection of coronary calcification by digital subtraction fluorography appears to be a satisfactory and inexpensive screening test in this setting.Evaluation of cardiovascular risk for renal transplantation in diabetic patients.Cardiovascular disease contributes in a major way to morbidity and mortality in diabetic patients with end-stage renal disease. Sixty patients with type I diabetes were evaluated prior to renal transplantation to determine the risk of cardiovascular complications. On the basis of results of thallium stress testing and/or cardiac catheterization, each patient was assigned to one of five categories. There were no cardiovascular events in the seven patients who had negative results on stress testing. Of the remaining 53 patients, all of whom underwent cardiac catheterization, 30 had normal coronary arteries. None of these 30 patients had any cardiac morbidity, and the two deaths that occurred in this group were not attributable to cardiac causes. Significant coronary artery disease was present in 38 percent of the patients. The overall mortality rate was 5.4 percent in those patients without coronary artery disease and 43.5 percent in those with the disease. In addition, the mortality rate in patients with coronary disease classified as severe was 62 percent, whereas it was 20 percent in those categorized as having moderate disease. The data indicate that patients with diabetes and end-stage renal disease who are at highest risk for cardiovascular events can be identified, and these patients probably should not undergo renal transplantation.Coronary artery disease in 100 diabetics with end-stage renal failure.Predictive value of thallium stress testing for coronary and cardiovascular events in uremic diabetic patients before renal transplantation.Coronary artery disease and the ability of noninvasive exercise perfusion imaging with thallium-201 to predict future coronary and cardiovascular events was prospectively evaluated in a group of 85 insulin-dependent diabetic renal transplantation candidates. Sixty patients received renal allografts (36 living related donors, 24 cadaver donors) after a thallium stress test; the actuarial 2 year patient survival rate after transplantation was 84 percent. Twenty-five patients remained on dialysis, and the 2 year actuarial survival rate from onset of dialysis was 41 percent, significantly lower than the actuarial survival rate of transplanted patients (p less than 0.01). Thirteen transplanted patients had positive thallium stress test results, and 6 (46 percent) had cardiovascular events (two fatal). In contrast, of 47 transplant patients with negative thallium stress test results, only 13 (28 percent) had cardiovascular events (four fatal). Five patients treated by hemodialysis only had positive test results and three (60 percent) had cardiovascular events (two fatal), whereas of 20 hemodialysis patients with negative test results, 9 (45 percent) suffered cardiovascular events (four fatal). In this study, cardiovascular events included arrhythmia, stroke, and pulmonary embolism. Within the total group, 4 of 18 patients (22 percent) with a positive test result (22 percent) had a fatal myocardial infarction, whereas only 3 of 67 patients (4 percent) with a negative result had a fatal myocardial infarction (p less than 0.05). In comparison, 24 of 85 patients had a history or electrocardiographic evidence of preexisting cardiovascular disease, and 13 (54 percent) had subsequent cardiovascular events (5 of 11 patients with positive test results and 8 of 13 patients with negative results). In summary, renal transplant candidates with positive thallium stress test results appear to be at increased risk compared with those with negative results for the development of fatal myocardial infarction, but thallium stress testing is no more predictive for future coronary and cardiovascular events than is a history or an abnormal electrocardiogram.Asymptomatic coronary artery disease: angiographic assessment of diabetics evaluated for renal transplantation.Twenty-one insulin-dependent diabetics with azotemic nephropathy were evaluated for renal transplantation by selective coronary angiography and cine left ventriculography. All had hypertension, retinopathy, neuropathy, and required salt restriction plus diuretics for volume overload. There was no clinical or electrocardiographic evidence of ischemic coronary artery disease in twenty. Ten patients (five males, five females, mean age 29.3 years; mean duration of diabetes 21.9 years; mean serum cholesterol 239 mg%) had significant coronary artery disease, seven demonstrating focal abnormalities in left ventricular wall motion. Two patients (one male, one female; mean age 36.5 years; mean duration of diabetes 28.5 years; mean serum cholesterol 250 mg%) had no significant coronary artery disease, but demonstrated diffusely abnormal left ventricular wall motion with diminished ejection fraction. Thirty-eight percent had significant coronary artery disease unpredictable by electrocardiographic or clinical data. The finding of no significant coronary artery disease in 52% of a group with severe renal-hypertensive complications of diabetes is surprising. Two patients may have a demonstrated cardiomyopathy.Natural history of asymptomatic coronary arteriographic lesions in diabetic patients with end-stage renal disease.Arteriosclerotic heart disease is a major cause of death in insulin-requiring juvenile diabetic patients treated for end-stage renal disease. Eleven consecutive diabetic patients without clinical evidence of coronary artery disease underwent complete cardiac evaluations, including coronary arteriography, as part of transplant recipient work-ups. Seven were women and four were men; their mean age was 32 (21 to 50 years). Angiographically, every patient had multifocal atherosclerotic coronary disease. Four of seven patients tested had positive-stress electrocardiograms. In this group of patients followed for a mean of 19.8 months, eight died. Of these deaths, six were due to coronary heart disease and another due to a stroke. In two patients who became clinically symptomatic, serial angiograms revealed progressive disease of the coronary circulation; in one case, despite normal renal allograft function and serum lipid levels. The mode of end-stage renal disease treatment, serum lipids or blood pressure control could not be linked to mortality. It is concluded that arteriosclerotic heart disease is common in diabetic patients with end-stage renal disease even when angina is absent. The natural history in this high risk population is an important consideration in the selection of patients for end-stage renal disease treatment.